Decent range somewhat close to the city.  The mats are pretty solid; however, the grass range needs to be tended too.  It's like hitting out of US Open type rough...not very amenable to practicing.  Which kind of defeats the purpose of going to a golf range...Still gets 3 stars because the range is lit up at night which is excellent for those of us who are addicted to this amazing game, but are somewhat short on time (having a job kinda sucks sometimes, no?).
Good beer selection. Understaffed for a light Monday night crowd, it wasn't her fault she was the only server. But it took about an hour to get our sandwiches. Mine was one of the best reubens I've ever had.
If you want a true understanding of Pittsburgh in the morning, come here. This greasy spoon is always packed, and is one of the better of its kind south of the city.\n\nThey serve waffles in halves, which is great. The eggs and toast are good, the homemade hot sausage is excellent. The drawback are the barely cooked potatoes.\n\nIf you're hungry, get \"The Mixed Grill\"... Gab and Eat's brand of the \"kitchen sink\" breakfast that all Midwest places are about.
OK, what is with all of these \"CASH ONLY\" places in Pittsburgh? I can appreciate that some smaller businesses might have trouble installing a credit card system in their store/resturant, but could you perhaps provide an ATM?  In the past, this would deter me from eating at this place. \n\nLooking at a standard breakfast menu, I decided to go with a tuna melt instead. What I got was a cold tuna salad sandwich with a slice of cheese on toast. I had ordered a melt being in the mood for a warm meal, but to no avail. One day later I can't even remember what my side was. I suppose it didn't leave much of an impression on me.  I have to say that the dessert was really good! The cherry pecan pie! I have not seen this concoction anywhere else but this was awesome! The cherries were not the sweet canned variety, but a pie worthy tart topped with sugar. I think I want to make this pie with my parents next harvest of our cherry tree!\n\nMy first impression is \"Eh.\"  I am learning how crazy Pittsburghers are over breakfast! Seriously, waiting 30 minutes for a table at a tiny diner with a menu that reads as follows:  \n\n\"2 eggs and toast $x.xx\"\n\"2 eggs, meat, and toast $x.xx\"\n\"2 eggs and pancake $x.xx\"\n\nI'd rather go to a Denny's and order the \"create your own Grand Slam!\"
My husband and I tried this place for the first time today. It was easy to find and no problems with parking. It's \"Seat Yourself\", but there were no signs stating this, so we stood there looking like fools for a minute. It took awhile for the waitress to acknowledge us and I'm guessing that this was Barb. She apologized and said that one of her workers called off today. No big deal and her apology was appreciated. She came back with our drinks, dropped them off, and left again. We didn't see her for another 20 minutes. Ultimately, we were there for 30 minutes before she took our order. This was aggravating to me. I don't mind waiting for my food if I know it's going to be awesome and they're making it with love, but come on now. We ordered the hot pepper omelette/home fries/ toast and chocolate chip pancakes/sausage. The food was alright, really nothing special. A new waitress ended up taking care of us and she was much more attentive. We may or may not go back.
3/6/12  visit -  i am from san francisco bay area and if u want a dive go to china town in san francisco. - this place was dirty like chinatown dive but some of the best food i have every tasted came from a dive. the food was really good and my group ordered a bunch of different things it was all good- a- taste.- prices are reasonable a-. --------they dont speak english very good and got my order wrong.\nsweet potatoe fries a+\npizza  - a\neggplant hoagie b+\ngreek salad b+\ngyro a+\nif they scrubbed the place down and the lady spoke better english 4 star ****
Are you are really looking at the review for LJS?  Its fried stuff, with extra fried stuff in a cardboard boat.  You will regret eating it 30 minutes after you finish, but it is delicious.
I agree with Paul on this one. But I had to stop here on my way home from work tonight. \n(I think I feel my heart yelling at me again) , The gal at the drive thru window was just soooo sweet , I just might go back and ask her to marry me! \nBut then again , she gave me a slip with a survey on it to fill out online. \nMaybe she just wanted my positive response. Ok Sarah B. you got it ... now where's my free coke ?
Don Don is a restaurant I find myself missing now and again, it's probably my favorite restaurant in Carnegie. Simple setup, just a small restaurant with a few tables and a TV. Oddly enough I think my favorite thing to eat there is the wonton soup, never had better. The food is average but I always enjoyed eating there, great service and a cheap place to get Chinese food.
I've been to Papa J's twice and had mixed experiences.\n\nBoth times I had the banana pepper appetizer, which is great and goes really well with the FRESH and delicious bread and cheese they give you at the start of your meal.\n\nFor entrees, me and my girlfriend have had mixed experience.  I've had the fish sandwich (very good) and the eggplant parm sandwich (okay).  My girlfriend got the salad with bread and basil on it, but the basil was over powering and the bread was soggy with the dressing. \n\nThe service is also a mixed bag.  The first time our server went out of her way to take care of us and even MADE me cocktail sauce for my fish sandwich.  The second time, the server was lackluster, didn't know anything about the menu and wasn't able to take proper care of us.  \n\nI would return to Papa J's, but I my terrible experience last time isn't enough to say it would be my first pick of places to eat around Carnegie/Robinson.
Had dinner at Papa J's with a group of 6.  I loved how the restaurant is in a old brick building with large windows. It felt like a neighborhood restaurant. On a Saturday night, the restaurant was full but not crowded.  We were seated in a room with poor acoustics.  It was difficult to hear people at our table and the waitress.  While she tried, I can see the asperation in her face when she had to repeat the specials to both sides of the table.\n\nPeople ordered bourbon on the rocks before dinner which seemed watered down, while my lemon drop was made nice.  The bread was delicious!  Can you describe it to be creamy?  The fried zucchini was lightly breaded and not too oily.  It was a large portion made up of 2 sliced zucchinis.\n\nWe ordered a variety of dishes.  The pasta dish was dry with more pasta than sauce or meat.  Those who ordered the fish special thought it was delicious.  The shrimp dish was enjoyed as well.  I had the chicken marsala which was pretty good.  The marsala sauce wasn't too thick, and the chicken moist.\n\nHard to tell if the deserts were \"homemade.\"  The tiramisu and spumoni were small in portion and meant for one. \n\nOn the whole, I was on the fence with my overall impression of Papa J's.  \"A-ok\" probably is the best way to describe it.
Service was great. Apps delish, specifically the stuffed banana peppers & lentil with ham soup. I think I chose the wrong entree though because I ordered a cod with crabmeat special. The cod was completely tasteless with some crabmeat layed across the top. It all reminded me of boiled fish. Yuck! Note to self. Order the pasta!
Talk about overpriced. $18 for a fairly basic pasta with some obviously frozen chicken chopped up over it. The latter was terrible, thin and flabby and rather unappealing. The pasta itself was ok, as was the sauce. The desserts are pretty good. But honestly, that is a $10 dish whose price has been inflated.
They burned my fish and they burned it bad.  Ordering fish at Eat'n Park is always a gamble.  I just never know how it's going to turn out.  I'm a risk taker so I ordered two pieces of baked lemon sole. \n\nWell it went terribly wrong.  My waiter came out and said, \"They burned your fish, so I had them put two new pieces in the oven.\"  I was impressed by his honesty and didn't mind waiting for two new pieces.  \n\n I gladly helped myself to my boyfriend's french toast while I waited. \n\nThen out of no where another server comes to the table with the burnt fish and sets it down infront of me. With the burnt side down of course.  That just shows the kitchen is not in total coordination.  \n\nLike I said getting fish from Eatn' Park is a toss up. In the end I got two nicely baked pieces of sole to replace the burnt ones, so I left satisfied.
Mmm...peppermint mocha\n\nIn my quest to visit every Starbucks in the USA I have stopped at yet another location.  This one is located in the center of a circle road -- very cache and in a newer part of the area.
I just realized they remodeled this one recently-ish. Well, in my world recently because it's been a while since I've been here.\n\nThey've added more seating which makes it way more conducive to having a meeting here. Which is my concern during the week. I imagine during the weekend it just fills up with tweens getting their sugar rush before hitting the movie theater. \n\nThe coffee, or tea for me.. Is still same old same old. I don't imagine one single Starbucks will break the mold and make original drinks...
As far as Starbucks go, this is a pretty nice one.  The baristas are friendly and while I was here, a lot of regulars must have come in, because they bantered away with almost everyone.  The bathroom was clean and well maintained and the trash wasn't overflowing in the canisters around the store.  The pastries looked fresh, but I didn't partake.  The noise level was also at a nice working level - not too loud, music just barely audible.\n\nI do wish there was more seating.  It is nice that this location has a counter at the end of the bar for sole workers, but it doesn't replace more tables.  I'm sure this isn't as much of a problem in the summer when there's the space outside.\n\nThere was a treat receipt promo going on, but the barista didn't tell me about it, which I found odd.  Usually when they have promos like that going on, they ask everyone if they want their receipt to come back later in the day to claim whatever the offer is.  Today it was one of their new pastries for $1, I know in the summer they do $2 grande iced drinks with that morning's receipt.\n\nOverall, nice working or socializing environment.  Very friendly and inviting.  It's what I've come to expect from Starbucks, so points for consistency.
I have been frequently shopping at this Michaels store over the last couple months since I began taking a cake decorating class and hosted a large baby shower at my home. The store has typically had the supplies that I need from cake and cupcake baking and icing to scrap booking supplies. This location is pretty average compared to other Michaels - it's exactly what you would expect when going to this store. It's not a large store, but it's not a small store -- just average.\n\nI do enjoy using the Michael's coupons when shopping. I definitely save a lot of money! Instead of toting around the paper versions, I actually have the iPhone app that has coupons available to use from the app. \n\nMy only complaint is that sometimes it takes a while to check out at this location. I don't normally have a problem - usually only one or two people ahead of me - but sometimes it can be much slower. Today, for example, there were only two customers ahead of me, but one of them was having issues with a coupon. The line began to get longer and longer, and though a couple associates were lingering up front, they kept calling for someone else. From personal experience of being a manger in a retail store, do not linger or let your associates linger near the cashiers without jumping on register. Whatever the reason may be that you are not helping customers, it still appears rude and make everyone more impatient....
Its clean, open 24/7 with hot shoe string fries and creative milkshakes. What else do you want in life??
Ah, Steak n Shake, you hit the spot after a night of drinking. Open 24 hours, drive thru or dine in, with wonderful, cheap greasy burgers, chicken fingers, breakfast sandwiches, and shoestring fries. You're faster (and cheaper!) than Eat N Park. Plus your employees wear those adorable bow ties. Granted, if we were at a fancy party, I might act like I don't know you, but deep down inside you know I heart you.
Fast food done right, what more can you want?\n\nA throwback to old timey diners, steak and shake is where you get a decent meal at a good price. \n\nMy sisters and I arrived on a Tuesday afternoon around 3pm catching their 2-4 happy hour, which we read on the door upon entry; a lovely surprise. This meant that all shakes and drinks were 50% off! \n\nI ordered the western BBQ burger, which was 2 thin patties, cheese, bacon, BBQ sauce, and fried onions. It came with shoe string fries (my favorite), all for the low price of $4.79. Are you kidding me? What's not to like! The food was actually pretty good! I liked it a lot. Since it was happy hour I also \"splurged\" on a chocolate covered strawberry shake. It was meh. Could have gone without it. The overpowering taste of artificial strawberry really turned me off, but the hot fudge saved it. But, how can you really go wrong with hot fudge?\n\nAll in all, 3 meals and 3 shakes came to $20. A steal. Also the food is good! I enjoyed it. I'd come back.
Burgers are not the best quality. Better than McDonald's but not much better. The fries are fairly thin, but crispy. They aren't bad. The prices are also quite decent. However, their shakes are amazing. Thick and creamy. It's also great that they have half off shakes on weekdays in the early morning like 1-3am.
Steak 'n Shake's food is pretty good and the prices aren't bad for the quantity of food. I ordered a grilled chicken salad with no dressing. The salad looked thrown together and was $5.49 for 2 croutons, tomatoes, carrots, cabbage, lettuce and chicken breast. (They forgot the cheese!) The staff wasn't very friendly or helpful and seemed like they didn't want to be there. There usually is a long wait at Steak 'n Shake, but if you catch them when they aren't busy, you will breeze through- drive-thru that is. I do like their food and you can eat healthy options, but the staff isn't helpful and the quality isn't always there.
Really enjoyed this a lot more than I thought I would.  The drinks were on the pricey side, but I didn't head here to get smashed.
Dueling piano bars in Pittsburgh started at Station Square, and they died out. Then when the chain restaurant magnet \"waterfront\" opened in 2000 the parent company of The Rock Bottom Breweries decided to open Sing Sing in back of The Brewery.\n\nWhen it first opened it was pretty cool. The very first house band could put on a show that led to standing ovations. I know, I was there. From Stairway to Heaven to Free Bird, Stayin' Alive to She's My Cherry Pie, Elton John to the Boss, they were amazing at sounding like the bands they were covering. Equally incredible were the obscure songs that audience members would shout out, songs only you though you knew, and they would effortlessly sing a good portion of the song, sounding like the band who's song they sung.\n\nBut today, Sing Sing seems like it's stuck in the early part of the 21st century. The whole dueling piano, shout out a song to stump the band, Sing us a song you're the piano man has run it's course. I don't hate Sing Sing, but I could never come here more than once a year. It's a been there, done that kind of place.
The musicians at this place work hard to entertain the crowd, so I can't say they are all bad.  However the minimum for a song request is $5.  I spent $20 on a song for my girlfriend and they NEVER played it!!  They were playing songs for $5 and $10, but my $40 got me no where.  Even if they didn't know the song, which I doubt, they could have picked one they knew and improvised,  my tip, save your $$ on the requests.\n\nOtherwise it's fun for special events every once in awhile.
Pretty fun place to go every once in a while, but, believe me, by the end of the night you'll be ready to go. The show lasts around 5 hours, by the 3 hour mark you'll be sick of sitting there in the crowd with your $9 a pop drinks listening to the same dirty jokes over and over and over again.
My best friend took me to Sing Sing for my bachelor party. I had a blast. The musicians (dueling pianists) made fun of me in a bunch of songs. They also were really good at playing requested tunes (rock). When the show was over we shuffled across the hall to the connected \"Rock Bottom\" restaurant for some grub. We all had so much fun that we went back for my buddy's bachelor party.\n\nThere were some drawbacks though. We went on a Thursday night so the atmosphere was lacking as the place was pretty empty. And of course they are a little pushy soliciting tips when the place is empty. But it's not our fault the place is empty on Thirsty Thursday, if their drinks weren't so damn expensive maybe more people would show up. And sometimes they used vulgar language which was just unnecessary since they would have otherwise still been hilarious. Also there was no table service, and the only bartender was a bitch. I'll probably be back, but only for a special occasion when I can afford it.
Typical, but new.  \n\nYou see all of the people that are walking in and out and, I must say, the customers look like they work for a living hear.  I swear one of the guys was covered head to toe in soot.  That is amazing.  \n\nRan around the store looking for those few items that I needed to satisfy my need to build and create.  Minimal help from the small quantities of employees, but some of them actually asked if I needed help -- after I had found the item.
Your typical area big box hardware store.  It's convenient to go to because of the proximity to other stores and how close it is to so many communities.\n\nCan't really say much else about this place other than with the self checkout lanes it's a breeze to run in and then out without having to deal with a single associate.
This local Lowe's serves its purpose for my husband and me -- a convenient home improvement store that we run into every month or two. I am most impressed by the lawn and garden section of the store. I am not sure how it compares to other Lowe's stores, but when shopping at the Home Depot in North Fayette last fall, their flower selection was dismal compared to this Lowe's.
I'm reading on here that the food is really hit or miss. I've only gone to Duke's one time, but the food was good. It wasn't too busy so our service was very attentive and it didn't take long to get our food at all.\n\nThe place is separated between a bar area and a more family style dining area. We sat in the dining area because the bar area was pretty full. The dining room area definitely fills up with an older, have lived in Pittsburgh all their lives crowd, while the younger crowd is in the bar area. \n\nI'll definitely be back since I live in the area.
This was actually the first time I've ever been to a Dave and Buster's.\n\nWalking into such a huge space, especially coming from the often narrow venues in San Francisco was strange.\n\nUn-nerving actually. \n\nBecause Dave and Buster's is all about excess. Almost obscenely so.\n\nAs far as food - their stuff is standard. Most of it is fried and as another reviewer pointed out - not very healthy. At all actually. You have to really scour the menu to find some somewhat decent viable and nutritious options.\n\nBut most people don't come to Dave & Buster's for food. They come for the games.\n\nAnd while I've never been that into video games or arcade games - my brother and sister always have.  I was apprehensive about having a good time here  - but after awhile - my siblings' enthusiasm about the place became contagious and I found myself really enjoying myself.\n\nEspecially once i realized that I have mad skills at Skee Ball. And proceeded to dominate.\n\nTrust.
Dave and Buster's has to be split up into separate experiences to rate it. \n\nDining: 2 stars\n\nI had a party of 20 coming in; I had called ahead of time, and arrived early. They immediately set up the table while about 4 of my friends and I waited; the hostess, after taking my name, never spoke to us again. She did not tell us when we could sit, how long it would be, or any other information. And then they made us wait for 75% of our party to show up before they would seat us. Mind you, there was no one else waiting, and the table was ready, and we were ready to order. But they didn't tell us this; I didn't even know why we were being forced to wait until I heard a supervisor whispering to the waitress about making us wait. I still have no idea why we were forced to wait. \n\nWhen my full party was finally seated, we were helped by two waiters who were perfectly polite and nice. BUT, our service was rather haphazard. People would order drinks and food, and get things at wildly different times. One person was done eating appetizers and drinks when another was just getting their first drink. I know there was chaos to a big party, but it got a little out of hand.\n\nThe food is pretty standard American chain food, comparable to Appleby's and Chili's - not offensive, but nothing to knock your socks off. It has a decent selection, and a few good desserts and appetizers, and everything was competently prepared. Overall, it is a fine enough meal for a large group before going to enjoy the arcade at fairly reasonable prices, but some of the service standards are poor. In the future we will probably eat at one of the other restaurants in the area and then move over to D&B's for games.\n\nBar: 1 Star\n\nDrinks are predictably expensive, but there is a wide variety. The problem is that about half of them don't even kind of resemble what is on the menu, and most don't have enough alcohol to even taste. Worse yet, while you can get a drink at the bar in the arcade, the staff is either completely non-interactive or just rude. You have to track them down, and then have a minimum of interaction before they stomp off like you ruined their life.\n\nArcade: 4 Stars\n\nThere are a lot of great games here to play, and many that are fun with groups or pairs. It is a great place for a large party, because you can mingle with all your friends playing many different very fun games. If you are a couple, there are also many great selections that everyone enjoys. The staff on the floor is helpful and fast to fix games that have problems, and are typically polite. The ticket prizes are cheap as expected, but kind of fun, and the people in the ticket shop were always nice and quick to help.\n\n\nOverall: 3 Stars\n\nIf you want to hang out here, I would suggest eating somewhere else, and then playing games and having fun here, but only order beer at the bar and don't expect a smile.
Chuckie Cheese for grown ups...Yeah, that could sum up my review for sure (but I'll try to make it a bit more interesting than that).\n\nFirst let me say that this isn't my first trip to a Dave & Buster's.  Second, I actually experience all of it while here.  We will start with the food/service.  Staff, you were wonderful.  You were polite, you greeted us as soon as we walked in the door, gave us no qualms while ordering and were swift with your delivery.  Food, you were not wonderful.  I ordered the BBQ chicken breasts.  This came with a side of broccoli and their type of mashed potatoes.  The chicken was a bit dry and in some places you can tell it was left on the grill a little too long.  There were actually some bites that all I could taste was charred meat.  There wasn't enough BBQ sauce on the the chicken either.  The broccoli appeared to have been cooked prior and then thrown back into a pan to be seared.  Some of my broccoli actually had some burnt crisp areas on it.  Also I noticed that there were still some leaves left on the broccoli.  The mashed potatoes I wanted to like (which I hoped would be the best part of the dish, I'm a bit of a potato freak), but alas, I was let down. *sad face* They were cold and such a tiny portion.  With a tiny amount of shredded cheese and bacon but into that divot they made with the scoop to get it out of it's container.  Oh food, how if I didn't need you to survive, I wouldn't complain about you.\n\nThe building right now is in disarray.  They are in the midst of a remodel with lovely plastic curtains covering up certain sections of their dining area.  No bar out in the dining area right now and the pool tables were absent as well.  If you wanted a drink you had to go back into the game room.\n\nSpeaking of the game room, by far the best part.  With the meal I ordered I got the $20 play card (the best part of the meal, super charge it for $3 more and it's even better).  The game room  you can tell is in need of an update.  The carpet is worn and other signs of wear are noticeable as well.  One good thing is the games.  They change them up so often that there is always something new once you return.  Who knew that playing Connect 4 could be so fun, or for that matter Skee Ball rises to the top of my list to play.\n\nI will return again, but only after I eat elsewhere first.
i had fun here.. fun big kid games for me!!!\nO.. But the bartender Melissa was a SUPER bitch and RUDE \nHope they fire her..
DAVE & BUSTERS!  It's a nice place to eat, have fun and drink!!  All ages can enjoy this place.  I was so EXCITED to hear them announce that after 10p, all children whether accompanied by a guardian or not had to go!  It made for a nice evening for adults only.  \n\nEverytime we go whether we play or not we enjoy ourselves.  I didn't give it FOUR STARS because every time I've went I haven't been able to eat in the restaurant area of there.  I know I still get the same food that everyone else does wherever you sit.  Sometimes, I like the nice relaxing atmosphere of the restaurant.  I haven't as of yet, been seated there.  \n\nNot to mention that the servers around the bar, are a little slow at responding to customers as well.  So all in all, D&B's is a good spot to stop at for food and entertainment.  Just don't expect to be seated in the restaurant portion, and expect to wait awhile for food service in the bar area.
A fun place and lots to do but a bit pricy. $20.00 will buy you a hundred points which will last you a little over an hour.I recommend the bowling game ,ball racing car game and connect 4 also there are several games that can be played in groups of 4
ehh, 3.5 -- I can't rate it super low because i do smile a lot during my visits. Speaking of that, I've been here a few times, but never wrote a review for D&B. \n\nI'm a kid at heart and honestly do enjoy the games. However, there have been multiple instances where I swiped my game card & it took my credits, but no game began. There have also been times that I won and no tickets were released. I guess nothing is perfect but it does happen atleast once a visit (each scenerio)  It's hard to find a worker walking around and for half-price games, you kind of just take your loss with the 1.3 credits for skee ball (hmph!)\n\nThe food- it really isnt anything too fancy. I've had okay food, but super long wait times for a simple chicken fingers & fries for example. It's your basic sandwiches, salads, appetizers & a few pastas. I believe all sandwiches & burgers are around $10 & served with fries.  You can get the Eat & Play deal which includes food from a specific menu + a game card. Besides the game card deal, if you wanted to make D&B a date night you might be better off heading to another place to eat in Waterfront for amazing food.. but to each their own.  Try it once I suppose. The brownie sundae that i devoured last night was satisfying (2 brownies, 2 scoops of ice cream.. one with chocolate syrup; the other with raspberry sauce & fresh strawberries. Oh & whip cream)\n\nDrinks- pretty weak. We ordered 2 liquid maryjanes (2 each that is) which are filled with multiple shots of alchy & didn't really catch a buzz. Oh welllll. They do have a happy hour from 5-7pm. I'd go during that time for the best deal. I believe cocktails are half off & $3 off  bottles of wine. I've never seen anyone walking around with a wine glass though lol. \n\nThe prizes- as others have noted, the prizes are a little cheap for the amount of tickets they \"cost\" However, it's cool to leave with a D&B coffee mug, cup or shot glass. Last night for 2500 tickets we decided on magnetic-style dart board (1,300?) a coffee mug, a D&B glass (our plastic one bit the dust) & a D&B coffee travel mug.. I might be missing a few odds & ends.\n\nOverall it's a fun time but can be pricey. It's best to head here Wednesday for half price games or get the Eat & Play deal while dining. \n\nI can't lie though, I find myself smiling ear to ear a few times within those 3 hours (woah, seemed longer than amount of time :D ) Speaking of which, in that time-frame we played 250 credits (cost= $40) but it was half-price games.
Rock Bottom Brewery in Homestead is always a good time.  They brew their own semi-micro brew here and generally have as many as eight brews to chose from.  Saturday night C and I stopped by to have a little dinner and enjoy some of their frosty beverages.  \n\nOur first issue of the night was getting to Rock Bottom.  As the restaurant is located in Homestead, a trip across the Hi Level Bridge was in order.  Little did we realize that the bridge was under construction and it took nearly 40 minutes to get across it.  Upon arriving at the restaurant we were presented with the task of finding a place to park which proved to be a daunting task.  This place was absolutely packed due to several locations sharing a parking lot.  After we got inside, our wait was about 45 minutes but luckily we were able to find a seat inside the packed bar while we waited.\n\nThe food at Rock Bottom is quite tasty, but it is all pretty standard bar fare with the nachos and burgers leading their menu.  They also have entrees such as steaks, but this place is not exactly known for their high class food products.  I was pleasantly surprised by the quality of the food and we quickly determined that this would not be your average plate of nachos in a bar.\n\nOur order consisted of a plethora of items from their appetizer menu including Chicken Nachos, Quesadillas and Ball Park Pretzels.  We had planned on splitting a meal for dinner, but by the time the appetizers arrived, we knew we had way too much food in front of us. \n\nThe nachos were on a gigantic plate and piled high with cheese, sour cream, guacamole and shredded chicken.  Containing just the right amount of jalapenos they had a nice little kick as well.  In much the same way, the quesadilla was much more than an appetizer portion.  With shredded meats and cheeses overflowing from the tortilla, there was enough food here for a two person entree.  The Ball Park Pretzels are the reason we come to this place.  They are always so light and soft with just the right amount of salt.\n\nAs far as the beers are concerned, I ordered up the sampler so that I could get a taste of the various brews.  They make a wide assortment of brews, from the Bud Lightesque \"Lumpy Dog\" to a dark \"Brew masters Choice.\"  I found many of the beers to be quite tasty, however, nothing exactly special about them.  I would be that a taste test would find one hard pressed to chose the Rock Bottom brew over any off the shelf six pack.  Don't get me wrong - still excellent brews, but I would expect more from a place that claims to be a brewery.\n\nI give it 3 out of 5 Rinsem's due to the lack of originality in the brews and the amount of traffic involved with getting in and out of the place.
Not the greatest ale house in the city but certainly not the worst.\n\nI like the food and I have tried all the beers.  They're just \"OK\" as far as beer goes.\n\nLarge portions. Friendly staff.
Little slow on the service and didn't have the beer I wanted on the menu. But you get those things when they brew their own beers on-site.   But the stadium pretzels are good.  The cream stout is tasty.\n\nThe burgers are good and big with the little skinny fries.  I'm not a fan of the skinny fry, but hey the burgers would choke a horse - and almost did.  :o)
Went with a group after work for dinner and a brew.  We ordered a few appetizers first.  The wings are good and the soft pretzels with spicy spinach cheese dip was fun.  Had a burger, you can create your own from veggie, turkey, or fresh ground beef. Had a fresh ground beef and the meat was fresh and cooked perfectly with a fresh bun.\n\nThe brew pub is nice and was surprised it wasn't busier.
I was SO ready to like this place!  Turns out, not so much.  It was okay.  No better than TGIFridays, but better than Eat n Park!  The deets.\n\nThe hubster and I were here on a Saturday evening after a show at the Improv so we were happy and in a good mood and ready to enjoy some good eats.  We ordered drinks.  He a wheat beer of their brewing, me my fave Bloody Mary with Absolut Peppar.  The hubster deemed the beer acceptable, but wouldn't go out of his way to come back just for another one....yes, he DID order another one \"just to be sure.\"  My Bloody sucked.  Watered down tomato juice with no discernible Peppar of any kind, let alone any other seasonings.  Even a good standard mix would have been better.  Our very efficient and friendly waitress took it back and watched while it was remade by the other bartender.  Nope, no better at all.  That went back and I went with a you-can't-screw-it-up Amaretto sour.  It was fine.\n\nHub ordered a Reuben - why, I'll never know because they simply never measure up to the gold standard of what used to be at the long-lamented Gazebo in Shadyside.  You younguns wouldn't have a clue of the establishment of which I speak.  He said this one was \"fine.\"  I had the Texas Fire steak with jalapeno butter which I enjoyed very much!  Packed a punch of heat and flavor, but the sides were uninspired.  Steamed veggies.  Any flavor was steamed out in the process - eh.  Cheddar mashed potatoes - there was cheddar in there?????  No way!\n\nThe tab was reasonable - we DID have a Living Social deal that took $30 off, so our check was for $12 and change, not including tip.  Not bad (even with the $15 cost of the LS Deal), but had we paid full price, it wouldn't have been worth the experience.  We'll hit the Improv again - we have before - but, we'll head somewhere else afterwards.
Dined in twice, food ok, atmosphere good.
The only reason Rock Bottom gets 3 stars is because of the brews. Food was \"eh\", not many vegetarian options and hostesses who will ignore you because they are too busy chatting about who didn't text them back. This place has the potential to be great, but sadly, it falls way too short in almost all areas.
Its not bad. I'm not into chain kind of places, but if you're with a group that doesn't do anything more adventurous, you'll do fine here. I vacillated between 2 and 3 stars but the house beer I had will make sure I come back from time to time.
Nothing special. Just like Applebee's, Chili's or Fridays. Stick to the bar food (burgers, sandwiches, pizza, wings and salads) and you will be okay. \n\nThis was our second attempt at trying Rock Bottom on Fathers Day. The first time almost ten years ago. We went in the early afternoon and they had already ran out of steaks. How do you do that on Fathers Day?! This time we went around 12 noon and beat the rush.\n\nMy wife got and loved the Berry Bash Sangria. She just said it had too much ice in it. Our daughter got the root beer float which she love and I started with a Mango Ice Tea, but later switched for a raspberry ice tea as the mango ice tea wasn't sweet enough.\n\nWe started off the the Kobe beef sliders as our app. It took at least 15 minutes to get them. You get three sliders and they were very good.\n\nMy wife got a small greenhouse salad with Jalapeno ranch dressing to start off with which she enjoyed and the lobster & shrimp enchiladas as her main entree. She complained about how salty it was and the fact that there was no lobster in it at all.\n\nOur daughter got the kids burger and fries. No surprise there.\n\nI ordered the New York Strip with mashed potatoes and it came with green bean as well. My strip was cooked perfectly and has a decent taste. Longhorn has a much, much better quality of steak though. The green beans were pretty good and my mashed potatoes very bland and pretty average. \n\nThe kitchen sounded like an live episode of Hell's Kitchen. The waiters were repeatedly asking for orders at least 5 to 6 times. The kitchen was backed up the whole time we were there.\n\nOn a different note, our waitress Susan was very good. Come here for drinks and the bar food. Skip everything else.
Tom and I decided to try this place out before catching a late movie on a Saturday night. He is a beer buff, and neither of us had ever been there, so we gave it a go.\n\nWe walked in around 8pm and we were told that there would be an hour long wait. We put our names on the list and went shopping around the area. About 25 minutes later, our table was ready. Parking was a cluster since the lot is shared with Dave & Busters and a karaoke bar called Sing Sing. Tom dropped me off at the door so I could secure our table.\n\nOur server, Jackie, approached me almost immediately and brought two waters to the table to start. She was very attentive and funny, and probably the best part of our experience at the restaurant. Tom ordered a Red Ale and to his surprise, didn't care for it. Jackie gave Tom three free samples of beers she thought he would like after talking to him about his beer drinking habits. He loved all three, and chose the most bizarre (and expensive) beer. Jackie switched the Red Ale to the beer of Tom's choice, and charged us for the less expensive beer. Very nice of her!\n\nWe started out with the Ball Park Pretzels with Jalapeno dip. The pretzels came out quickly and they were very fresh, not to mention huge! We only ate one and took the other to go. Very good app though! \n\nTom ordered some sort of bacon cheeseburger, and I got the Chicken Fried Chicken, which was a pounded chicken breast, breaded and fried, over white cheddar mashed potatoes with a side of gravy and some apple coleslaw.  Tom's burger came with a small handful of fries, and my meal was very spread out on my plate, like something was missing. Not very good presentation at all. The food itself was okay, nothing to write home about. The potatoes were my favorite part. Tom said that his burger was mediocre.\n\nAnother note: The bathrooms are shared with the Sing Sing karaoke bar that is in the same building, so expect drunk singing women in the bathrooms and brides-to-be puking in the stall next to you after enjoying too much alcohol at their bachelorette party... Yuck.\n\nOverall, we might come back for the beer and service, but not for the food. And DEFINITELY not to use the bathroom...
This is  a \"Okay\" place to eat.  The food is nothing special.  I guess what they have going for them is the beer.  Order the  Guacamole for the starter which was okay but for $8.50 and the portion was not worth it.  Rice (Cajun Taco) was not cooked well.  Would I go there again \"maybe\".  If your into beer and watching the game, then yeah go there.
Good club for a good laugh. High food prices (most comedy clubs are), 2 item min. The food was less than stellar. I wouldve enjoyed Burger King more. \n\nService was decent, I believe the waiters/waitresses could hustle a little more or the club should hire more waiters/waitresses. I get grouchy when my glass is sitting empty for more than 2 mins.
They have good acts coming around here, and often give out free tickets, particularly ine summer. I've never actually paid full price for a ticket here. \n\nThe two-item minimum is bit bothersome to me though...I don't mind the requirement so much, but the quality isn't good and the prices are high. Our four items total came to about $30 (two appetizers and two beers) and the apps were really nothing to write home about and the servers aren't even very friendly. Also beware...they have a lot of rules here. They won't seat till the whole party is there; if you get dinner reservations everyone in the party HAS to order dinner, automatic gratuity added to the check, etc. etc.\n\nThe \"box office\" is also weird...you get your tickets at this window complete with microphone and slide-under slot...then you walk into the club and the box office is completely open and the workers are just sitting right there, so I don't get the whole hoopla with the window.\n\nAll in all though, the seats are comfy enough, the atmosphere is pretty nice, and the acts are good.
Came here to see Charlie Murphy. \nParking was nightmare. I would expect nothing less on a Saturday night.\nThe 15 minute wait to get inside was torture. They need to implement a system where if you purchased tickets in advance you don't have to wait outside. Once inside you we were seated pretty quickly.\nSeating is first come first serve.\n\nThe Server was pretty quick to take our orders. I misread the menu description and didn't realize my BBQ sandwich came \nwith cheese.  I don't eat cheese, and had send my order back. The waiter was gracious and returned with my modified order in about 15 minutes. I've never heard of throwing cheese pulled pork sandwich, maybe it's a northern thing. \nWe got our checks quickly, and without issue.
I'm HUGE SNL fan, so naturally if someone who's been in the cast is touring, I'll come here to see them. Some have been really great...Jim Breuer. Some have been (surprisingly) very bad....Tracy Morgan. But it's always been a pleasant experience at the venue.  There's not a bad seat in the house and it's small enough that you get to see and hear everything from the stage.  Beware if you sit in the very front, you KNOW what's going to happen!\n\nA couple downsides.... \n\nWaiting outside in a line in the dead of winter.  The lobby is so small you're forced to wait outside until the first show starts or the first show let's out.  And if you want a good seat, you may be waiting in line for a while.  BURR!\n\nThe two drink minimum. I kinda get why they do it, to make money, of course. But this means they jack up the prices of watered down drinks. Better to stick with beer and wine at these places. No frou frou drinks for me! \n\nAlso, as to be expected, the food's not that great. In a perfect foodie world, places that served food would make it fantastic! Since that's not going to happen, you just go into those places hoping for the best. I've never had anything great here. Nacho platter too many re fried beans, to little nacho's....annnnnd I'm out! \n\nSo what did we learn here? Good venue, stick to beer and wine and eat at a better restaurant beforehand. The talent is really what you're there for so, enjoy the show!
I've been here twice now, and like the others you really only come to Improve Comedy Club for the show. Very reasonably priced for shows  though they have the two item minimum so would suggest they all be drinks.\n\nThe food leaves little to be desired. We decided for the sake of time to grab dinner at the venue since the show started at 7. Having a free appetizer coupon we ordered the spinach and artichoke dip along with the sauteed grilled chicken. Spinach and artichoke dip was good though cheesy rich along with cheese sprinkled on top of the chips. Sauteed grilled chicken - hmmm.... I think the chicken was frozen - definitely not fresh - and the guacamole was artificial with a glop of cheese. It looked like a mess with big ole pile of fries. A lot of food for $10. Service has always been pleasant though they do automatically tack on the tip for you at 18%.
There's nothing like a Saturday night filled with some good laughs, a few chuckles and a couple of good guffaws thrown in for good measure.  That's exactly what we enjoyed on Saturday night!\n\nWe hit the comedy club for an evening of Tammy Pescatelli - the hubby and I have enjoyed her routine on TV and on the occasional DVE morning show..  She didn't fail to give us a good evening of laughs!  The big surprise, was Gene Collier - yep, of the Post-Gazette sports writer fame - as the opener.  What a great opening act!  He cracked wise about the perils of being 58 and a baby boomer.  We could relate!\n\nThe sightlines were lacking.  There was a rather large woman at the table in front of us with massive Pittsburgh BIG HAIR.  All night long my own head bobbed from side to side as I attempted to actually watch the show, and not just listen to it, as she reached repeatedly and unceasingly for her tableful of snacks.  \n\nWith a 2 drink minimum, my first drink was weak and the 2nd was quite strong!  All in all, the two balanced each other out.  But then, you don't go for the drinks, do you?  An enjoyable evening!
I love the Improv. I think its a great way to start or spend a night! Nothing like a laughter filled night. I think its great that we get so many great comedians coming our way (Owen Benjamin, Pablo Francisco super funny Tammy Pescatelli not so much.)\n\nThings you should be aware of: The staff is really strict on the 2 drink minimum so be prepared to spend money on the pricey food and drinks. I kinda wish their menu was a little bit more extensive. Their service is spotty\n\nThe wait staff is a little iffy. I have been here MANY times and sometimes I get an attentive waitress and sometimes not. Most recently our waitress was rude, didn't bother with pleasantries and barely took notice of us. Also beware of the fact they automatically add gratuity. If our waitress was nice I would be more than glad to add to it but this time I was like no way!\n\np.s. when I used my groupon I didn't have any trouble
I love that we have a great comedy club in Pittsburgh with a great location at the Waterfront.  Perfect for a date night and I recommend going to a later show and grabbing dinner beforehand.  I received an online coupon code for $5 tickets for John Heffron. What a deal-def. check for deals before you pay full price for any shows here.  We went early to pick up the tickets at the ticket office.  People were lined up outside about an hour before the show and it was freezing out.  I had no interest in doing this so we grabbed a beer across the street at Rock Bottom. Once they opened the doors (15 minutes before show time) the line went quickly and even though we were at the end we still got seated at a table in the back.  It is not huge inside so there aren't really any bad seats.  They usually have an MC for the night who starts  warming up the crowd. This guy was funny and so was the opening act before John Heffron.  My only complaint about this place is that they have a two drink minimum and the prices are outrageous.  $9.50 for a mixed well drink and $7 for draft beers.  The soda was $3.50! Yikes!  At least we didn't pay full price for the tickets.
Nice Giant Eagle, not as nice as their new Market Districts, but you can look at this Giant Eagle and see how they came up with the Market District Idea and rolled with it. Fresh made sushi, good cheese selection, awesome bakery.
Wahhhhh!!!! They're remodeling this one and it's frustrating! I swear I don't mind change. I really don't~  I should have seen this coming.  There were telltale signs of this happening. First, they switched the pharmacy to the other end of the store where the now defunct Iggle video was. That's A-ok with me, I didn't use the pharmacy anyway. \n\nBut THEN, THEN they moved the whole toiletries section over there. They put my spaghetti and \"ethnic food\" section (by the way, I love that ethnic food includes spaghetti) to where my Tylenol was. My kitty food is now where my spaghetti once was. Can you tell how exasperated I'm getting?? \n\nDid I mention I don't mind change? But here's the thing, I really hate grocery shopping. It's kinda sorta my own fault because I must read every label to make sure I'm not eating something with 25 grams of fat and 5000 calories (even though ice cream may go into my cart from time to time.) So going to this Giant Eagle frequently was nice because I KNEW WERE EVERYTHING WAS. Now I don't....wahhh! \n\nOk, I'll stop crying. I know I'll eventually be back. I'm sure (??) it will be an even better more magical grocery shopping experience once they're done. But I can't take it for right now. I'll be forced to shop at the Ghetto Bird down in the Southside until my former #1 store is all shiny and new again.
This place has amazing selection when it comes to some things and zero selection when it comes to others.  We popped in here a couple times over the weekend I spent in PIT and both times they didn't really have what we were looking for.  Visit #1: Liquid smoke.  Visit #2: Hawaiian rolls.  I know these items must exist in PA just not @G-Eagle.  \n\nThey did however have crazy selection when it came to things like....corned beef brisket or anything that has potato in it.  My californian mind was boggled by the variety of brands and cuts of corned beef that were available.  Too bad that wasn't what I was there for.
I don't know why, but I just can't like this location very much.  I lived in the area for a little over three years and would always go to another GE before this one.  Maybe it's the way it's set up or maybe it's the way that the lighting seems so very dim.\n\nThe selection is typical for any GE, broad and expansive.  Some prices are a bit steep.  \n\nThis location, like many others, has expanded their pharmacy/health care area.  Which is nice, it saves an extra trip to a drug store.
I have to agree with Matthew U on this one. I do enjoy Barnes & Nobles but sometimes i get lost just trying to find a darn calendar. I went here after a dinner date with some neighbors and couldn't believe how packed it was. We had to wait 10 minutes just to find enough chairs to seat 4 people. We ended up stealing them from other tables. Not to mention my hubby stood in line for 15 minutes just to get an Ice tea lemonade.\n\nSo amidst all the books, newspapers and magazines they have an audio and video section. The prices aren't anything to rave about. I can buy the same movies online for a lot cheaper there's just the waiting period. I do shop here sometimes for there discount books. I found a lot of great recipe and mystery books for really cheap, like under $5. That's a pretty good deal but considering there is a half priced book store who has a great selection of books for literally half the price of retailers, how can you beat those prices. \n\nB&N is more of a hangout spot with books in case you want to buy one right there and then. But everything is kind of confusing you always need to ask where something is. I'd rather shop online for anything i really want. It's just not worth it to buy it wholesale.
Nice venue,  good food, great beer, awful service.  Staying at the Sheraton here I've patronized Bar Louie a dozen times recently and they screw up the order in some fashion every single time, without exception.
An absolute must if you're going to a movie and want a drink ($3 drafts and $5 special martinis) and some half-off apps on a weekday from 5 to 7. However, we were bothered that none of the special martinis actually resembled a real martini. No gin or vermouth was used, it's mostly purees and champagne floats with flavored vodkas.\n\nAnyway, the small plates made for good \"upscale\" bar food. Half-price apps make for a cheap, but nice, dinner and a movie - great, great specials. However, I would not buy a full-priced dinner here. Nothing aside from the apps grabbed me for the outstanding price. The baked goat cheese was small but delicious, and the tempura fried shrimp was just right but the sauces didn't match up exactly.\n\nBe warned that the seats make you feel like you're going to be swallowed by them. Seriously, the booth was like sitting in the mouth of a whale.
The Pros: Great view of the city and river in good weather...  \nLovely for loud large groups\nVaried menu with some original items\nGreat place to watch a game inside with a huge bar\nFun location\nGood place to take out of towners.\n\nThe Cons: The food when I went yesterday was not great.  We got the wrong sandwich, our order wasn't as described because the kitchen was out of \"lots of things\"  (Tell us when we order, not when you deliver the meal without elements on the plate.)  \nCan be loud--not a place for a romantic date...\nThe bathroom condition was really bad.\n\nThe server did comp up an appetizer, and they were friendly enough.. they just failed to wow. \n\nThe view was great, and we did enjoy walking around seeing the fountain dance to \"Pour some sugar on me\"  seriously?!?!?  Yes!   Classy eh?
Service has always been good and the food consistent, we usually come for happy hour when apps are half off and there's some great deals on drinks as well.\n\nThings that stand out to me: veggie wrap, fried zucchini, hummus tabuleh and tzatziki platter, and house salad with ranch (their ranch is so good I could eat it with a spoon)
Food was ok. Waitress was a huge air head. Waited 25 min for my $7.00 beer. Only got it after I reminded her. It is just another disappointing chain restaurant disguised as a local commodity.
Although I wouldn't  travel out of my way to have dinner here, this is a resturant that I enjoy having a meal at, when I am in the Homestead water front. On all of my visits here I have enjoyed the tempura shrimp. The dipping sauce are to die for.  I've found myself craveing the tempura shrimp, and the accompanying sauces. \n\nThe first time I ever had dinner here was as a birthday dinner with me and my big sister. So this resturant has sentimental value to me. I attach eating here to having a special night out in the Waterfront. \n\nBar Louie has some very flavorful and fun dishes for bar food, that is.
It was the first time that I went to this location.  We sat outside and it was a beautiful night.  I had the BBQ Burger with fries.  For the price of the burger I expected something much better.  It was a very thin burger when it came to the meat.  As a whole it looked large but that was only because of what they piled on top of it.  In addition, their drinks are expensive!  Just one cocktail could run between $10-$12 and they aren't very large.  Our waitress spent more time talking to her friends at the next table than actually tending to our needs.  There are enough restaurants at the Waterfront that I don't know that I will come back here.
I personally enjoyed my recent visit to Bar Louie with a friend but completely understand the poor reviews on help. The restaurant is pricey for what it is, and our waitress was a bit lackluster.\n\nSo why does Bar Louie get 3 stars? Happy Hour and a nice patio!\n\nHappy Hour is on Monday-Friday from 4-7pm and offers lots of different options -- $3 Drafts, $4 Wines, $5 Martinis, and 1/2 Price Select Appetizers and Flatbreads. My friend and I ordered 4 Martinis and 3 Appetizers between the 2 of us, and our bill was less than $40 total. Not bad!\n\nI ordered a Strawberry Peach Bellini and a S'Mores Martini, and both were tasty. We shared Bruschetta Pomodoro, Spinach & Artichoke Dip, and Roasted Vegetable Flatbread. The food was also good, and I would order all three items again in the future.\n\nMy recommendation is to understand what Bar Louie is good at (Happy Hour) and only frequent the restaurant at those times!
My sons a and I came for Tuesday Dollar Burger Night. You can gat a \"burger\" (beef, chicken, portabella, or turkey) in a bun with lettuce for a buck. Then you can add toppings to complete your burger at a small cost-cheese 75 cents, veggies 50 cents, Artery Cloggers 75 cents, sauce 25 cents. Those are the headings and they have items listed under them-like 9 different cheeses. You can also get a basket of tots or fries for a small price as well. \nMy burger was $2.25 after I added toppings. Is it the best burger I've ever had? No. But is it the best $2.25 burger I've ever had?  Yes. It's kind if a Russian roulette as to how your burger will come to you cooked. Mine was well done and one if my son's burger had pink in the middle. We probably could have sent it back but we don't mind a little pink. \nI love the tater tots!  They are crispy and have the right amount of salt. Yummy!!\nOur server was great and we'll definitely be back.
Great environment at night! Songs going on very lively!! The food of my friends who ordered burger and fried shrimps was not that great. But I ordered chicken flatbread which was really delicious! Absolutely loved it  will definitely go here again just for the flatbreads
Sandcastle is a mixed bag for the kiddos.  On the one hand, there are plenty of waterslides/pools that are a good fit for young \"riders\", on the other hand, Sandcastle, like any city amusement park, attracts more than its fair share of highschool kids looking to spend some time away from their parents and assert their personhood.  \n\nUnfortunately that element doesn't particularly care about \"censoring\" speech for 9 year old ears, and worse, in the Mon Tsunami, about personal space, since the wave pool becomes a near mosh pit of jostling and strutting and shoving and 'showing off' for the fairer sex, and that can be a little dicey for the littler kids.\n\nHaving said that, it's still a good day at the park. . . cheese fries, a cool dip in the pool on a hot day, some fun slides. . . \n\nI think in rating Sandcastle fairly you have to understand the context of the park.  It is NOT policed particularly effectively.  if you take small children you have to be a diligent parent and be aware of your surroundings, paying attention to the group of 17 somethings thrashing around in your near vicinity, \"accidentally\" bumping into people for a reaction from their group.  \n\nMOSTLY it's a good time.  Mostly.
okay, so it's not as fun as kennywood but i guess it's still cool... \n\ni planned ahead a day to go for me & bobby (his first time) it was supposed to be nice day, but the weather changed in 2 weeks.. \n\nwe picked a nice time.. since it was literally supposed to rain all day, there werent any long lines/ we literally rode every water slide in one hour. then we went to head to the lazy river--- & it was closed! they said it was closed due to not enough attendence, but i mean come on. we still paid $70 for 2 people to come in this park where i just rode everything in one hour.. keep the lazy river open so i can kill an hour! aah. the cliff hanger was also closed- like always. \n\nso we just went and rode everything again. the Dragon's Den is sweet and the blue tubaluba is as well. bobby had a blast on the speed slides. i have to admit though, i do miss the regular body slide. \n\nanother reason i chose august 3rd to go to sandcastle was that the park was open until 7pm rather than 5 or 6 like regular days. well actually at 4:45 we recieved a \"15 minute warning\" that the park was closing at 5 due to rain. ugh, a little more time would've been helpful. \n\ni couldnt hear the warning and asked an employee who said they were closing in ten minutes due to the weather and being under-staffed to stay open until 7. it started to rain at 5 and literally at 5:20 the rain was over . the park could've just shut down the rides until the rain cloud passed,  but due to being under-staffed would rather hand out rain checks.. which is fine because we get an another entire day, but i mean it would be a terrible inconvience from someone out of town who planned a family day. \n\noverall, the smile on my boyfriend's face was priceless, but i truly wish we could've enjoyed the lazy river and the park until 7. hopefully next time things go as planned....
So I moved to Pittsburgh from Los Angeles. I know I know I know!\nAnyway so theres absolutely no places in Homestead that delivered Chinese so I decided to walk down to the closest Chinese food/restaurant to my house. \n\nThe family that runs the restaurant is very friendly. I read a review about them on Google that said the  mom looks like she might want to cook you alive. Don't believe it!\n\nOn this visit I ordered the Steamed Dumplings(recommended by some reviewer on google...THAT LIAR) and the Vegetable Chow Fun. I generally enjoy steamed dumplings but these dumplings(too much dumpling little meat) werent so good. Theyll probably be sitting in my mini fridge tomorrow and I'll force myself to eat them when I have the munchies/starving to death. The Vegetable Chow Fun on the other hand verrrrrrrrrrrrrry yummy. Definately most have next time anyone decides to stop by. \n\nBut all in all the verdict is you typical Chinese Take Out Place.\n\n*puts the menu on the fridge*
Not quite authentic but good enough for Pittsburgh. It's the only place that I've found that even comes close to a classic Chicago style deep dish.\nI also had the french onion soup that wasn't bad. The croutons were still crunchy and it had just the right amount of cheese.\n\nMy girlfriend really enjoyed her Caesar salad and said she'd come back just for the salad.\n\nOverall, I enjoyed it and would come back the next time I get a craving for a deep dish pizza. It wasn't authentic but it certainly was not terrible.
I ate here at around 8:00 on a Saturday night.  Reading the other reviews, it makes me wonder if people were a the same restaurant I was.  Sure, it isn't a world class dining establishment, but it is decent considering it is a chain.  You should know that going into any chain, really.  It was basically exactly what I expected in terms of food quality and price.\n\nWe were greeted immediately upon entering, and while the hostess went to grab menus, another server asked us if we were taken care of.  Service at our table was very attentive and water and other beverages were promptly refilled.  I ordered soup and two appetizers instead of an entree or pizza and the server made sure to ask me about the order in which I would prefer receiving my food.  \n\nMy fiance ordered a deep dish pizza and we know they take longer to make than other food items.  It was quicker than we thought it would be and he really enjoyed it.  I had the potato skin appetizer.  It reminds me of a \"baked potato pizza\" that I used to enjoy at a local place back in Buffalo.  It was delicious, especially with the addition of a little bit of hot sauce.\n\nOverall, it doesn't even come close to visiting an Uno's in Chicago, but then again, when does a copy every live up to the original?  It won't be a regular location in our  dining rotation, but it is good to know that when we have a craving for deep dish, Uno will do the trick and cost a lot less than a trip to Chicago.
Well this visit started off good. I was seated right away, no wait. Was given a good beer selection of some PA Craft beers. Ordered the traditional deep dish pizza, but with no onions. Now after we ordered, it just went downhill from there. Was never asked if I wanted another beer, the waitress just gave me more water. My pizza still had onions in it. Which I stated right off the bat, that I didn't blame the girl who took my order. I know cooks can't read. I was one for many years. Mistakes happen, and the manger took care of it and took the item off my bill. NO complaints, still ate the food and it was good. Just not a fan of onions on my pizza. \n\nNow onto the bill, the server continues to tell me that she was sorry for the mistake and declares she told the cooks not to add onions. I already said it was taking care of and there's no worries. She goes on to say that the next day was her birthday, and if I felt like leaving all my money as a tip, it wouldn't go unnoticed. I took this as a joke as I had told her earlier I worked in the industry. When I hand over the gift card I had on hand, she comes back and again repeats herself, tells me that cash as a tip is preferred as she doesn't have to claim it at the end of the night. And again if I felt like leaving her all my money, she would just be so freaking happy. Let me explain one thing and hopefully I am very clear on it. No server, and I mean NO server anywhere, should ever ask a guest or customer for a tip, yet alone, do it twice! So out of kindness, which I shouldn't have left anything by this point. I left a nice tip for the cost of what food I did  have to pay for.\n\nBottom line, the food was good for the price, but the service from this one person as I don't know how the rest of the servers are. Was just horrible.
Love the stores selection but HATE how the girls chase you around to tell you their sales. If I wanted to know I'd ask !!!
Wasn't terrible,\nBut certainly wasn't great.\nSave your hard-earned cash.
Went there for lunch and had a decent meal.  While the Mongolian Beef was beyond excellent, the Moo Goo Gai Pan was average (although I did enjoy the shrimp in it).  Service was fine and decor is pleasant.  For some reason I'm just not in the mood to write a detailed review - please accept my apologies.
I've had PF Changs both in Pgh and KC and honestly, I'm never been disappointed nor elated with the food. It's 'upscale' Ameri-Chinese food. You don't come here seeking 'authentic' Asian staples; it's all changed to some degree to suit American taste buds... nothing wrong with that, imo. Do I even know what 'authentic' Chinese food is? Yes, sortuv, somewhat. Will I stop putting quotes around 'everything'? Definitely not!\n\nIt was 45 min from closing time when we (party of 6) rushed in on a weeknight; got seated, ordered and ate without feeling rushed by the staff.\n\nThis particular PF Changs, on the Homestead Waterfront, had fast and friendly service, though he forgot our order of asparagus. We sampled everything from the the Szechuan shrimp to the Mongolian beef to the Dan Dan Noodles. Good flavors, nothing that stepped out in the crowd.\n\nI don't come here all that often but when I do, I invariably leave feeling satisfied and full.
LOVE the food!!!!!! Try the bomb pop martini. The service has definitely Gone down hill in the past year. And when I've  told the manger he just doesn't give a shit.  It's either hit Or miss with service. But food is ALWAYS GOOD
I was unimpressed with my food and I am even more sad to see, now that P.F Chang's mass produces frozen dinners. \nThis is about as far away from Chinese food you can get, unless of course you are eating microwaved warmed shrimp fried rice. The restaurant is cluttered and the music was up so loud.  I had to yell to carry on a conversation. P.F Chang's in the Waterfront is a unmemorable experience. Maybe I would have better luck microwaving my own meal at home?
I have mixed feelings about this place. I wish I could give 2.5 stars, but I'm in a good mood so I'm rounding up today. \n\nThis was my first time here and I honestly wasn't sure what to expect. The first thing I noticed when I walked in was the layout of the dining area. It seemed less intimate than I had pictured in my mind. The tables were all jammed together and the restaurant had a crowded feel to it. Fortunately, there wasn't a long wait as we had made a reservation. \n\nWe were seated at a table in the middle of the dining room alongside a busy throughway. It seemed all the servers were destined to walk past our table. I appreciated that their menu pointed out that their meals were \"meant to be shared.\" My wife and I decided to share our two meals: Chang's Spicy Chicken and Double Pan Fried Noodles. Before our meal came out our waitress set some sauces on the table in a \"here's your sauce\" kind of way. I remember thinking, \"That's very nice, but I have no idea why you just gave us sauce.\" There was no explanation - just a little tray of sauces. Our food came out and she finally asked if we like mild, medium, or hot sauce. We picked medium and, with a few scoops, she turned our three sauces into three mixed sauces and I still didn't know what they were for. \n\nForget the sauce though, my attention was now drawn to our meal. For meals that were \"meant to be shared\" these sure are little portions. I guess when you go for that high-end presentation you can charge 50% more for 50% less. The food itself was good (in an ok sort of way). I can't say it was the best I've had, but it was good enough. \n\nOverall I thought the experience was lacking. P.F. Chang's tries to be classy, but does it in a cafeteria sort of way. I was constantly distracted by the front doors opening and icy air pouring across the room. The music didn't fit the ambiance. Our table felt like it was in the middle of the road. The restaurant was loud and crowded. The girls at the table next to us were taking those annoying duck-face puckered lip pictures...  \n\nI think our experience may have been different if we were seated at one of the booths along the side of the restaurant, but no such luck.
Surprised how empty the restaurant was tonight.   First time at this location.  Great service, but wasn't hard to do.....\n\nHad a combination Orange Shrimp and Chicken and Chicken Fried Rice.  It was typical PF Changs (Very good).  You can get the Fried Rice off the kids menu for $2.95 versus $8 for a big bowl off the regular menu.
I like Panera bread but this one is a so so. I always get my fuji chicken salad in every Panera bread I go. All of the other use spring mix to make their fuji chicken salad except this one.. They just use regular salad and salad doesn't taste or look very fresh either. I was kind of excited to find there is a panera bread around us but I am disappointed after trying it. Don't know if we will be back again.
I mean, it's Target. It has everything. You just need to know what to buy there, and not get sucked into the convenience of buying everything in one spot.\n\nBeware -- though their merchandise looks nice, and it's a good buy for a student, you don't want to make long-term purchases here. The zipper on a skirt I bought broke the first time I wore it. I've heard horror stories about disintegrating comforters during their first wash.\n\nThat said, their store-brand toiletries and other sundry items are fairly cheap, and they have a wider selection than Giant Eagle or CVS. They also have a cool program with Flickr.com -- you can upload your photos, order them online from Target's One-Hour Photo kiosk, and pay by credit card when you pick them up.\n\nI love their cheap accessories -- glasses, bags, jewelry. Along with Claire's and Filene's, Target is my favorite place to shop for those things.
It's not the greatest Target of all time but it still meets all of your basic needs.\n\nIf you're looking for produce, lower prices, and bigger selection in every department then head to the Target in East Liberty.
If you must eat at Eat N Park, this is the one you want to go to. Why you ask? The corporate offices are right next door and the suits are there every day, breakfast lunch and dinner. \n\nWhen I spend a few hours with dear old mom, she enjoyed spending a day at the Waterfront, she loved the since closed 39 center store, where she could buy her monthly greeting cards for 39 cents each. Then we drive over to this eat n park where she has her breakfast smile and I enjoy an egg beater sandwich and fresh fruit.\n\nThis place is spotless, the salad bar always looks fresh and the food is good, for a chain.
They make a nice breakfast for less than the tip form dinner the night before.  That's not bad!
If you're looking for a wallet, a new cheap purse or something of that nature--this is the place to go.\n\nOtherwise, this kind of shopping just isn't for me!\nI don't have the patience for clothes shopping here though.\nThe racks drive me nuts bc they're in no particular order.\n\nIts \"Shirts/Sizes\", \"Pants/Sizes\", \"Jeans/Sizes\", \"Coats/Sizes\"\nI can't look through a gazillion racks of shirts looking for something I like (aimlessly) in a M or L... I just cant do it!  lol\nWish I could, I'd probably find some deals.\n\nPROS:\nSome good deals\n\nCONS:\nYou've gotta \"dig deep\" to find 'em
Went in here to grab a last minute item I needed for an outfit.  I wasn't going to hold my breath here either, I know it's a Marshalls and that doesn't always mean the best selection.  It's hit or miss no matter what you are looking for.\n\nThis day, was a hit, maybe even a home run.  I do have to admit, the Kenneth Cole shirt I got not only looked great on me, but made my wallet feel even better!
Got lunch from here today. \n\nWhat I sampled: \nMaine Lobster Bisque (delicious and the whole reason for getting lunch from here)\nCheeseburger (decent version I only ate about half, but I expect the other half won't last long)\n\nOverall I enjoy going here, though it is a bit overpriced, but sometimes I am just in the mood for that lobster bisque!
The food was really good, but the prices were pretty high and the portions were on the small side. The desserts were the high point of the meal for me. I got the \"shark fin\" pie and it was really good. The waitress thought I wouldn't be able to finish it... but I showed her. Take that, waitress.
I have passed by this place a zillion times and never given it a second look.  I thought it might be a Red Lobster knock off.  Then I asked a friend if they had ever heard of it and they had, and liked it.\n\nI was pleasantly surprised by how nice the ambiance was inside.  Very cozy.  Much more upscale than I had thought it would be.  The service was terrific.  Lots of things to choose from on the menu.  A bit pricier than I had imagined.  Most entrees were anywhere from $17 to $30.  But this is Pittsburgh and this is seafood.\n\nThat said, they started us off with really delicious sour dough bread.  Butter was soft which I like.  Our entrees came pretty quickly.  I had a seafood assortment of blackened talapia, grilled sea scallops and salmon cooked on a plank.  The scallops were just done, I like them cooked a little more.  Everything else was pretty good.\nMy beloved had the crab cakes and really enjoyed them.\n\nWe'll probably be back, but will order something different.   We liked it.
We had a bigger party and I think that might have flustered the waitresses just a bit. They forgot about our waters until the food came out, but were super apologetic when they did bring them. The food was ok. I ordered the crab cakes they were a bit heavy on the breading, so I would give them a rating of, \"eh\". My friend ordered a steak, asked for medium rare, and it came out...well done. He was too hungry to complain and just ate it. We might go back again, and this time maybe take a bit more time looking over the menu.
I have eaten some very good dinners here.  Although it's a chain, I would say it's several notches above the other chain restaurants.  The chef here seems to add some creativity to the menu, so I will be definitely back again soon.
Top points. \nService. I was there with a large group for a meeting. They gave us a private room and two servers took care of us. They were efficient and very accommodating. Kudos. \n\nAppetizers: had the crab dip and calamari. Both were good. Servers brought extra chips with the dip as they were needed. I'm always surprised that more chips are not just added to the original dish at this point. Dip was good. Calamari was done well. Preferred the shrimp cocktail Sauce with it versus the Asian type soy sauce that is served with it. \n\nWedge salad with bleu cheese. Waaaaaay too much cheese and I like bleu cheese. \n\nI had the blackened tuna with mashed potatoes and seasonal veggies. Carrots were carrot sticks hardly cooked and dry! Green beans overdone and broccoli had seen better days. Simple green beans would have been more appetizing. \nTuna had blackening spices but needed a better sear on it. Was not over cooked. Potatoes as expected. \nOther dishes seen--fisherman's platter. Looked a little greasy, but that's expected from me in a full fried dish. Would be nice if this was offered broiled as well. Crab cakes and filet looked okay. \n\nOverall I'm always underwhelmed and overcharged here. I guess with chain places you get that, but I want more from a place that charges me 25 bucks for sub-seared tuna.
I'm not too impressed with this particular Dick's Sporting Goods. It is in a great location in the Waterfront, but the selection seems a bit limited to me. They have what you need, but they don't have many options it seems.\n\nI went in there the other day and it looks like they also have a snowboarding section now, which they definitely did not have last season. They also have hunting, golfing and biking, in addition to the other regular deptartments. \n\nYour normal Dick's. Nothing spectacular, but it will do.
living alone I love the 5 for $20 deals they have on meat. I also love Faygo products when I have a party or bbq so their sales are always right on time. They don't have as many stores in the area but they are worth checking out. The lines are a lot shorter and the staff is a lot friendlier.
This store has changed hands many times over the past few years and it shows. Fifteen years ago if you didn't get there by 9am you would have fight a crowd. Now it never seems all that busy. Many of the store's best and dedicated employees left or were let go (about five years ago) and product lines change with each new owner. The most recent owner seems to be improving the store and employee turnover has seemed to slow.
I've had mixed results here. I would definitely recommend if buying a new bike, but have had much less success with items/parts I've ordered or with repairs.
Good pizza and i love the breadsticks...i don't know too much else about this place
Recently I've found myself patronizing Bellevue a little more, namely because I've bought a house in the area, and have been checking out some of the mom and pops along the little strip of Mayberry RFD that is the quaint main street. Luigi's is one of those little mom and pops that offers standard basic Italian in a comfortable setting. It's a little kitchy, red-white-and-green, with Dino and Frankie tunes playing in the background.\n\nI've stopped in on several occasions now for dinner, with various friends, and the food has been consistent...it's good...satisfying. Not over-the-top gourmet, or even in the remotest sense 'pretentious'. It's just a good ol' night out for some pasta or lasagna, with a side salad, garlic bread and conversation with your pals.\n\nThe portions are ample, the prices are reasonable, the flavors won't knock your socks off and make you think you've died and gone to Sicily, but they won't make you cringe at having given your money to a profiteering Chef Boyardee either. The service is decent, kind of point blank, not rude, nor over the top friendly. \n\nThe crowd can fluctuate between 'Oh my god, I'm surrounded by Hillbillies' to 'the local gathering at Mayberry', but that seems to be the norm for most places in da burgh.\n\nI've not had the pizza, which apparently get raves, because frankly I only think of pizza as coming in a box to my front door when I'm too lazy to do any cooking at home. But I've had three or four of the pasta dishes, and they come in a generous portion, with a side salad and an order of garlic toast. They taste fine, fill you up, and don't break your bank.\n\nAnd for a local neighborhood joint, that's exactly what I'd hope for. A place you can go to find a dependable and reasonable meal, on a semi-regular basis, in a comfortable setting, with no frills or pretense. \n\nAnd that is exactly what Luigi's is.
I stop by here frequently when I am on my way to work for breakfast. The drive thru is fast but they do tend to get the order wrong. But I will say that I have had more free meals here due to them comping me for all messed up orders. \n\nThe staff is friendly.
We ordered from here because Uncle Chen, our go-to takeout place down the road, was closed. \n\nI ordered the General Tso tofu, a favorite dish of mine, and hubby ordered the beef Mei Fun noodles. We always grab some egg rolls too. The lady on the phone wasn't rude, per se, but she wasn't exactly helpful or answering any of my questions, either (hubby wanted to see about getting a different sauce on his noodles, and I had to ask a few times before she finally answered my question about how large the tofu dish was). I was in a good mood though, so the attitude over the phone didn't bother me. Price was good, typical takeout rates. The good news is that they will allow you to pay with credit cards over the phone, so if you're like me and never carry cash, you can still get delivery. She told me 45 minutes for the food.\n\nThe food arrived in about 20 minutes (we live half a mile away), it was hot and smelled great. Hubby's Mei Fun looked typical, but he was saddened to see that they didn't exchange the white sauce for brown sauce. The beef was pretty mushy, and didn't taste all that great. The veggies were fresh, and pretty crispy even after soaking in sauce. Noodles were alright, nothing to write home about. My General Tso tofu was delicious, and tasted exactly like the dish I was craving. Fried to perfection, perfect-sized pieces of tofu, and a fantastic sauce. The broccoli was fresh and tasted good. This particular dish only came in one size: Enormous. I think hubby and I just ended up sharing my meal, paired with some mediocre egg rolls.\n\nSo, long story short, lady on the phone was a bit irritating, delivery was fast, food was fresh, and, depending on what you order, the food quality ranges from so-so to great. If you're looking for a quick fix to your Chinese food craving, this is a good place to order from, although I'll be going back to Uncle Chen before I try China Sea again.
I was in need of a pedicure before my beach vacation, so I decided to stop in to Star Nails in Bellevue. I've never had a pedicure before, mostly because I'm super-ticklish, but I felt like it was about time.\n\nThe salon looks quite nice inside; wood (well, laminate) floors, clean decor, and four pedicure chairs up on the platform on the right. I didn't have an appointment, and waited about ten minutes on a Wednesday evening.\n\nNancy was my nail technician, and she greeted me warmly and helped me over into the pedicure area. Pro tip: Don't wear a past-knee-length skirt, as it can make straddling the foot bath to get into the chair slightly awkward. Nancy helped me out like a pro and I was all set.\n\nThe pedicure chairs have a massage feature that reminded me of the Migun massage tables. They don't just vibrate; they knead. The controller is right next to you, so you can stop and start as you like. I just made sure the thing kept running the whole time. The foot bath was nice and warm. I'd brought a book to keep myself busy but turns out all my attention was occupied by relaxing.\n\nNancy guided me through the steps and the slight language barrier isn't much of a problem. She completely understood that I was super-ticklish from the flinching involved, and somehow managed to be very careful about it. It wasn't at all unpleasant, which is what I'd kind of expected.\n\nThis is the awful TMI section, so avert your ayes if you are at all sensitive. Since I've never had a pedicure and I tend to walk around either barefoot or in thin-soled shoes, I had quite a lot of callus built up. The removal was kind of disgusting, so I just didn't look, but it didn't hurt at all. I also tend to ingrown toenails on both big toes, and she dealt with them gently and quickly. I was a bit concerned about having that done at a salon, but it's a week later and my toes haven't turned gangrene, so all's well that ends well.\nEND TMI\n\nEven though it wasn't the spa pedicure (not sure what else THAT involves), I got a full foot and calf massage. Polish on and all done! At which point I thought I might as well get a manicure, too.\n\nThe manicure involved heated mitts and a hand massage, and was very nice. Total cost was $37 plus tip (I gave her $10 for having to deal with my nasty feet). I had some fun conversations with other patrons, and overall a great experience. I'd go back once a day if it were in any way reasonable to do so, but this is getting placed on the once-a-month schedule for sure.\n\nThe polish from the pedicure is still holding up like a champ after a week. The manicure was pretty well shot after a couple of days, so I'll probably just stick with doing the polish at home, although I can't complain about the massage and cuticle care.\n\nAgain, I don't have other salons or spas to compare with, but it seemed like a good, basic service with a few little extras. The staff were all friendly and remembered the repeat customers who came in. They do take credit cards, and you can put the tip on the card as well; I brought cash for that as I am not used to salons taking tips on cards.\n\nThey also offer acrylics (which I don't do), gel nails (which I'd like to try), and nail art. I'm not sure if they do waxing. I am sure that it's a friendly place, that it's clean (important!), and that they made me feel relaxed even though I was beyond nervous going in.
Lincoln Bakery is yet another local bakery I've been meaning to try.  When a Google Offer came up, I took it so I would have no excuse to keep avoiding it.  The place has a nice neighborhood bakery feel; as I took in the many selections it seemed that everyone who came in was a regular.  There weren't many people when I was there (it was still relatively early) but I got the impression that at times there can be a line to the door.  \nOne thing that I didn't like was although they had many pastries to choose from, nothing was labeled.  So I had to keep asking what things were.  The cinnamon roll was okay, nothing spectacular.  But the pastries I got were very good.  I'd recommend checking it out.  I know if I'm ever in the neighborhood I will stop in for a treat myself.
Cookies aren't bad.  Haven't had a reason to buy cakes or other pastries.  Staff is friendly and it smells like heaven.
nice and clean with well organized large selection but was expensive. I was looking for some twin size thin cotton blankets easy to wash and hang dry for my dog and the prices were $14.99 of course somewere high quality items which u would have to pay new retail store price $40-50 but still overpriced. I finally found a small blanket for $7 on sale.
A great Pittsburgh diner with friendly service and good diner food. If there are any problems, the prices a bit high for diner food and, as others have said, it's extremely cramped. Otherwise, it's an enjoyable place to eat and the food is, indeed, very good.
I am very happy to be moving into a 'neighborhood' that has a line-up of decent mom-and-pop shops to find a reasonable meal when the cupboard is bare, or the energy banks are depleted for cooking. Bellevue does seem to have a small collection of decent eats at reasonable prices, and The Rusty Nail is one of that handful of good examples of neighborhood haunts.\n\nIt's touted as a 'diner' in many of the reviews, but it really is a step above your average 'diner', and is more of a cozy neighborhood gathering spot for a decent burger, or entree. I've not made it there for the breakfast, but have always been satisfied by the dinners.\n\nRusty Nail is hardly on the gourmet end of the scale. In fact, I would imagine the Sysco truck pulls up out back regularly with deliveries of food parts, from cans of sauces to frozen animal chunks. As long as those parts are assembled and doctored to make them seem a bit fresher than the typical conveyor-belt diner, all is fine. And indeed, all IS fine.\n\nSo few of our local 'diners' are up to snuff when it comes to serving up decent 'diner' fare, that I can't call Rusty Nail a diner. It's a neighborhood family restaurant. Period.\n\nBurgers, meatloaf, pot roast, fish sammiches, salads, pastas...a varied but adequate menu. Fair and decent prices. Friendly and attentive service. A cozy enough atmosphere (although I have to say AGAIN in a review of a restaurant, if you've got multiple TVs in the space, for gods sake, can ONE of them NOT be showing SPORTS coverage??) and a pleasant crowd of patrons. \n\nDuring my last visit, there was a large family gathering at the next table. A nicely polished middle-class clan, ranging in age from gramps to granddaughter. At one point, dad received a phone call on his cell...and actually stepped OUTSIDE to have his conversation. As I was leaving I had to pat him on the back and thank him for being one of the few remaining decent guys with manners!\n\nBottom line...Rusty Nail is comfortable. It's not a drive-out-of-you-way destination for dining. It is what it is. A great little neighborhood spot FOR the neighborhood. \n\nBut do bring cash. The don't take credit cards. Believe it or not, they WILL actually take a check.
I stopped by here on my way home from whole foods market. They had just paved there parking lot which can only fit 3 max cars at a time. It was not as big as the one I normally shop at in Penn Hills. They are a beer distributor and have a way hugger selection. But they serve all of penn hills so go figure.\n\nI was looking for a gluten free beer which they had four kinds including cider. The prices were crazy expensive. $35 for a 24 pack of cider. NO way!! \n\nI had to buy it though cause it was sunday at 4:30 and all the stores close at 5 so i had no choice. I should have waited but i drove all the way here to get it so I should just buy it while i'm there. Aside from the money issue this place was just ok to me.
I have had lunch at Pinos's several times probably at least 5 times. Usually I am there  for a business lunch when I am in the area. I find that we are well served, not rushed and the noise level is not too loud at lunch We have several times asked the Chef to make us some special version of his menu and we are always accommodated. To me this is excellent service. Makes you feel like coming back.\nI would have to admit that I usually order the garlic fries which are really great. I do this if I am not going back to the office or out to meet a client.\nNormally I would add a soup of the day which are always nice, and a sandwich of the day. \nI have never been disappointed and certainly would continue to conduct business lunches here. Pino's has been very reliable and dependable in all aspects.  I would make it 3 1/2 stars.
Small portions. Over priced food. Very small menu (dinner). Was OK, but disappointing overall.
Pinos offers an unhappy marriage of good food at bad prices.  The food is tasty but not transcendent.  The prices in the high $20's for most of the entrees are not justified by the quality, location, or portions.  The food is essentially slightly hipper Olive Garden fare at double the prices.\n\nFor dinner entrees you can get more for your money elsewhere.  But it's not all bad.  The atmosphere is pleasant and the service was excellent.  I had a good time and I'd happily go back for appetizers (most are $8-10).\n\nPino's is frequented by a large rambunctious flock of malbec massacring 40-50 year old women.  My friend and I were the only males there.  If cougar hunting is your sport of choice, you'll feel right at home in Pino's jungle safari!
Nothing spectacular, but I go there regularly, and generally get a cut that works fine for at least a couple of months.  They did a good job after I had a botched cut overseas (hairdressers in Japan are, understandably, not necessarily qualified to work on non-Asian hair, as they don't cut a lot of it). Parking can be tough, depending on time of day--there's a shared private lot, but it's small.
i'm not sure why this place has bad reviews. its par for thecourse for supercuts. standard cut 16.95 is a bit pricy but they always do exactly what I say. i've simple hair so it works well for me. employees are generally nice, sometimes like talking to me sometimes talk just to each other, worth three stars for sure.
Went here with a friend for his haircut. It's been a long time since I've been to a barber shop or haircut salon/store, but from what I remember this place seems completely average. The hair stylists seem nice enough and competent. The wait was a few minutes- I actually expected the wait to be longer because we came in on a Saturday. If I ever need a haircut (which I haven't gotten in maybe 5 years!), I wouldn't have a problem stopping in here- but I tend to enjoy my long shaggy mop.....
Decent neighborhood pizza can be found in morningside at eddies pizza haus. The sauce and cheese are perfect, but the crust falls short.  It has a nice texture and overall the pizza isn't greasy, but the crust lacks much flavor. Maybe a little more salt is needed in the dough to compensate? The pizza is decent enough though and merits a try, perhaps it was an off day for Eddies.
Note: Tasty has a credit card minimum of $10 and has a parking lot\n\nTasty is another standard chinese takeout place - it didn't blow my mind but overall it was good, especially considering the price. Before I continue, I will come out and say that all of the food was a little tough - the eggroll especially(As was warned) -  and the rice had some dark spots(I assume it was from the bottom of the cooking vessel).  However, I will chalk some of it up to my mistake because I thought they closed a half hour later,  than they did, and consequently ordered about 10 minutes before they closed. So, Tasty, you get a pass on the rice\n\nAnyhow, I ordered a vegetable eggroll($1.50) and general tso's tofu($8.25)(I've learned to accept my guilty pleasure). I ordered the general tso's extra spicy - it was not. Also, the tofu was in very large chunks, which has seemed to be my luck lately. I want surface area, and I don't want to have to figure out how to cut my food with chopsticks. I will say, though, that the sauce was very tasty - enough to seal the deal for a future order at this place.\n\nThe eggroll, as I said, was tough.. It tasted good, but it was tough, and small... This probably won't be in my future order, however with the $10 minimum I do need to order something else with my tofu... I hope the soup is good.\n\nThe lady behind the counter was friendly and was decent on the phone and didn't once mention that they were closing so close to when I ordered. Portion size was good, for the $10.44 it cost me, I'll definitely be able to make a lunch out of what is left.
Based on some recent reviews, it looks like the quality of food at Minutellos has slipped a little bit.  Still as I mentioned before, it's a Shadyside institution located in the basement of an apartment building.  \n\nAnyway, the main reason to come to Minutellos is for the pizza.  My cousin and I did just that the other night when we were in the area.  We did the whole 'Build Your Own Pizza' thing, ordering ours with pepperoni, green peppers, onions, and mushrooms.  Good pizza even if the place is beginning to look a little dated.
Minutello's is going out of business. Last day of operation is Sunday, February 17, 2013.
Reasons:\n\n1. LOCATION and setting: Highland Park is simply lovely - makes you feel as if you are in a small English town, where time has stood still. The art and small tables inside and outside are charming.\n2. Socially Responsible:Fair trade and international array of coffee.\n3. Fresh Meat:  Local pasture raised meat/ local produce in their tasty panini's.\n4. Nice crowd and staff.
I've read countless 5-star reviews of this coffee shop and I'm sorry, but I don't wholly agree with, well, everyone else; so, here's my slightly alternative take on the cafe.  I'm aware, like many reviewers on this site, that not every place is aiming for me as the target customer; but even still, there's no way this is a five star coffee shop. Yes, the coffee is good and if I happen to be lost in highland park someday on foot, I'm sure I'd stop in to get it again.  But the place itself was a turn off, despite the interesting people that it attracts.  Glossy refinished exposed wood beams, fake grape vines over the windows, and odd light fixtures create a tacky atmosphere I can't overlook or sit in.  I think this is a great coffee shop if you happen to own a house in highland park, but for me it's going to be voluto or espresso a mano from now on - it's just not worth the drive.
I'll preface this by reminding anyone who reads my reviews that 3 stars is a good review for me--it means it's good, but I'm not going to go out of my way for it.  \n\nEnrico's Tazza D'oro Cafe is definitely very good--I love the location in Highland Park, and the early morning crowd seemed pretty nice and very eclectic.  We even ran in to a friend while we were there and had a nice chat.  \n\nMy girlfriend and I ordered lattes which were excellent--the space was overall very nice inside and while the selection of pastries was a bit thin I would say the ones they had looked good.  I do wish they had more outdoor seating, though.  It's tough to make the \"I'm a fan\" list for coffee houses.  I'll try it again and may change my review in the future.  \n\nWhile I\"m on the note of Highland Park, I want to join the chorus of people who are dismayed by the recent hit and run involving the two bikers in Highland Park.  Accidents (no matter how horrible) do happen, and as such I'm not as angry about the actual accident;  but to just drive away and leave people severely injured by the side of the road is pretty wretched behavior.  At this point, i only hope that if you are the person who did this, you will at least dedicate the rest of your life to doing good to balance your to-date lousy behavior.\n\nIt's never too late.
I think the lattes have improved since my last review and their soy cappuccinos are the best I've ever had, in fact, I never even cared for them until trying Tazza D'oro's. I still hold their teas in high regard. However, the food here sucks. They've always had a limited sandwich menu, but at some point even that has been reduced to three choices. I am a sucker for a good veggie sandwich, especially in combination with caffeine. Even though Enrico's is an easy walk from my home, I find myself either walking further or driving elsewhere for the caffeinated lunch experience. I guess they are trying to keep focus on the brews, but I don't think it's that hard to do both; I mean the staff seems highly competent, they have a kitchen and sandwiches are pretty simple recipes to follow and learn. With a new lunch joint in the 'hood (Park Bruges), why not expand lunch options rather than downgrade to the point of forfeiting without even the slightest struggle?
Still one of the best places to get soy capps, but they no longer have an extensive tea list. What's left is not a bad selection, but there are dramatically less choices, so it's no longer where I would go to sample new varieties of tea. Sandwich menu is even more severely limited and it seems that pretty much all the food is provided by U.S. Foods, or the like; nothing is local. It'd be way cool if they would source their pastries and bread locally. Until then, it is simply a great place to get coffee and espresso, with nice vibes and pleasant service.
So I went on a marathon 2 hour bike ride right before heading to Enrico's for the first time and on my last mile all I could think was \"iced caffe mocha, iced caffe mocha\" over and over again.  Did I mention that I forgot my water bottle on my ride too?  I was a desperate woman at the end of that one.\n\nSo I got home aired myself out and drove myself to Enrico's since a previous yelper mentioned she had the best iced caffe mocha there.  There was easy street parking right out front and I really liked that it was nestled in the middle of a neighborhood and not a loud crowded street.  Tables are large enough for good work space and folks had their laptops out inside enjoying the free wifi while the tables outside were filled with friends.\n\nSo why the 3 stars?  Well the iced caffe mocha was a bit subpar.  The syrup was all at the bottom leaving my first couple sips very watery.  Could have been a better mix.  Would I give this another try?  Sure but I definitely will ask for a nice hard shake of my iced caffe mocha before taking a swig.\n\nThe coffee place at the Walnut Mall in Shadyside is still my favorite for the iced coffee of the year award.  Try the iced OR blended ghiradelli mocha when you are shopping Shady-style - AWESOME!
We ordered a double espresso which looked more like a single shot. Cozy coffeeshop with an ample amount of seating.\n\nThere were different types of coffee available for purchase to drink there and beans to take home.\n\nCute neighborhood coffeeshop type feel.
went in as a guest of a friend of mine who is a member there... nice atmosphere.  LOT of oldddd folks and they seem to market themselves as \"Silver Fitness\" sort of fitness center... (this may be a turn-off for some younger people.)\nthey had a lot of machines and exercise gear ... 2 pools and tan beds/etc /etc.  \ni'd probably prefer personally to work out somewhere with a younger crowd.
Delicious wings - sometimes a bit too deep fried for my taste, but really tasty flavors and spices. We went for all-you-can-eat wings night but sadly I could barely finish my first dozen. Beer selection is much improved since  Turadg A.'s post; they have about 30 or so available to choose from.
Pretty good bar food.  It's conveniently located and a fun atmosphere.
Wednesday is Wing night, i.e., eat your face off night. For ~ $9 you can eat unlimited wings (with your choice of various sauces) for several hours. If you can, top it off with a brownie - they're quite good.\n\nI've mostly had the wings at Blues & I like all of the sauces, but the burgers are good, as well. Whatever you do, make sure to get the sweet potato fries & tip your waitress! (Especially if her name is Meg).
Wing night wednesdays! 50 cent price wings and $1 beer at William Penn on Tuesdays and my body is not hurting too badly the next day, Buffalo Blues for all you can eat wings. There are a ton of sauces to pair with these wings. They bring them out 5 at a time so plan on ordering your next selection when your wings come out because they take quite a bit of time to come. I don't think I have ever eaten the other food here except for the wings because they are pretty good. The only downside to this place is that service is really really slow.
The best thing about Buffalo Blues revolves around Sundays during football season. For me, personally, it's one of the best places to catch an NFL game...especially if you're not a Steelers fan. On any given Sunday, you'll find fans of just about every team in the NFL taking in a game, so the atmosphere is a positive one. Seating is the only issue. Get there early or you might end up standing to see your particular game, as seating can be a premium by the time the games begin. Luckily, the TV's (there are lots of them) are all labeled with the day's matchups, so finding the game you're looking for isn't a problem.\n\nThe draft beer selection usually has something for everyone, from local craft brews by East End Brewing, to seasonals and your simpler standards (hello, PBR), so if you're a beer person, you won't be disappointed.\n\nAs far as service goes, it's hit-or-miss. I've had mostly great service at the bar, but I've also had average to below average service at tables. During bigger sporting events - primarily Steelers games - the service can be even more iffy due to the sheer volume of people in the bar area.\n\nOverall, I have to rate the food as average. I LOVE their boneless wings, and their wing sauces are all very excellent. Their pulled pork is really tender and delicious, as well, but most of their sandwiches and burgers are simply average. The fries can be either really good, or too soggy and greasy. I think the inconsistency in the quality of the cooking is the main issue. The menu reads really well, which raises your expectations, but sometimes the execution will leave you a little disappointed. It's never horrible, but you'll rarely be blown away by your meal.\n\nIn the end, I'm giving Buffalo Blues a higher rating based on the experience during sporting events, which, let's face it, is the real draw of a \"sports bar.\" As far as sports bars go, it's my favorite place to catch a game. They always get a good crowd for games (whether Sundays during the NFL season, Saturdays during big college games, or for Pens games), and if you stick to the wings and beer, odds are your experience will be great. There's a good chance that you can go in and find fans of your team if you're an out-of-towner looking for a game, and the crowd is much more accepting, friendly, and relaxed than the crowds I've experience in other sports bars in town. Most of my average experiences revolved around non-game times when you try to get a more traditional meal and realize that there are just better options in Shadyside for lunch and dinner.
So, I went to Buffalo Blues tonight for the second time (not the second time tonight, the second time in my life) for dinner and some drinks, and to sum up my experience in a few words, both times it was about what I expected.  Just a fine sports bar - no more, no less.\n\nI'll start with the drinks.  They have a good draft selection, and supposedly they've got a nice bottle list too, though I didn't have a look at it, so I can't judge; and the Happy Hour special compliments it well ($1 off all drinks 5PM-7PM).   Plus they have East End drafts at $3/glass all the time, though they were out of Big Hop (the only East End choice they have) when I was there (I don't know if this is a regular occurrence, but if it is, they better do something about it).  The bartenders were friendly and quick to serve, qualities that carried over to the food service as well.\n\nThe menu has a pretty good selection of pub-y and Southwestern-themed foods from which I picked the black bean and corn quesadilla.  Although at the end I was running low on guacamole (which is $1 extra for a small cup) and sour cream, this is a small quibble.  The meal overall  was good, and since I got it with the happy hour special, I can't complain.  One thing I will mention is that there aren't too many vegetarian choices on the menu (I'm not vegetarian, but I try not to eat too much meat, so I notice these things), so if you're a vegetarian, I would try to look up the menu beforehand just to be sure there's something for you.\n\nI know I haven't said much negative about Buffalo Blues in this review, yet I'm still giving it only three stars.  This is the kind of place that makes me appreciate the \"word versions\" of the ratings that Yelp gives us.  \"A-OK,\" which, if you didn't know, is how Yelp describes three-star reviews, is exactly how I would describe Buffalo Blues.  The comparison I keep going to in my head is Die Hard 2.  It's not nearly as good as its predecessor, but it's still something I'm fine with popping in every once in a while when there's nothing better to watch.\n\nTo sum it up - I'm not a big sports guy.  Buffalo Blues, though it is a sports bar, is not the place that would sway me to go to watch a game there with my friends (I'll still say that some kind of playoff game of the Steelers-Ravens I watched at Big Jim's was one of the best sports-watching experiences of my life).  And, judging it as a sports bar, it didn't do anything to justify my giving it anything but \"just fine.\"  But I'm sure I'll go back there for happy hour again sometime.
Their food is okay and beer selection is diverse and good. \n\nThe problem i have with the place is that Buffalo Bills fans congregate here and cheer on every mediocre play their football team makes, (or almost makes) so it's like watching the Superbowl except it's a losing record team stopping a team on third down.
I have mixed feelings about this place.  I'll say up front: I only ever go there on Sundays for football, and I would never go there for any other reason.  It is the only bar I know of in the city where you can reliably find every NFL game televised and enjoy your Sunday if you're not a Steelers fan.  Pretty much every team is represented by the crowd on Sundays, with a disproportional number of Bills and Redskins fans.  The crowd is generally friendly, with many of the same faces from week to week.\n\nThey tend to have a wide selection of beers that rotates pretty regularly, but wide selection doesn't always mean good selection.  That said, sometimes they get some really great beers that you wouldn't expect to find at a sports bar.  Whatever you do, don't order a bloody Mary, they're atrociously bad.  The staff is almost universally friendly, with the exception of one barback who seems to always be in a bad mood and rude to customers (he often takes over as bartender later in the day on Sundays).  That said, the wait staff don't seem to know much about the food or beers that are offered, often mis-characterizing new beers that are on tap or giving wrong information about things on the menu.\n\nThe food is mediocre and over-priced.  When two of us go for one game on a Sunday, drink 3-4 beers each and each order an entr\u00e9e, we generally end up with a tab in the $80-90 range, depending on what we're drinking that day.  In a city that is almost universally accommodating to vegetarians, this place is most decidedly not.  They have a veggie burger which is actually pretty good, but it's the only decent thing on the menu for a vegetarian to eat (there is also a grilled cheese sandwich and a veggie sandwich, both of which are bland to the point of tasteless.  It's like eating plain bread).  They have 4 entr\u00e9e salads, and every one of them has meat as a defining ingredient.  They don't even have beans so you could have decent veggie nachos.  I know, it's a sports bar, but I don't want to eat the same veggie burger every Sunday for 17 weeks.  It gets old.  Fast.\n\nUpshot?  In the absence of a new sports bar opening up, we'll be back next season, but not before then.
I would take advantage of All you can eat wings on Wednesday. \n\nWe went on a regular oll Sunday night and even though the wings were tasty, my frugal self would've rather had AYCE. We tried a variety of sauces (we ordered 20 wings and every 5 can be a different flavor) The Buffalo Blues sauce was ok. It was just their signature bbq sauce. WE also tried garlic parm, honey teriyaki & gold rush. All were ok.\n\n The boozy buffalo is a good drink. It consist of smirnoff orange, tanquery, jose cuervo, captain, triple sec, OJ, fresh squeezed lemon and a splash of Coke. I seriously felt fabulous after one. It's served in a mason jar. ($12)\n\nLauren was a nice server even though the table in front of us put her through some bs-- they ate all of their food then complained to the server and asked for the manager complaining that what they got it wasn't what they ordered... no idea why they waited until every scrap of food was gone to complain but you know, you'll have that. kudos to Lauren for keeping a smile on her face.
This is my go-to place for curing a hangover. I don't know what it is about Chinese buffets the day after a long night of round after round, but it does the trick. I also like to come here before I go grocery shopping at the nearby Trader Joe's because everybody knows it's a bad idea to go shopping for food stuff on an empty stomach.\n\nAll of my favorites are here, veggie lo mien, string beans, mac 'n cheese, crab rangoon, hot & sour soup, I haven't seen dan bing (egg pancakes) in awhile but when they have them, they are out of this world with some peanut sauce. Another thing I miss is creamed spinach... I have yet to see this dish on a Pittsburgh buffet but if you go outside of the city it is a staple among Chines buffets.\n\nAnother star got knocked off for the lack of fresh fruit on the dessert table. Canned pineapple and mandarin oranges will always carry that metallic taste to them that is just no comparison to having the real thing.
The food here is good but it is not exceptional. \n\n I've been to this restaurant occasionally for a couple years and the menu hasn't changed at all. There is the typical Asian fare such as General Tso's, fried rice, noodles, stuffed shrimp and dumplings. There is also American macaroni and cheese, home fries and ham. \n\nWhen I go to China Garden, I always request a carry out container as I find it nauseating to sit in the dining area and see other patrons pile their plates with astonishing heaps of food. One thing for sure is that China Garden gets plenty of customers.\n\nDefinitely come here for a reasonably priced buffet!
Just ate there, right next to GameStop & Google, has 3 small booths, & ordered the pepper steak w/ onion ($10.95). Food is fast fresh & hot, but mine had too much onion & not enough steak. At the end of the meal I was just eating onions with rice, though I hear this is healthy for you. Counter lady was cordial, but didn't reply when customers told her, \"Have a nice day\" #awkward. I know that English isn't her first language but she needs to catch on that people are wishing her well. Wasn't stuffed full either despite having eaten a large plate (I usually get this feeling eating Asian). This is basically a nice place to go for lunch that won't ruin your appetite for dinner. (Side note: Food is very clean. Brushed my teeth an hour before w/ Tom's of Maine fluoride-free peppermint & still had minty fresh breath an hour after eating)
I think 2 or 3 stars is accurate for this joint... The chicken is quality meat and its lightly saut\u00e9ed but the sauce is to blah. It's a nice place to sit down and have Chinese food if you have no other local options.  \n\nIt's my last resort for Chinese food in the area. Prices are absurd!!!
I knew I needed new tires and an alignment so I ordered the tires ahead so I could be in-and-out as quickly as possible to make it to class. Showed up noone had ordered the tires but they said they'd split the difference of a different brand. I was a little irritated but agreed and thought this was going to be a bad decision coming here (I'm from out of town); however, I was pleasantly surprised by the service. The mechanics noticed the car's bushings were what was causing the problems it took awhile and they offered a little extra discount which was much appreciated. Overall, it took 2 and 1/2 hours, had front aligned, bushings replaced, two new tires, and an oil change....cost $606. So, I still believe it was a little pricey but the guys were great and I can definitely note an overall difference in my car.
Good for Altar bar. But they didn't have fries....
Great club/bar/lounge/venue. Great mix of people and music with decent bartenders and good prices on beer.
I love hardware stores.  LOVE.  But this Home Depot has disappointed me.  The location is great, but the floor staff is unhelpful.\n\nTonight was a great example of I don't like the floor staff.  My vacuum stopped picking up anything but the largest pieces of dust.  After opening her up, I quickly realized I needed a new belt.  It was pouring down rain, but I put on my rainboots, grabbed an umbrella, and hoofed it over to ye ole Home Depot.  I had to stand over the shoulders of five--yep, I counted five--employees in appliances for a full minute before one of them would help me.\n\nAfter someone directed me to the vacuum parts, I had two male employees stop by to see if I needed help as I searched for the correct belt.  I had the vacuum's name and number written down, as well as the belt style, and had the actual busted belt with me.  Yet, each of these men acted like I was some stupid girl.  \"Did you unplug the vacuum before you removed the old belt?\" one asked me.  Duh.  I'm not an idiot.  The other later asked, \"Do you always wear bright yellow rainboots when you're doing repairs?\" and snickered.  Look, all I said to both gentlemen was \"I'm just looking for the correct style number.  But thanks.\"\n\nI received similar treatment I stopped by to buy a new set of bits for my drill.  \"You know drills come in more than one kind, right?\" I was asked.  And when I needed a new bag of dirt of my cacti, I was question about why I wanted succulent dirt over potting soil.  Every time a male employee here approaches me, I'm questioned or given unsolicited advice in a snotty way.\n\nThis girl may wear bright yellow rainboots, but I am also the Norm Abram of my family.  AKA I'm pretty handy.  Oh, and the vacuum works perfectly now.\n\nShout out goes to the check out attendants, who were SUPER polite.  Nice work, ladies.
This was my first time to this Home Depot.  Very impressed with the customer service here.  We were redoing a bathroom and went in for more tiles.  They were out of them.  However, a staff member helped us use other tile and decorative pieces to compliment the tile we already had, instead of schlepping all the way to Monroeville to pick up the tile up were originally looking for.  We were very happy with the result!
This is a pretty good HD. It is somewhat smaller than the ones in Ross Park and Monroeville, but they seem to stock most of the same items. Occasionally I do need to go to Monroeville to find specific items, however. With a 1920s house, I spend quite a bit of time here for getting materials for repairs.\n\nCustomer service is about average. Some people are very helpful, others not so much. In general, they seem to be better than the Lowes at the Waterfront. At least HD people know where items are in the store. I can't tell you how many times I've received completely different (and wrong) answers to finding stuff at Lowes.\n\nI would prefer a small hardware store (such as an Ace) closer to me for things like nuts, bolts, and screws. Ace seems to have a better selection than HD does for hard-to-find items. HD has most of the basics covered, however, and probably a little cheaper.\n\nI generally avoid their paint section except for equipment. I prefer the service at a Sherwin-Williams or Masterwork Paint store. \n\nWe've had decent luck with their garden department. We've had to return a few plants that died the day after we planted them, but they have never given us any problems with returns. \n\nIt's a big-box home improvement store, for better or worse. It's a convenient location with a decent selection. 'Nuff said.
Most of the home depots i've seen are the same and that includes this one. aisles full of hardware supplies, tools, bathroom accessories and even a small nursery for gardening. \n\nMy favorite section is the tool section seeing that I'm a DIY-er. (Do it yourself) if you didn't already know that. I enjoy building, maintaining and fixing things in my own home as opposed to hiring a contractor and paying a boat load. I'm best known at the Home Depot in monroeville. I come in there so often a lot of the employees know me just by my dog. Yes my dog, who i have brought into this store several times. They allow pets i'm assuming because i've never been asked to leave and I've seen others with their pets as well. \n\nThat's the best part about the store is the animal policy and the fact that they offer enough supplies for you to practically build a house. Some things are cost efficient while others are kinda breaking the bank. There not as modern as lowes but they have alot of the same products. I recently built my own in home bar. t's 8 by 2, a long bar that i (a girl) built by hand. I'm very proud of the work i did. I installed lights and polished it and it has a resin top with ceramic tiles beneath it. It's a real beauty and i got all the supplies at home depot. Cost me about $600 to make but i put it together in 2 months so that's a plus. \n\nBut yea if your in need of some nice plants to go in the kitchen or patio OR you just want to spruce up a few things around the house, then this Mega home repair store is where you ought to be. Between this and lowes its not like you have a choice.
I had some pizza from Pizza Parma today during a lunch meeting at work.  A colleague brought it in, so I didn't pay for it and can't comment on the price.  I had a few slices of the pepperoni pizza and found them to be resoundingly average.  Nothing special, nothing especially good or bad.  Crust, sauce, cheese, pepperoni, fin.  It was a little greasy, and quite cheesy as well.  I was starving so I really enjoyed it, but I think overall the pizza is pretty generic.  Still, for a late night slice or if you live nearby and just need to pick up a quick pizza for dinner, I'd say go for it.  Just don't have very high expectations.
Pizza Parma has many of the characteristics I like in a pizza joint. \n1) They deliver when they say they will, \n2) Diverse menu and toppings, \n3) Coupons, \n4) Online ordering, and \n5) Take credit cards. \n\nI think Pizza Parma shines with their specialty pizzas. Artichoke, Buffalo Chicken, Spinach & Feta, and Greek pies are all delicious. I've also had some of their pasta dishes, and I can't complain. It's nice to have something other than pizza delivered; the portions are huge, and they come with bread and a salad. Pizza Parma fails on wings, though. The texture is unappealing (aka, flappy chicken skin-- yuk!), and the sauces lack depth. Desserts are also not worth the buy.
I like the pizza and the selection of toppings.  They are reliable.  Great option for take out food.
Three stars is super accurate for this place. We decided to do take out from here after walking by it a hundred times after the gym and hearing radio commercials about it from that god forsaken BUBBA SHOW (does that plug raise anyone else's blood pressure??) Our order was ready in 15 minutes (speedy!) and we got a large 1 topping pizza for ~$8 and a side of fries. All together like $13 for three people, which is pretty good. As for the pizza, the crust was crispy and not too thick or thin, and the sauce was sweet, not seasoned. I prefer a more herby sauce myself, so I wasn't wowed by it. The fries were a bit soggy, but tasty. Overall, if I were in a pinch I'd order from here no problem but it's not a place I'd set out to order from because I love it.
Pizza Parma delivers through GrubHub, which is the primary reason I ordered sandwiches from them. BBQ chicken was ok. The bread is a little more on the burnt than toasted side, leading it to be dry. The value is good. The 20\" sandwich was about $11.
Great friendly service and my order was done fast, which was amazing since I was a walk-in. Lots of toppings piled high but I wish there was more cheese. They did have small bottles of vanilla Coke, which is a rare find these days.
Some friends and I ordered a couple of pizzas for delivery from here tonight.  We'd bought a few growlers of hard cider from a local establishment, and we were looking for some fuel to help us soak up the booze.  My friend suggested getting pizza from here, and I didn't object, since I'd never had pizza from here before, and I'd heard the pizza from here was consistently decent.\n\nThe pizza showed up about 45 min. after we ordered it, right about at the time estimated, so no complaints there.  As for the pizza itself, it was solidly A-OK--nothing special, but nothing horrible, either.  It was a bit on the greasy side, and I could tell from pulling the first piece away from the pie that the crust wasn't crispy.  Biting into my first slice of pepperoni pizza confirmed my suspicions about the floppiness of the crust.  As for the flavor, it was your standard pizza flavor--again, nothing special, but nothing horrible, either.  It was more greasy than I'd like, but not to the point where I felt it necessary to dab off the grease with a napkin (though I was tempted to do so).\n\nAs the bottom line, the pizza was fine for our purposes (to soak up alcohol). It was better than Vocelli's, and about on par with Papa John's.  I wouldn't go out of my way to order from here again, but I wouldn't object to it, either.
This place is bright and clean and I've seen staff taking care of machines every time I've been there (different times/different days) so I imagine it's well maintained in general.  Love that there are bus stops directly in front of and across the street AND that this is a 24-hour place.  I usually spend $7.50 every 2 weeks* though I could probably get away with using the single load machines and a few minutes less in the dryer.  I especially appreciate the good spin cycle from these washers as that means less time it has to be in the dryer!\n\nAround here, you can walk around the 'hood while waiting for your cycle to finish (pizza place, convenience store, coffee/ice cream shops next door, Border's bookstore down the block, more shops on Ellsworth nearby)\n\n*I'm a female doing laundry for 1 so it takes a while to have enough for separate whites/color load.  I've also been to The Laundry Factory a few blocks away and I prefer Econowash over The Laundry Factory.
So, unfortunately I've had to outsource my laundry-doing in the last couple of weeks because the dryer in my building has broken down and my not-so-prudent landlord hasn't been helpful at all in repairs (ugh!!). Twice in the last two weeks, I've washed loads of laundry late at night and discovered my dryer hasn't worked. It's really great to know that this place is right down the street and is open 24/7, especially when the Laundry Factory down the street closes at about 9pm (which in general I much prefer to this place). But for convenience-sake, I appreciate this place. On the cons list, it's not incredibly clean and I have used dryers that simply don't work here.
Everybody, chill out.  This is a trendy place to shop, yes, but it also has better prices on some things than Giant Eagle or Trader Joe's (Gasp!).  I split my time between Here, Giant Eagle and Trader Joe's pretty evenly, depending on what specialty items I might need.\n\nOh yeah, don't drive here.  Walk, ride your bike or take the bus.  If you're really smart, you'll avoid the headache and park on one of the many adjacent side streets.
3.5 stars, actually. Would be 4 but I had to knock off half a star because of the parking situation. The lot sucks, I used to work at Whole Foods and I can not recall how many times I almost got hit by a car when retrieving carts. I am one of the lucky ones, I know of a few people who weren't so lucky. \n\nI'm a huge fan of the salad and hot bar - not a fan of the price though. To be fair, I can only blame myself for ending up with an $11 salad (but everything is so good and actually fresh I can't stop myself from piling it on). The prepared sandwich's are pretty awesome too and if you go after 9p, they are buy 1 get 1. \n\nI now work with a lot of children on special diets and I have no problem finding lots of GFCF treats for them here. \n\nGroceries range from expensive to moderate depending on the brand. The WFM's 365 line is an excellent bargain. \n\nThe bakery is full of tasty treats. You've gotta try the pumpkin pumpkin pie, though I believe it is only available around the holidays. \n\nThe whole store gets crazy busy on and around holidays.
Short and sweet, and as a Haiku.\n\nParking is awful\nNo wine, but that's PA's fault\nBest organic food
NO WI-FI.  Just FYI.  \n\nWhen I lived in Cleveland and my first (truly terrible) apartment had no wi-fi Whole Foods was my second home...I would buy a little sampler of buffet foods and salads, a coffee, maybe a vegan cookie, and park myself at a booth for an hour (or more, let's be real).  After I taught a yoga class.  I know, I know, I'm such a white liberal yuppie, it's painful.\n\nAnyway, so when the internet went out at my Pittsburgh home I trotted off to Whole Foods, bought some food and a coffee...and asked about the wi-fi.  \"We have it,\" said Cashier #1.  \"It's probably just under \"Whole Foods.\"\"  \"We have it,\" said Cashier #2, \"but I don't know the password - ask customer service.\"  \"We don't have it,\" said Customer Service, \"go to Starbucks.\"\n\nBelieve it or not, Starbucks is letting me drink my coffee & eat my vegan cookie and didn't make me buy anything.\n\nNO WI-FI.  Otherwise, this Whole Foods is pretty good.
This store is great - it's got all of the fresh specialty items we need for cooking great weekend meals for friends, but isn't a vast, overpowering warehouse. Items are well organized, and easy to find. As others' state, it ain't cheap! \n\nOne way we lowered our Whole Foods bill was to go for their 365 in-house brand, which is typically priced at the same pricepoint as similar items in the regular chain grocery stores. We don't use Whole Foods for all of our supermarket needs, just the specialty items, great produce, and seafood.\n\nI docked two stars for absolutely terrible parking - yep. I know that's harsh, but every time we come here, we need to factor in another 10-15 minutes to get a parking spot and be able to leave safely (there are always cars behind us looking for a spot when we are trying to leave, and so we often can't just pull out of the space and leave quickly...) Even being careful, we have almost been hit multiple times by people losing their cool with the terrible parking.\n\nThat being said, we will continue to come here to stock our home when we plan to entertain at home.
This store is pretty good. Yes it is fairly expensive but you can get quite a few items that are difficult if not impossible to find at other stores. They have a nice meat department with quite a few good naturally raised products, particularly beef. We've been very happy with their produce, which we find noticeably better than Trader Joe.\n\nI wish it was bigger so there was a larger selection and a larger prepared food selection (we are used to the larger stores in Chicago). Also wish there was a liquor department but I'll probably have to run for state office for that. Frankly the worst part is often parking. Don't know what causes everyone to behave badly in their lot (myself included) but man it can be a mess. \n\nAnyway we'll keep going at least for meats and produce.
I love everything that Whole Foods offers, but I can't stand the experience of going there. The parking lot is a mess of aggressive drivers acting like the extra 50 feet of walking will negatively affect the environment more than their driving around the parking lot until a better space opens up. Once you get a space and finally get inside, the experience mirrors that of the parking lot. Everyone is in each others' way and trying to be the first one to find the best organic orange or grab the last package vegan general tso's in the store.\n\nTo be fair, though, the experience is still 100 times better than going to the Market District a few blocks down the same street. Similar in-store and in-lot experience, but with a better and higher-quality selection. The staff is always really nice and super helpful, and their trays of fruit and veggies are excellent. We've ordered them countless times for parties and have never been let down. Pricey, but excellent quality. The prepared foods are delicious, and their prepackaged prepared foods are also really good...but like nearly everything else in Whole Foods, a little pricey. For example, their yummy tomato bisque is $7. Hardly cheap enough for a quick lunch, but it is yummy. Their baked goods are delicious as well. We're constantly picking up bread from there (and the occasional doughnut), and we're never disappointed.\n\nTheir meats and seafoods departments are also excellent. They have a great variety and are always helpful in answering any questions that I've had (although we still opt for our meats from DJ's). Of course, if you're at Whole Foods your'e likely there for the organic options, and as to be expected, you're not going to find a better selection anywhere else. More unique, perhaps, but their inventory just won't be matched any time soon for those foods. Surprisingly, third-party & prepackaged pricing is actually on-par with Giant Eagle, so whenever we're looking for those types of items (milk/eggs/pastas, etc.), we always opt for Whole Foods.
So..... when I think about shopping at Whole Foods, I always create an alternate universe where I think I would be able to shop here. I think: if I made at least twice the amount of money I currently do, I would be able to be a member of the club and shop here. .... but I don't. Thus, I only stop in here on very special occasions when I 1. can withstand the rage I feel when I pull into this parking lot; and 2. I want to either eat at the buffet or buy a very specific item. I would definitely recommend that others stop in sometime to get some food at the buffet. The quality of everything is pretty incredible (though of course it's typically really expensive).
My expectations for Whole Foods Market had been established as was growing up in the DMV (D.C., MD, VA) area. Thus, very fresh produce, high-quality meats, diverse cheeses, expansive bulk section, novel food items, exceptional food bars, and excellent customer service were essentially a given. On the other hand, I also expected parking difficulties, even at stores with multi-story garages.\n\nThe Whole Foods Market in Pittsburgh is not much different from those in the DMV area. However, the parking is horrendous! Really, a medium-size private parking lot for the only Whole Foods Market in the Pittsburgh area right along a congested major road? Let me say that Whole Foods Markets in D.C. are also close to major roads, but they at least have underground or aboveground garages and fairly decent road infrastructure to accommodate for the influx and outflux of shoppers. I would love if the Pittsburgh store can build a garage of some sort (I'm not counting the garage next to the Starbucks and Walgreens) with smooth entry and exit so as to prevent a mini-gridlock along Centre Avenue.\n\nParking situation aside, the Pittsburgh store does live up to my expectations established from the DMV stores. You will rarely find a bad apple (no pun intended), and the store usually keeps shelves stocked (except when there is a major sale or promotion going on). Now, if only its prices and my budget could meet halfway so I could frequent this store more--via bike or my own two feet.
I will start by saying this review is for the hot bar and I must of gone at an off hour for the hot bar and by that I mean during the dinner rush before they replenished it. I would say everything I got from the salad bar to the hot bar was good apart from they had run out of soup/special of the day and the chicken was beyond dry, the time I spent in the dessert was a wet oasis compared to the chicken. I just feel that for the price I paid it was not worth it. I have been to a smaller whole foods with a better hot bar and to the one in New York City and remember it being great. I only give this one 3 stars because the Mac n cheese and vegan tofu loaf was rather good. But I must repeat myself about the price. For what I got it's way to much. It's hard to justify paying that much when I could make it for 1/5th the price at home. Now I know I don't have to cook or clean and that's the point of eating out but I could also go to trader joes get a few frozen meals and eat for over a day for the price of one hot bar meal from whole foods.
Jimmy Tsang's Chinese Restaurant is one of the old \"traditional\" Pittsburgh restaurants, a place you remember as always \"being there.\"  My parents feel the same way about it.  It is a good, if unspectacular place with reliable, tasty fare like honey chicken, Chinese flank steak, and authentic eggrolls.  \n\nI don't normally go for the spicy fare, indeed I prefer the plainer dishes like chicken with vegetables, but they have one item on the menu that I've always wanted to try--Sau La Gi, which is stir-fried hot spicy chicken, onions, green onions & fresh bean sprouts.  Perhaps I've never noticed, but I don't recall seeing it anywhere else.  It was good, but Hoo-Boy did I have to pace myself while eating it.  And have plenty of water nearby!  Sau La Gi was worth trying once, but it really wasn't to my tastes and I doubt I'll have it again.\n\nMy friend Maryann tried  Ching Za Gai (spicy also) which is roasted crispy chicken served with tangy vinaigrette sauce.  I sampled it and perhaps I will order that for myself next time.  I'd like to cook a milder version of it myself at home.  \n\nMore to my tastes however are the Garden Chicken, Chicken with Broccoli, or Beef with Pea Pods.  Seafood dishes include Sweet and Sour Shrimp and  Sauteed Shrimp Szechaun Style.  Yeah, I'm a little unimaginative when it comes to Chinese food, but I know what I like and if a place can do the basics right, it's okay in my book!\n\nJimmy Tsang's also has a convenient and inexpensive lunch menu.  The place also does Korean Barbecue and you can book a private dining room for you and your special someone with a $100 deposit.
Went there last night with 8 peeople. There was another 14 people party.\n\nThe food was good -- not great but good. We waited 45 minutes for the first dish to arrive and that only because we sent one of our folk to see what was going on. \n\nThey did bring drinks and tea promptly.
Yep, closed!  My dad and I were gonna come here dinner last night.  He called me and told me to meet him at China Palace instead.  \n\nSo long Jummy Tsang's!  You were one of the last of the old time Chinese joints.
Meh.  Seriously?  Mediterranean?  What?  Sorry, but just because you serve scallops on babah ganoush doesn't make your restaurant Mediterranean.\n\nThis was kind of a disappointment, if you couldn't tell by my sarcastic tone.  The food was good, and I had a great time, but the food lacked the final eyebrow raising component that you come to expect with the bill that follows.\n\nThat said, the wine list was good and the prices were reasonable relative to the food.  Get the cheese course for dessert and you'll go home happy.
Very tasty food and drinks! Its a little pricey, but worth it if you want something better than a typical chain.
The interior is very nice. The food is a hit or miss. We went for brunch today. You can select a drink (alcoholic or non), an appetizer, and a brunch entree for the price of $22. The appetizers we had (pollenta and squash&chestnut soup) were very good. The entrees, on the other hand, left a lot to be desired. We got the mushroom omelet and jumbo lump crab and tomato omelet. The omelet was very bland. It did not have much flavor and needed seasoning and more ingredients than just eggs. Basically, I have had better omelets at some Denny's. My drink mimosa was just OK. My girlfriend's blood mary was delicious, though -- uniquely spicy. \n\nI have been to Casbah 4 times, last time being for brunch today. The first time, it was good, worthy of 4 stars. It gradually went down to 3 stars. The wine selection is good. But the food is definitely hit or miss. Once I had a halibut that smelled like the ocean. It was not well cooked or fresh, or something. Consistency is the key in a nice restaurant; Casbah leaves much to be desired in this regard.
I have to agree with the \"hit or miss\" reviewers about Casbah, at least when it comes to the food. I came here for brunch last weekend with a big group. They were very accomodating to us throughout the reservation process and the brunch, which was good. And our waiter, Daniel, was great. \n\nThe previous reviewer who said the Bloody Mary is the best drink was spot-on. It had a great spice and was the only drink that seemed like it had any alcohol in it at all. The mimosa and sangria were very \"eh.\" \n\nI loved my smoked salmon appetizer (and that did seem to be the hit at the table), but entrees around the table left people disappointed. The goat cheese and mushroom omelette could have had a heckuva lot more goat cheese and mushrooms, and my scallop/sausage/grits/egg dish just had way too much going on. The grits were actually fabulous, but the scallops were overcooked and got lost next to the scrambled eggs (?) and sage sausage crumbles. \n\nIf I lived in Pittsburgh, I could see myself coming back here for wine and appetizers, but I'm not sure I would make it a regular brunch or dinner spot.
My husband and I went to Casbah to celebrate my birthday one evening.  We were seated on the patio which was fine before a party of 20 was seated with a 1 year old who was banging his silverware on the table all night.  So much for romantic!  Ever hear of a babysitter?  Anyway, ambience aside, let's get to the food which overall I would give a C+.  We started with the veal and pork meatballs which were the highlight of the meal.  The perfect blend of sweet (fresh tomato sauce) and spicy -- the meatballs had a nice tang, and the polenta was delicious albeit there wasn't much of it there.  We each then had the heirloom tomato salad which was tasteless.  I grow heirlooms and know the intense and wonderful flavor they should have. These tasted like a grocery store tomato bought in December.  Very disappointing.  I opted for the cavatelli entree which was not prepared as described on the menu.  It was swimming in tomato sauce and overall was very bland.  Another disappointment.  My husband had the pork chop which wasn't bad but certainly didn't leave us wanting to return here for the food.  All this said, the service was professional, we enjoyed the drinks (he had the sangria and I their house cosmopolitan) and had a lovely bottle of wine.  I might return here for happy hour but it was not the right choice for a romantic special occasion dinner.  And we had the decency to hire a babysitter for our children, otherwise we would have stayed home.
I finally went to Casbah for brunch today. Rolled in at 10am to meet a handful of people. Because it is Labor Day weekend, the place was empty except for a woman who had just gotten there too which was nice because a friend had warned me that the place gets crazy. We sat outside and atmosphere was cozy under the tent with the warm colors of the decor. Our waitress was incredibly friendly and presented us with the menus. I think it is great they have a prix fixe brunch - 1 alchy or nonalchy drink, an appetizer and an entree - but for $24. It looks like they have since raised the prices since Miles O. went. I felt it was just a tad steep and a lot of food but took the plunge anyway. I ordered the smoked salmon for the appetizer and the mushroom omlette for my entree, and had a hot coffee (they did not have ice coffee though offered to put ice with hot coffee if I wanted it). The waitress brought out some delicious mini baked treats before we got our dishes - poppy scone (on the crispier side but delicious), blueberry muffins and biscuits, which were all buttery goodness. After eating these I was getting a little full and then after my appetizer I realized I probably should not have gotten the prix fixe but could have would have should have. I ended up boxing half of my omlette entree. Portions were large, atmosphere was cool, food was good and wait staff were awesome but in the end I don't think $24 (not including the tip and tax) was worth it.
Passed this restaurant for years on my way to Buffalo Blues or more recently Mad Mex but have never actually eaten here.  Having finally come for lunch, I overall enjoyed it but it had some ups and some downs.  \n\nI ordered the Piccola Gusto Menu which for me included the Cream of Cauliflower soup, the Orecchiette Pasta and the Roasted Turkey Sandwich.  It sounds like a lot of food but the pasta serving is mini and it's a half sandwich.  For me, the size was just right.  The soup was awesome, and I could have eaten an entire lunch of just it.  The pasta was a little too creamy for me and just didn't have enough seasoning or spice.  I did love the addition of the cranberries in it though.  The perfect amount of sweet to offset the cream.  The roast turkey sandwich was just that.  Not out of this world, but not bad.  My biggest complaint was the service.  It took a really long time to get our meals which is always a bad thing during a weekday lunch.  \n\nI'd like to go back here for a happy hour when it's warm so I can enjoy the covered patio though and a nice glass of wine!
I had a free entree from Big Burrito for my birthday, for which we decided to use at Casbah a few weeks ago. It was my first time there, though I've tried a few other BB restaurants in the past. \n\nFood: \n- Cracked pepper butter was delicious - I had to warn the waitress not to let me have any more bread and ruin my meal!\n- Grilled Bruschetta (ricotta, fava beans, Swiss chard,  preserved lemon, arugula, chervil, Calcagno) was a bit too lemon-y for my liking\n- Short Rib Raviolli (Short Rib Ravioli, Swiss chard, oyster mushrooms, roasted shallots, gremolata) was very savory and I would definitely order it again\n- Double-Cut Pork Chop (with braised kale, prosciutto & parmesan risotto, garlic cream, sage jus) was Joe's meal. I tasted a bit of everything and really enjoyed the kale. I like really really creamy risotto, and this wasn't quite there. I dont want to say it was undercooked, as I like I just like mine over-cooked.\n- Fried Apple Empanadas (vanilla bean cider reduction, toasted oat streusel,  \ncaramel ice cream) The ice cream was great, but the empanadas were bland to me.\n\nService: Not terrible. I understand at nice restaurants people enjoy taking their time to relax, enjoy their meals, and converse with their dinner-mates, but our server should have been more observant to the fact that we would be just sitting there with empty places waiting for the desert menu. I will note, though, that the table next to us returned two glasses of the same wine and the bartender came over and very politely suggested an alternative wine for the patron. They were very accommodating in this way. \n\nWill I go back? Someday - but I think I may try Soba or Kaya first.
I was treated to Casbah for lunch by a potential employer who had passed me over, but really, really liked me. She said it was her favorite restaurant, but that she didn't go as often as she'd like.\n\nI knew the building from the early 80's when it had been one of Pittsburgh's dive gay bars called 'The Tender Trap', and knowing this, as well as a lot about the Big Bistroid Group...oops...Big BURRITO Group, I was curious to try it out and see if it lived up to the usual Big Burrito hype.  And voila, indeed, it's another excruciatingly overpriced bistroid in da burgh.\n\nThe atmosphere is actually quite lovely, inside or out. The colors are comfortable, the noise levels subtle, the seating comfortable, and the service staff looks professional (YOUNG) with no Coney Island side show appearances.\n\nThe service was good. Not overly friendly, but not uppity like young people waiting tables in more upscale restaurants tend to be in da bugh.\n\nThe menu was short, but did have a list of pretty unique offerings.  My friend had a salmon salad, and I opted to try the Farm Lamb Mac-n-Cheese.  The waiter brought a small basket with bread to the table accompanied by a single medium sized pat of salted butter to spread.  For a beverage, we both opted for just water.\n\nI have to say, if I actually had to pay for this, I would have been pretty miffed.  \n\nFor LUNCH, the prices were all around the $15 range, and the portions were NOT large.  The portions were actually fine for lunch, not overly filling (by any stretch of the imagination), but they didn't leave you hungry.\n\nI can't speak for the salmon, as I have NEVER had salmon in any form other than lox that didn't taste like a dried sawdust version of some strong fish. She seemed to enjoy it very much, so there it is.\n\nThe Farm Lamb mac n cheese was tasty. The lamb was tender and moist, and the mac n cheese was a tiny tube pasta with a very nice creamy cheesy sauce, all topped with a bread crumb covering when it was broiled until crispy.  It was accompanied by a 'pinch' of mesclun salad topped with another pinch of fried onions.\n\nBasically - take one large spoonful of mac n cheese with a higher end cheese sauce and a fancier noodle than comes in the average box - mix in about four cubes of roast lamb, sprinkle on a layer of bread crumbs and toss it in the broiler until the crumbs are toasted - then using your index finger and thumb, pick up a pinch of mesclun and sit it on the plate next to the mac n cheese bowl - and you have a bistroid expensive art project on a plate.\n\nSeriously? $15 for lunch? It's mac n cheese people!\n\nI also have to call into question the name and theme.  Mad Mex is bistroid Tex Mex.  Soba is bistroid Asian.  Kaya is bistroid Caribbean-ish.  Casbah? Farm Lamb mac n cheese? Sure, I can see this as a box lunch while riding a camel through the desert...not.\n\nI can't say the experience was awful. The company was awesome, and we had a nice unpressured amount of time for fun chat.  The atmosphere was comfortable, and the food was tasty.  But was it all worthy of a return trip or recommendation?  I honestly can't say 'yes' with any kind of cheerleader rave.  \n\nI'm not quite sure that I comprehend the mindset of people in this burgh who think paying that kind of money for food is worth it, when honestly, food with just as much flavor can be found in abundance around town for half the price and twice the portion. \n\nWho are all of these easily dupe-able rich people, and where do they come from? Want to blow that kind of money? Get out your check book and let me give you my address!
I'm actually giving it 3.5 stars.  3 for the appetizers and 4 for the entrees.  My wife and I went to Casbah for the first time.  As we usually do, we decided to share our entrees (TIP - you can get half portion sizes of the pastas!!) and augment the meal with a few appetizers.  For the appetizers, we got the chickpea flatbread, the arugula salad and the sea scallops.  The flatbread and salad were just OK.  The sea scallops would have been delicious except for the \"cured egg yolk\" which was infused in the avacado sauce.  For those who have never tried a cured egg yolk, I would consider yourself lucky.  Actually, the taste wasn't too bad.  The smell, however, reminded me of what you would smell if you were on the set of a nasty version of a Hoarders TV episode.  Must be an acquired taste.\n\nFor the main course, we chose the short rib ravioli and the cavatelli.  Both were excellent, especially the ravioli.  No complaints at all.\n\nOverall, a very pleasant experience.  Good atmosphere.  Our waitress was very friendly.  The place was busy and had a nice vibe to it.  Unfortunately, some of the food was a slight disappointment.
Glad to see that the Big Burrito restaurants are alive and well in Pittsburgh, and dinner tonight was my first time in awhile at one of their establishments.\n\nBit of a complex review.  My biggest gripe with Casbah is that it's Casbah Mediterranean when the menu (at least on this night, but I don't think it changes all that much) offers very authentic Mediterranean dishes.  One lamb dish (not overly Mediterranean) and no couscous or tagine, which are major staples of Mediterranean cuisine.  Even a side of hummus and pita or veggies would be nice.  Nonetheless, the menu has lots of fine options, just none that I've seen in a typical Mediterranean joint.  I think it's a little misleading especially if you're seeking Mediterranean cuisine.\n\nWe sampled several of the cocktails, all of which were creative and well priced.  As for food, we split the bruschetta (prosciutto and blue cheese), meatballs (pork) and the brussel sprouts were quite tasty, beet salad, and the potato gnocchi. So lots of food!  All was freshly prepared with quality ingredients and served with sophisticated presentation.\n\nLots of fine restaurants opening in the area, but it's clear to see that they have a loyal following.
Mixed results.  Made a reservation and we were seated in a dark corner at a tiny table. Is the money from having that table worth the negative experience guests will receive? Methinks not.  I had to ask to be moved to the patio, which was much better.\n\nThe drinks we ordered from the bar were watery (the Manhattan and some drink with applejack in it). Later, they made a mistake and sent us the wrong cocktail, which turned out to be much better than the ones we wanted. \n\nAppetizers (meatballs with Brussels sprouts and beet salad) were very good, but the main courses left a lot to be desired in terms of seasoning.  The texture of the short rib in the ravioli wasn't quite right, sort of dry, maybe overcooked.  We had a bread pudding for dessert, which was probably the best part of the meal. I expect a better overall experience for the money.
Food is tasty, though portions are for the waifish hipster types. Location is inconvenient and I would not recommend people walking by themselves at night on that stretch of Penn. Service is very uneven i.e. bad, even when the place is practically dead. I can't really speak on the coffee, though they do have good tissanes(however getting them to refill your hot water is another thing).\n\n**************\nOkay I won't change my rating, but I take back what I said about the food. They have changed the menu and it is really bad. \n\nWe had Buffalo Tofu sticks which were ridiculously dry. \n\nI had the Thai Peanut Tofu Wrap which tasted just like peanut butter. \n\nI don't understand the point of Mockamole? It's made with peas instead of avocado. \n\nHow to describe the food... it's as if they took pictures of how food should look and made the food without thinking about how food should taste. Gee peas are green, just like avocados?? \n\nI would go there for coffee/tea or whatever to hang out, but not for the food. \n\nOkay there was one decent thing on the menu which was the artichoke dip. I was completely disappointed.
pretty good veggie food.  I've had breakfast, lunch, and dinner here.  French toast, tofu scramble, museli, salads, sandwiches, lasagna.  They have a pretty decent variety.
This place is so hit-or-miss for me. Sometimes the food is amazing; sometimes it is terrible. Example: I ordered the spicy peanut wrap for the first time and fell in love with it. I came back a couple weeks later, and it was bland and unappetizing. Maybe there is someone who works in the kitchen who doesn't know where the spice rack is-- I don't know.\n\nThe 'waitstaff' is hit-or-miss, too. Sometimes, they're great. Other times, I've waited for ages just for a menu. One guy actually snapped at me for asking for a breakfast item at lunch. \n\nThat said, there are some good dishes, like the Black & Gold. I like that in some dishes you can replace rice with salad. A lot of people I've eaten with here have raved about the quesadillas. There's a nice laid back atmosphere and fun retro diner decor. There's also an extensive (but expensive) drinks menu with milkshakes, teas and coffee drinks, and a nice selection of locally-made vegan sweets and pastries. And I love the magazine and book rack, even though the magazines are usually two years old. Still fun to read.
Remember the days of bands in the back at night, and interesting kids hanging out at the bar all day? Well, the bands were the first to go, followed quickly by the comfy sofas. The kids didn't take long to leave, and now, years later, faced with a frankly less-than-appetizing Saturday menu, I find that the ability to substitute something else for the increasing amounts of potato filler is gone, too.\n\nQuiet Storm used to be a straight five star. My last experience was honestly two-star, but nostalgia and history don't allow me to give it less than a three.\n\nI'm sure all the changes over the years have been in the name of efficiency, but they've come at expense to the clientele. Here's hoping Quiet Storm rediscovers the mojo (and the menu) that once made them great.
We stopped by Quiet Storm for a late lunch while on vacation in Pittsburgh.  The food was excellent.  I had the cheese steak and my husband had a peanut tofu wrap, both were served with chips.  Everything was great.  If I had any complaint it would be that I didn't see on the menu that my cheese steak had mayo on it.  I'm not a big fan of it, so had I see that I would have asked for it without.  Other then that great place!
Daniel Fast friendly restaurant with good food. Stopped for an early supper before Saturday night church service after searching Yelp for vegan restaurant options. Food was good, service was good, price was very reasonable. Think I just found a new Saturday evening supper spot.
My experience has been ok at the Quiet Storm because I have 1) not deviated much from my usual menu choice (Original Home Fries = delicious) and 2) I have often known several members of the wait staff at any given time.\n\nThis has given me reason to continue eating at Quiet Storm on occasion.\n\nNegatives... I have eaten with several others over the years who have been wholly dissatisfied with their meals (small portions, not enough seasonings, could taste baking soda flavor in baked goods, etc). Service can be a little slow at times. And I have been burned a few times when going out of my way (it is a little off the beaten path for many) to score some delicious Home Fries only to find that the QS had inexplicably closed early.\n\nDespite this, FOR PITTSBURGH, the QS is a good spot for vegan/vegetarian fare.
So when we first went here for brunch, I had no idea it was a vegetarian restaurant.  That's an unpleasant prospect to face down after a hard night of drinking, which is the only time the idea of brunch ever occurs to me.  But then, the grim Spectre of Laziness appeared to me and asked, \"Do you really want to drive to another place?  Just look at you. Your wearing the same shirt that you wore yesterday dude.\"  \n\nThe Spectre of Laziness is a dick, but he was also right.  And to my surprise, nothing I had was bad at all.  For brunch options, meat eaters will find that potatoes and eggs are the cornerstone of any breakfast, and seitan substitutions are not as bad as say, having the grim Spectre of Laziness point out your slovenly appearance.  \n\nI think the biggest surprise in this place is that, though nothing is particularly jarring to the palate, there is nothing that really stands out as being amazing.  In Yelp terms: it's kind of a 3.  For hard core vegetarians having a night, er, mid-afternoon on the town, it's probably a blessed change from the meat based culture that Pittsburgh is pretty famous for.  But I'm willing to wager that very meat eaters will become converted to vegetarians after this.  Maybe they did TOO good of a job substituting meat items.  That being said, we did make it back another time for lunch where I had a vegetarian gyro.  My friend said it best: \"What's the fucking point?\"\n\nThe service is always very sweet, but both times the waiters have been curiously, nay ominously spacey.  Even when it wasn't crowded there had to be some substantial flag downs and polite and doleful eye contact before they would do what you needed.  If you're in the area and looking for...this type of thing, you really don't have too many other options so just eat it.
Honestly, this the last place you'd ever expect to see me. First it's a vegan/veggie cafe, I am a complete carnivore. Secondly, it's like hipster brunch paradise, I'm super preppy (a heavily tattoed preppy person but still).  Yet this was one of the only places open on Labor Day and I walked in with my vegan friend, she immediately recognized her people and practically jizzed in her pants over the menu. OMG seitan gravy and cheez?\n\nWTF is seitan gravy and cheez? Why does she keep calling vegan cheese, \"cheez\" anyway? I decided to go with the flow and order the Home Fries Ranchero. Basically their \"famous\" home fries, chili, sour cream, eggs or tofu and cheez. I went native and ordered tofu vs eggs, and you know what? I liked it. It came out in a big heaping pile on a 70s retro plastic plate, accompanied with some awesome coffee. My friend had hummus and pita, cause not only is she vegan she only eats things in the white/beige color range (food racist).\n\nOne bad thing, the bathroom has no door, only the stall does. Basically it's a unisex bathroom where all the delightful sounds and smells can be experienced by diners directly in front of you. For a place that serves chili and \"cheez\" they may want to reconsider this open approach.\n\nThere are some previous reviews about arrogant hipsters/bad service etc. I have say our waitress was awesome and attentive. My coffee was filled routinely, she understood that requesting a \"buttload\" of cream meant a larger carafe of cream rather than a thimble. The host was apologetic for making us wait for more than a few minutes to sit down.I do admit it does have the indie coffee house feel, and yes hipsters abound here, but I have a feeling these are some legit hipsters. Not the trust fund having, whiny, I drink PBR, and annoy people with my smugness style hipster.  I bet these hipsters been squezzing their junk into tight pants long before I was born. I don't know, I just get that impression. \n\nI however feel a little weird for writing such a positive review on a uber crunchy place, so I feel the need to go slash tires on someone's Prius now.
Despite my 3-star rating, I think I will be coming back here again to give it a second try.\n\nI got the smashed potatoes with seitan, cheese, and aioli.  The first bite was OK--the aioli didn't quite suit my taste, but everything else worked pretty well together.  However, 20 some-odd bites in to the dish, the flavors were getting repetitive and the mushy texture started to gross me out.  I got about half-way through eating the dish and the so-so aioli became too much for me.  I couldn't take another bite.\n\nHowever, my wife's apple panini was delicious.  I would probably eat a few of those if I came back.  The cream cheese, cinnamon (from the bread?), and apple all worked together in glorious harmony.\n\nOn a strange note, while we were eating, some camera guys came in and started setting up what looked to be an interview.  We asked the staff what was going on.  Apparently someone was filming their submission/application to be on a reality show.  \"Oh cool,\" we thought.  \"What reality show?\" we asked.  \"Not sure, something on the Golf Channel,\" they replied.  HAHAHAHA!  I thought watching grass growing on TV was boring enough.  Now they're making a reality show about it.\n\nIn the end,  the gross aioli was inexcusable to me.  Otherwise, I'd probably go 4 stars.   I still plan to come back and give it another shot.
I came into Quiet Storm not intending to have lunch, but just a latte and hang out to answer some emails for a little while (working from home makes me stir crazy, so bouncing around local coffeehouses, completely NOT fitting in with the crowd kinda makes my day sometimes). \n\nI walked up to the bar and was just going to grab a seat there, but super hipster server guy asked me to take a table, because it had an outlet to plug my laptop in. I didn't need to, but  ... good lookin' out. \n\nAnyway, ordered my latte - good espresso, but pretty weak foam. Served in a pint glass. That's fine. \n\nMenu actually looked really good, so I went for a sammy with apples, seitan sausage crumbles, and cheese. They offer different sides, but my super hipster server guy didn't ask me what I wanted; so being a newbie I figured maybe that was only with certain menu items. I was wrong, when the guy taking care of the table behind me was asked what he wanted. My fault for not speaking up. Sandwich was good, not to die for though, and frankly kinda small for $8. \n\nI'll finish with this: Internets are free, right? So, where's the code? Did I need to ask??\nI'll definitely go back though, intrigued by a few other things on the menu (like bbq tenders and pulled 'pork' quesadilla), and hopefully be a little more impressed.
I don't think I would have known about Quiet Storm if it hadn't popped up several times in friends' Yelp feeds in the last couple years.  I'm all about veg/vegan restaurants, but I have to agree with other reviewers who wish Quiet Storm's food was *slightly* more interesting.  \n\nHusband and I ordered take-out so we could enjoy a late lunch al fresco at Schenley Park overlook.  Folks working were vegan-hipster quirky, but friendly and helpful.  We ended up waiting about 30 minutes for our food, so we decided to partake in an afternoon coffee to pass the time.  I  had an iced Morroccan latt\u00e9 with cardamom and rose,  husband the Mandorla sweet almond milk latt\u00e9.  Both were excellent.\n\nFor my meal I picked the Tahini Bowl with brown rice, spinach, roasted red pepper, tomatoes, pepitas and fried tofu cutlet with a tahini dressing.  I wished there had been less rice and more dressing; the bowl was also screaming for more seasoning.  Husband opted for the Crunch Wrap Extreme: scrambled tofu tossed with celery, carrots, edamame, kale and spinach, dressed with vegan wasabi mayo.  Again, twice as much dressing would have added flavor and moisture to an otherwise fine wrap.\n\nAnd that's just it: the food at Quiet Storm is fine.  When really, I'd been hoping to be utterly wowed by the magic capable of being worked by nothing more than mere vegetables, plain grains and humble legumes.  Still, I won't discourage you from eating here.  I just might come back myself.
this is the only place I order delivery pizza from.  they do a good job on their gourmet and specialty pizzas.  the bbq chicken is good.\n\nthe wings are average.  generally small and cheap with a seemingly storebought generic hot sause. nothing terribly special.  average\n\nthe hoagies are ok.  dont get a cold cut or italian style.  I'd stick with something like the hot sausage or chicken parm.  they tend to be better.  and they are huge.  like 16\" for a whole.\n\nthe calzones are massive and tasty as well.  go with heavy veg or a combination of meat and veg.  the breaks up the bread and cheese flavor.  well at least I've found them to be better anyway.\n\nthe pasta is expensive as heck and is average.  not a place to order pasta from unless its one of those lazy nights where you need that craving filled.\n\nsalads are typical.\n\nall in all not a bad place.  better than other pizza places in the area.
I called for a delivery of a pepperoni pizza, large. Very simple since I was in the mood for it. The delivery and the time taken were exceptional. Very fast, very good delivery service. \n\nThe down side is the pizza. It was hot and fresh, but the flavor was just OK. It wasn't the best nor was it the worst. It was just OK.\n\nIf you do find that you like your pizza and need a quick delivery, you can't go wrong here. Other than that you may want to look elsewhere.
This co-op is probably great for vegans and vegetarians, but I am Paleo.  I was very happy to find grassfed butter, raw milk, and cheese at reasonable prices.  The bulk foods section was missing a few mainstay items I typically pick up, and the meat selection was very poor.  I would like to see a better listing of which meat is grass fed and grass finished, as many of the farms in the frozen meat section did not have any of that information.\n\nFor my future needs, I will be ordering directly from the farm (this co-op sells items from the farm that I will be direct ordering from) at a lower price and will fill in the gaps elsewhere.
I have been going to CJ since it opened. I try to go once a week. I have received some good deals there, but in the past couple years, the prices seem to be higher than they should be for used / overstock items. I find myself buying less items than I used to. I think if the prices were more reasonable, they would sell more.\nA new \"reuse\" store has opened in the area nearby. They have more reasonble prices and thier building is heated.
Very primitive bouldering area, but the routes were challenging, in part due to the lack of a smearable surface (plywood kinda painted to look like rocks),  mega shitty footholds (jibs worn down to shiny scummy nubs that sorely needed cleaning or replacing), and a distinct lack of fall-friendliness (one old mat to be shared among every 3 or 4 walls, and an unforgiving floor that thudded every time someone landed on it).  Not a bargain for a $12 day pass since the routes did not seem to have been changed very often and all climbs shared the same foot jibs which looked practically permanent. The changing room was literally a closet.\n\nAll that griping aside, there were some decent climbs. The V3's were fairly easy but the V3/V4's were exponentially harder. I was able to do one V4/V5, but my butt was royally kicked on everything else. No ego boosts here, and the masochist in me awards 3 stars to this old school climbing gym.
I'm giving this the ok rating, I am not an experienced climber but a beginner. The last climb I went out was a real one in Utah with my brother who got me all harnessed up only to instruct me to place my foot and hand level with my head and pull myself up . You can imagine how that went with my golden retriever feverish barking and running below instructing my brother to let me down lol.\n\nSo for a beginner I found the price to be ok I went with a group and paid 16$ for shoe rental and I guess climbing fee? We stayed for about two hours. We went on a Saturday it was very crowded probably 15-30 people in the place but there are so many choices you can still get a wall. There were several beginner climbs that are easy for anyone with a shred of upper body strength. Then some V2 and V3 and V4, the other beginner gals I was climbing with found there was a pretty big variation from the VB to V2 on some of the climbs. So sometimes it was better just not to follow the stickers completely if you're a beginner but still looking for variation while bouldering. \n\nI think safety-wise things are bit of a liability here, walls are high, mats are very old and very few. Also lots of people don't follow the basic rules including teenagers who are there alone. So be cautious of your space an d others space and consider fatigue when getting to the top of those walls with your hands all sweaty. \n\nI also expected it to be a little larger based on the website photos, but I understand that this is Pittsburgh not a city with room for a huge gym like out west. I also think if they were to build a bigger newer gym here with higher climbs, then you would be looking at paying $25 and up. \n\nMy biggest complaint is that you can only do lessons at certain times with a harness, this makes it harder for beginners to get in and get a feel. I did complete one or two V7 or V8. Just to push myself but I would have had more fun if I had the support of a rope so the next time I go back I will consider classes. Which costs a little bit more but oh well. Class times are limited check the website.
Dirty slick holds. Hate the fact I can't move mats. Some problems were fun, some were awful. The staff is very unfriendly. Unless you're part if the clique no one will talk to you.
Recently dined here for the first time and can say that I was pleased with all of the food choices we had made at this establishment. The cold prickly pear soup was certainly a good choice of appetizer. The service was acceptable and the staff very welcoming. The only downside to this place is the atmosphere. It can get extremely loud at times (especially when you are sitting next to a party of 12) and it becomes rather difficult to have any table conversation.
The Frick Car and Carriage Museum is interesting and fun. They play very informative short films in a screening room and the docents there are very friendly, helpful people. The Car and Carriage Museum is very well worth going to. And the amazing part is that is free. \n\nThe Frick Art Museum is not really that interesting or great. There is hardly anything of note. As far as I can see, Helen Frick had way more money than taste and money can't buy you taste. When J.P. Morgan died, he donated his entire art collection to the Met in New York. However the Met did not want everything. Helen Frick bought many pieces that the Met had already passed on, with good reason. Of course not all of the Frick Art collection consists of the Met's castoffs. There many portraits of insignificant nobility done by French court painters who had little talent. Just bec. art is old or expensive, doesn't mean it's really any good. It's a good thing this museum is free.
It's free, and the car & carriage museum has a Rolls-Royce Silver Ghost.\n\nWe skipped the house tour ($10), the cafe, and the art museum.   It was still worth visiting just for the old cars.
Very nice home and grounds.  I could not exactly say I am a fan of the owner or how he earned his money but I did appreciate how original the house and belongings are and how beautiful the grounds and buildings are.   Can you say Johnstown flood?  How about the Homestead strike?  Celebrating the extreme wealth of few on the backs of a billion who worked 16 hour days for nothing isn't exactly something I really love to do but I can appreciate beautiful art and architecture of which there is plenty to see here.  We toured Clayton (the home), art museum, conservatory and the car and carriage museum.  The conservatory didn't have a lot of impressive specimens and was far from full but is a great building.  Be sure to earmark about 4 hours for the whole experience including, perhaps, a pricey but tasty snack at the cafe (make a reservation).  We had a really nice time and I do recommend a visit if you are here so you can not only see some great furnishings but so that you may learn some of the history of the economy here.  After all, we shouldn't turn our backs on the reality of our collective history lest we make the same mistakes again.  I am glad they are doing such a fine job preserving this place for generations to come.
Okay.  Here's an update to my original experience.  I have to say that Emilio, the owner of Izzazu is the consumate professional when it comes to customer service and follow up.  After my first appointment - at that time to be my last appointment - he doggedly tried to contact me to make the first appointment right.  Emilio and I had quite a lengthly and productive conversation.  He cares very much about making the customer happy AND correcting the situation that was unsatisfactory.  \n\nI did go back and was very pleased with my cut once again.  Because Marshall was running late (20 minutes and counting) Caesar cut my hair this time.  Another great cut!\n\nAgain, however, the desk needs training in customer service.  After a 20 minute wait, the receptionist still hadn't notified Marshall that I was there.   A downtown salon depends on clients who are on their lunch hours for the most part.  Next appointment I'll call ahead to see how they're running before heading to the salon and waiting.\n\nEmilio IS working on the front desk situation.  In the meantime, I'll continue to go for the wonderful cut!
I have been driving by this little bakery for several years now and always wanting to stop in and try it.  Unfortunately, they are usually closed when I have the time to stop.  I was finally lucky enough to find them open at a time when I had a chance to stop and pop in.  The cases were less than half full and I found this a tad disconcerting and so asked the lady behind the counter why they were so empty.  She said they they normally sell out of most of their fare very early in the day.  Luckily, they did have a small yellow cake with butter cream frosting.  I ordered one and took it home.\n\nThe cake was good, but it wasn't as good as some of the other bakeries in the Pittsburgh Metro.  I would never crave it, but I would return if the other bakeries were closed at the time.
The food was delicious. But it is a ridiculously expensive restaurant. If you're intimidated by spending $100 or more on a complete meal for 1 person, then this is not the place for you. Knowing that we had other plans for our evening, my date and I cut the meal short with appetizers, salad, and a bottle of one of the lesser expensive wines they offer, which was $54 a bottle. Our check was still $120, and we left hungry. Which is a shame, because the little of what we did have, we fully enjoyed. There are plenty of Italian restaurants in Pittsburgh, and many of them are very, very good - where one can enjoy a meal for a fraction of what it costs here.
The name is ABC Garden and this is the best Chinese food I've had in Pittsburgh.  This place completely satisfies my Chinese food craving when I want that balance between fried deliciousness and fresh ingredients.  The neighborhood is kinda dodgy but since they deliver (and quick, i might add), there is no need to tread into Sketchville to pick up the delectable Chinese offerings.   Also, there are free extras when you order $20 or more (such as a 2 liter of Pepsi).\n\nUpdate:  Much to my great sadness and disappointment, I have had to stop patronizing this establishment due to the extremely rude and unprofessional man they hired to answer the phone.  We tolerated it the first few times, even got a laugh out of the fact that he actually dropped the F bomb a few times while taking our order.   But when he became hostile and irate with me on a recent order, it was all over.  He started like he always does by laughing at our street name and having me spell it 5 times, then interrupted the order without excusing himself to set down the phone and yell at some children I heard in the background, then he argued with me about what the menu in my hand said, telling me I was wrong and it said something different.  He was aggressive, frustrated, impatient and clearly has some psychological problems.    I had to make the painful decision to give up this place in spite of the lovely fresh vegetables and tofu cooked to perfection.  :(  I'm trying No. 1 Kitchen on Brownsville instead.
It's pretty average Chinese food. Their egg rolls and dumplings were decent enough as was the Hawaii Five O dish I had was ok too. The service is a little slow as well.
Had Hunan Wok yesterday because it was on my way home. I've heard mixed reviews so I wanted to try it for myself. I tried to peruse the menu before ordering but I couldn't find it online anywhere which is disappointing because the hard copy they have available had at least 300 different options from apps, combos, sides, and entrees. \n\nI got their General Tso's Chicken (extra spicy) and because my order was a take-out over $12, they threw in two free egg rolls. #win \n\n(Other offers are Free 1 Small Fried Rice w/purchase of $16, Free General Tso's or Sesame Chicken w/purchase over $28)  \n\nI called on my way there and it took about 10-15 .... When I walked in, everything was ready to go. Large portion of chicken was served in plastic and rice was in standard paper folder container. They were not stingy about duck sauce, soy sauce, and fortune cookies. #win #win\n\nJust like the reviews below, the General Tso's was just so-so. It definitely wasn't extra spicy but it did have a mild kick to it. To me, the sauce tasted a bit like wing sauce from a dive bar. I would get it again because it was good but it didn't have an oriental flavor to it. When ordering from a strip mall Chinese food place, I always expect each piece of General Tso's to be a quarter chicken and the rest fatty breading to which I dissect and just eat the meat.  My expectations were met but I wasn't disappointed because the chicken was good. \nThe meal had a decent amount of broccoli in it which was cooked perfectly for my taste, a little firmer. \n\nThe egg rolls were OK. Super crispy and not much filling...plenty of oil. They were free and so I can't really complain.  \n\nI will definitely eat here again. I'll probably try Sha Cha chicken because it's spicier or Kung Po. This place is good if you want cheap food that will hit a Chinese take-out craving. \n\nEveryone that worked there was really nice - Even the chef in the back said hello. That alone goes a long way in my opinion. \n\nSide note - It's the day after and I'm not sick so I give my seal of health approval.
I live closeby so I've been there dozens of times. I usually get chicken with broccoli or moo goo gai pan. My sister Vi usually gets moo shoo pork. The food is excellent American Chinese cuisine. The broccoli is always cooked perfectly, it is nice and bright green and firm yet not tough to chew. The chicken breast is always light and lean. Love the garlic white sauce used on the moo goo gai pan. Vi loves the plum sauce. There are several Chinese restaurants in Carrick and Mt. Oliver and I'd rate this one the best. I wish the broth used in the wonton soup was a bit richer and the egg rolls would be better if they were lighter.
I usually love this place but it's gone bad. Went to one in wv the other day and it was good. I think different owners. My beef this one is the cheese. Very pour quality. Bread and sauce still good though.
It has rebounded from when it closed in 08 and now does some veg stuff along with the bar food. I'd still much rather eat up the street at Max's though.\n\nThat said the clientele is nice/colorful & im glad it's reopened.
I went to Park House after much internal deliberation. And after reading all the high reviews from fellow yelpers. \n\n  This bar is less than 5 minutes from where I live.  I stopped in on a Saturday night and was pleased with the music that was playing and also the fact that the bar was not overcrowded. The bar tender barely acknowledged me the whole night.  \n\nThere wasn't any free peanuts or popcorn when I visited. Nor did they have the beer that I like on tap.  I did get a very tasty double chocolate stout, which I found to be delicious in every way.  The owner of the place even gave me an annoyed look.\n\nSaturday night is usually a crappy night to try out any new place.  The service was slow but I got the feeling that the bartender couldn't be bothered to wait on me.  \n\nI haven't completely written this place off.  I'll just try again during the week.
Good beer, Wednesday night is banjo night which always draws a crowd. Definitely a hipster bar. Food is fresh & worth trying. Get a dish that includes the house humus.
I was here for the well-known bluegrass night on a Wednesday a couple weeks ago and had a pretty good time. A friend met up with me here and we were able to enjoy the live music close to the bar and actually meet a few of the locals. I enjoyed the crowd- it seemed to mostly consist of 20 and 30 somethings, a bunch of bros, some couples, single girls and guys. We got some of the hummus, which was pretty good. If someone invited me, I'd definitely stop in again. $2 Yuenglings for the bluegrass night (that's reason enough to stop in again, right?).
I had a totally mixed experience with Bernie's, which may explain the other reviews. \n\nI have a DSLR that I got from my father - it had never been cleaned or adjusted. It had been having some trouble with the battery, so I took it to the only place in Pittsburgh (apparently) that will help with this. A dark-haired guy greeted me as I walked in and treated me like a total noob, and his demeanor made me feel like the dirt under his shoes. However, he did give me good information and service about my camera when prompted by another man in the shop (who I might assume is Bernie). \n\nThey told me they could send it to the manufacturer where they'd clean it for a couple hundred bucks, but instead they cleaned out the sensors and the lens right there at the counter and checked the contacts between the lens and the camera. The dark-haired guy showed me through a magnifying glass what I was looking at, and explained that some spots I saw in the viewfinder were inside the top of the camera and wouldn't appear on the pictures. The other guy (Bernie?) explained to me some of the functions of the camera -- I knew these already, but it was nice to hear them explained and he showed me a few examples. They advised me to get a UV filter to protect my lens, which I knew was overpriced but I happily bought anyway to pay for their service. \n\nSo I think the kind of experience you get depends entirely on the person you run into. I can see how someone would be put off by the dark haired guy I ran into first, and how someone would absolutely love the service from the other guy. All in all I'm pleased with my encounter with this shop, but I probably won't buy anything from there considering how overpriced it was -- however, if something goes wrong or I need any service, I'll definitely go back.
After a long day at work I met up with a friend for some German fair on the northside. I don't get out to this neck of the woods that often so it was a treat for me! All appetizers are  $2.99 during happy hour so we went with the Potato pockets which were perogies in my book. They were crispy and creamy, and topped with fried onions. They also had a side of french onion sour cream. Pretty tasty stuff! Plus they gave you so many I could have filled up just on the app. I ordered the Bell's Oberon while my dining partner ordered the sampler. I have to say that she wasn't that impressed with the brew. \"Dirty pipes\" and I quote. I had the same taste from my order so I focused on the food.\n\nWe both ended up ordering Max's Goulash that was suggested by another Yelper! You can't go wrong when you have that recommendation. This is not our small town neighborhood goulash made from egg noodles and a mix with ground beef. The noodles in this feast were homemade and chunky, piled high with a peppery meaty sauce infused with fall off the fork beef, carrots, peas, and tiny pearl onions. If you remember yesterday was a cold, rainy, gloomy day. This was real comfort and I had to take it to go. Rain is still in the forecast so leftovers will be grand!
The goulash was (sickeningly) sweet and the bread pudding wasn't sweet at all.  But the atmosphere is kind of cool.  And the prices are downright cheap.
I really thought I'd never be back.  The goulash I had was so so gross.  But then,  was roped in by some friends who were doing a Sunday brunch book club.  Of course I couldn't miss out on tantalizing conversation... so I obliged.  \n\nI really had no clue what they offered for brunch options, but quickly learned they have a a pretty decent size brunch buffet.  I'm not below buffets at all, it's the fat kid in me!  Most things still looked a little questionable to me, but I went for the big ticket items.  Make your own omelets, potato pancakes and dessert.  I'd hit up the buffet again, but still be hasty to check out the regular menu again.  \n\nThe omelet was made right in front of you, so I added cheese, mushrooms, peppers, tomatoes and onions.  I was super excited about it because it was the size of a football.  Sadly, it was pretty tasteless.  I don't think they added any salt or pepper to the egg mix, so it came out really bland, despite loading up on ingredients.  \n\nBut the potato pancakes... I could survive on them forever.  They were amazeballs!  Add some sour cream and I was in potato patch heaven!  I had to keep myself from getting more because of the other thing I loaded up on... dessert.  \n\nThe desserts looked unassuming, but they were also awesome.  I had a smattering of delectable bites.  The scones were so moist and tasty.  I had to stop myself from taking more than 20.  I also had some carrot cake, brownies, cookies among other things I inhaled and didn't pay attention too.  Should I be embarrassed?  Probably.  But I don't care because it was darn good!
Our dinner here was a nice experience.  We were going to a concert and when we arrived many people were waiting to be seated.  We were told to expect a half hour wait.  We sat at the bar and had a drink and in what must have been only ten minutes we were asked if we would mind eating at a booth in the bar area rather than wait for the dinning room.  We were thrilled, because we were considering eating at the bar.  The booth worked out just fine.  It wasn't too noisy and  we got served quickly.  Even though there were several specials that tempted us, we both ordered the best thing on the menu - their J\u00e4ger Schnitzel, with sides of hot German potato salad and sweet and sour cabbage.  I had a German black lager and my wife a glass of wine.  The basket of assorted rolls comes with delicious apple butter and sauerkraut relish, both very tasty.  The schnitzel is quite large, and we only made it about halfway thru when we asked for a to-go box.  We're looking forward to finishing it here at home.  Maybe next time we'll try something different....but probably not!\nPros: inexpensive, very tasty schnitzels\nCons: no reservations for parties under 5
The food isn't as good as it once was.  The atmosphere is kind of dark and needs to be updated.  We ordered potato pancakes that had to be returned because they somehow tasted fishy (I don't even want to speculate).  The other items we ordered were ok. Staff is great, very friendly and attentive.
This is americanized German food.  For real German food, go to Hofbrauhaus and ask for a schnitzel.
I've been here once because this was an easy place to meet for dinner with a friend. I enjoyed eating here well enough.\n\nI'm honestly not a die-hard fan of German food, although I guess that wouldn't have mattered: a peak at the menu beforehand revealed that this place's menu is mostly Americanized - proof of this is the fact that my salad was topped with French fries (only in Pittsburgh...). Trust me, even if you don't really like German food, there'll at least be a sandwich you'll like here.\n\nThinking about my usual \"overall\" summary, I have to say this place wasn't bad and served as a reasonable place to meet - the beer menu looked nice from what I saw and the atmosphere was pretty cozy and even nostalgic and homely - but man, the dining options really weren't that extraordinary. I'm still torn as to how to feel about its menu, because on the one hand obviously it being Americanized meant even I could find something to enjoy, but on the other I feel bad for the people who do like German food and may not be getting what they hope for. \n\nIt wasn't bad enough that I'd say don't try it and see - just understand it may not be exactly what you expect.
I went to Max's for the first time with my family a few weeks ago. I ordered the kielbasa sandwich with a side of kase spaetzle. The kielbasa on the sandwich was topped with a serving of sauerkraut and served on a toasted roll.  It was your average kielbasa sandwich. Satisfying, but nothing out of the ordinary.\n\nThe kase spaetzle however was noteworthy and delicious. It was smothered in gouda cheese sauce and I love me some gouda! I ate it all and I would have licked the plate if it were socially acceptable. \n\nAs for the environment, the restaurant is housed in what looks like what might of used to be a house back in the day. It had lots of little dining rooms. The decor was kind of outdated, but I think that's what you'd expect and it's part of the charm. The tables were spaced a little too close for my liking, but it was tolerable. \n\nOverall, I'd go back if invited, but I don't know if I'd go again on my own.
Brunch, brunch, brunch.  Max's serves an awesome Sunday Brunch Buffet!  The omelet station is standard (no egg whites for you health-nuts) and heavenly pastries will always await you along with potato pancakes.  I'm not in love with their potato pancakes, but being that Max's specializes in German food, you've got to try at least one with their homemade applesauce.\n\nSome of my rotating favorites on the buffet include red cabbage, Eggs Benedict, and the Farmer's Breakfast.  You can order off the menu during brunch if you aren't in mood to gorge yourself on the buffet.  No drinks included with the buffet :( but you can order them, of course.\n\nI love the decor at Max's - it's an old house, and much of the furniture looks like it was in this house and just remained when it converted to a restaurant.  Max's location in Old Deutschtown on the North Side fits it perfectly.  They even offer a shuttle to Heinz Field on Steeler game days (small fee applies).
This is one of the only German restaurants I know of in the area. The meal was good and reasonably priced. They also have a good beer selection on draft and in bottles. We had a party of 6 going for a 7:30 dinner on a Thursday. \n\nBigger parties tend to chat a little more and take longer in my experience. I felt like they were sort of rushing us out. That might be because they closed the dining room door and started vacuuming the front bar room while we were still finishing up our dinner. I'm not sure if anyone was eating out there but I'm very happy we weren't because it seems really gross to me to vacuum around food. This was around 9:15 and I'm pretty sure they serve until 10. \n\nBesides that, our service was good and so was the food. We all split the stuffed pretzels and potato skins as an appetizer. The pretzels are delicious, I could have eaten them all myself! Deep-fried and stuffed with cheese, yummy! \n\nI ordered the Chicken Viennese and was pleased with my meal. It came with a choice of two sides and I went with a delicious sweet potato casserole and my favorite thing of the night: POTATO PANCAKES. I prefer sour cream, but you can also get applesauce. Yum yum yum get lots of potato pancakes! The chicken was delicious and was served over spaetzel, which was just ok. I've had the kase spaetzel there before which is served in a cheese sauce and much better than the regular. \n\nThere was a variety of entrees ordered from sausage platters to wiener schnitzel and everyone seemed pleased with their meals. You get a lot for your money and I'll never turn down a chance to eat potato pancakes!
The old arcade game was excellent and only a few quarters to play.\nDrinks nice enough .\nBartenders were really nice.\n NIce enough place.
Got take out from this place on the weekend.  Ordered kung pao chicken, steamed dumplings, and pork egg rolls.  I was really hungry so it hit the spot, but there wasn't that many chicken pieces in my kung pao chicken - a lot of peanuts (as expected) and a whole lot of celery and carrots (aka filler).  So I was a bit disappointed in that.  \n\nThe steam dumplings were good, especially when fresh and hot.  The egg roll was tasty as well - I didn't find it too oily.  Very affordable and a generous portion - I had the leftovers the next day.
I work on the North Side and went for a walk to find something new for lunch.  I am quickly growing tired of Eco Bistro directly downstairs from my office at Allegheny Center.\n\nAt any rate, came across this place at the corner of Ohio and the onramp to 279.  The lunch special was inexpensive and grabbed a soda for about $6 in all.  I had the Kung Pao Chicken and it was prepared to order.  Tasty, cheap, fast.  I ate inside - there are only a handful of tables in this place and it's decently clean.
Ended up here since for some reason all the major hotels on the North Side were booked.  Overall this is a solid option if that happens to you, but probably wouldn't make a point to stay here otherwise.\n\nNice staff, fairly easy walk to North Side or across the bridges but as others have mentioned it's not in a great area.  Literally \"on the wrong side of the tracks\".  I live in a similar area in Philly so it didn't bother me as much but can see this being an issue for others.  I also walked the whole time and didn't use the shuttle so that's an option as well, but did hear others waiting a while to that just to go to PNC Park which I simply walked to myself in 10 minutes.\n\nIt's definitely an old place, so you could see that as \"charm\" or simply as old.  Again, not a bad place at all but nowhere I'd miss if I stayed elsewhere.
So apparently I have this habit, at least last week, of visiting a bar/restaurant during its most dead time. In this case, it was somewhat understandable for Clark Bar & Grill because it was a very uneventful sports week. Regardless, I wanted to check out this place, housed in the old manufacturing warehouse of the historic Clark Bar Candy Co. (RIP) just north of PNC Park.\n\nI wasn't overly impressed with either the menu or beer selections. In fact, there were only five beers on tap and one had just kicked. I ordered the special, a Reuben sandwich with tater tots, which were both decent. I washed it down with a Penn Pilsner (local brew) and then left to go check out another place on the North Side.\n\nThis may be a good spot to hit up before/after a Pirates or Steelers game because of its proximity to both stadiums, but I'm not sure I'd venture back otherwise.
My review is limited to the restroom.  I was in town for a Steelers/Jets game and the portable toilet line was very long.  So I walked over here and for $5 the allowed me to use the restroom for the rest of the day (they stamped my hand).  I was told that it would be donated to a charity (I believe he said ALS).  Great idea if it is true.  The restroom is not very large (men's room had 2 urinals and 2 toilets) but it is much better than the options out in the parking lot.  \n\nAs far as the rest of the place, it was packed with fans prior to game time.  Lots of food, drinks and tv.  Might be a better hang out spot if the weather is crummy. But I prefer to tailgate.  It'd be a good spot to watch the game if you did not have a ticket and tailgated with your friends.
We didn't order directly from them, so I'm not ranking any lower than three stars.\n\nHOWEVER, our wedding catering sourced their bread from Breadworks and it was quite unimpressive.  In fact, many of our guests identified it as the one thing they would have changed about our meal...\n\nNot sure if it was because our reception was on a Saturday and maybe the hotel only takes deliveries on weekdays or something, but it just wasn't fresh-tasting and certainly wasn't on-par with say, Mancini's.
Okay, I'm biased because I'm actually German. And in Germany I'd probably never set a foot into a traditionally designed beer house - just because I'm from Berlin and this is more stuff Bavarians would do.\n\nBut I was in Pittsburgh so different rules. Came here for brunch on a Sunday because of an invite. You're not a member? Sorry no entry. Luckily, my accent gave it away and apparently Germans are always welcome.\n\nThey serve proper Bavarian food - Wurst, Bacon (?), Red Cabbage, fried potatoes - pretty solid. You can also get omelettes together with a Krug of German beer. Is that what we Germans do for breakfast back home? Maybe in the Bavarian woods, I'm not sure, but it is definitely something.\n\nThe interior is quite unique - imagine Oktoberfest in 1935 and you get the idea. Fun fact: not everyone in there speaks German and they have waitresses that work there for over a decade. I do, however, appreciate that this Pittsburgh institution is around for more than 100 years and hope they'll stick around for a while.\n\nMaybe, in another 100 years, even the neighborhood won't look as dodgy as it looks right now.
If this place wasn't up on a hill, it might be a hipster paradise. As it stands, it is a beloved and well-attended local bar with frequent karaoke nights. I've been there twice, and so far the bartender has been the same wonderful, slightly hurried lady, who remembered us the second time around and who was willing to help me experiment by making a manly cocktail with a raw egg shaken into it. I guess it helps that the other half of Billy's bar is Billy's restaurant, with eggs to spare. A good time is always had, belting out the classics with friendly faces and free popcorn abounding.  Be forewarned: if you start coming every week, some of the classics will become even more \"classic\", as you start to realize your new friends have favourite songs to jive to on a regular basis....
This place was a total surprise to me. I didn't really know anything existed on Troy Hill aside from Penn Brewery until I went for a ride through the area this past weekend. While passing through I noticed Billy's, it was open, the steeler game was about to start.... Why not check it out?!\n\nThe interior is dated, but clean and has some character. You enter though the bar and the dining room is on your right, this being a Sunday afternoon though, the dining room was not open. No biggie, I'll saddle up to the bar which seats about 12 people. The bartender was very nice, introduced herself and wanted to get to know me. \n\nThis seems like a mostly locals only bar, but they are very happy when people from outside the neighborhood stop in. One thing I heard several times while I was in there was \"Troy Hill is getting better, more people should come here and find out.\"\n\nI tried the soup of the day, chicken and corn chowder, and an order of their wings, $.60 during the Steelers games. Both were very good and made me want to come back to try more of the menu. The beer selection is a bit limited, they mostly stick with the big name domestics, but that being said, the beer is pretty darn cheap. Sam Adams Octoberfest was $2.50 a glass or $12 a pitcher! \n\nI'll certainly be back to Billy's and I think you should go too, turns out there are things on Troy Hill!
I visited both the art and natural history museums last weekend. I majorly bummed that the large dinosaur exhibit was under refurbishment. Most of the rest of the museum is a large taxidermy exhibit - not my thing.\n\nIn addition, the art museum, although nice, did not live up to the \"major impressionist collection\" rep it has. Maybe I'm just spoiled with Philly museums, but this one was a bit of a disappointment. Major thumbs down to the museum for not notifying visitors ahead of time that the statue room was shut down for a private function during the day.
Why Go?\nYou want to see lots of shiny gems, random contemporary art that doesn't make any sense (at least to me), and dinos all in one place\n\nWhen to Go?\nIf you're cheap go 1hr or 1.5 hr before closing cuz we got in FREE!!!\nbut keep in mind you only have so much time to spend so be selective\n\nWhat You Should See?\n1.) Gems! Gems! & more Gems! Makes you feel like ur at tiffany's w/ all the glass cases\n2.) Dinos obviously, you can click on their touch screen to see which parts of the skeleton is real vs. a cast\n3.) Hall of Sculpture - when you walk in ur surrounded in greek architecture; of course their casts but still gives u the feel\n4.) Sperm Whale Exibit - if it is still there check it out interesting to hear the maori tribe story\n5.) Art side...meh not too much that I liked but for ppl who like old oils / contemporary art (i.e., canvas covered in black paint, elephant dung, rocks in a circle) then its for you\n\nCafe \n* Not bad food either sandwich w/ a side for around $6-$7
Food: menu will appeal to vegetarians and non-vegetarians, with daily dinner specials, separate lunch (sandwiches) and dinner (entrees) menus, both soups were vegetarian (according to the waitress, never heard of vegetarian minestrone before), I ordered penne with multiple veggies and a white wine sauce, it was above average but not great, soup was good, a bowl of bread sticks was on the table and replaced regularly, salad was average size and quality\n\nPrice: dinners range from $12-18 with most toward the higher end of that range, not expensive, but the quality of the food probably deserves the lower end of that scale\n\nDrinks: BYOB\n\nAtmosphere: sports bar-family restaurant type setting, with pictures of athletes all over the wall, but better than sports bar quality food and service\n\nService: waitress refilled water many times, was on the ball and timely, answered all questions about the menu\n\n(+): good service, reasonable prices, good but not great food\n\n(-): nothing wrong with Legends, but also nothing spectacular\n\nWould I go back again? I wouldn't drive to the North Side to eat here, but if I was in the North Side, it would be at the top of the list, particularly if friends/family were at AGH (directly across the street).
So....what do you say when a highly rated place let's you down??  It was okay....\n\nWhen a meal rocks my world, I usually want to lick the bowl clean, yes, like a dog.  I did not, sadly, feel that way about this place.  It IS BYOB but the catch is it's $4 PER glass.  Yep, that's right, not per table my friend.  Keep that in mind.\n\nI got the greens and beans on recommendation from many Yelpers on here.  Maybe I just don't have the taste for it, but I thought it was weird, watery and....not good.  I also thought it was going to be green beans and it was kidney beans and spinach that tasted like a warm Caesar salad.  No thanks....\n\nI ordered the Penne Vodka, which is my fav meal to order at Italian restaurants.  I also like to add a meatball on if it's homemade.  It was, in fact, confirmed to be homemade so I was all over it!  The meatball itself was delicious.  I love a bread-y meatball.  You know the type.  Soft and packed with flavor.  It was the winner of the night.  The vodka sauce was good, but I wanted way more.  Now I have to preface this by saying I'm a total sauce-aholic.  I love me a good amount of sauce, this didn't even come close.  Then I looked over at Serena R's plate, and her ravioli (which I thought was the same) was SWIMMING in it!  So I stole some of hers....\n\nWould I come back?  If someone really wanted to.  But I have a hunch there's way better Italian places to dine at in the Burgh...so now I'm on the hunt!  I gotta connect with my roots, ya' know?
This is a really small restaurant and is BYOB. The servers are friendly and the food was good. I ordered two appetizers (small plates) which were very good - greens and beans and then muscles. The flavours were both good, but the muscles were served with multiple closed shells which for the small portion was a negative. I don't have much to say about this experience....It was just a-ok.
Legends is good...but not special. It's just your typical Italian-American restaurant, but with a shorter menu than most. Huge portions of pasta, as expected. Started with Mussels Diablo which were good, but we had a lot of closed shells. I had the Penne alla Vodka and the sauce was good, especially with fresh basil leaves. The pasta was a bit overcooked. Basically, if you're Italian you know how to make this food at home. That doesn't make it bad, just A-OK!\n\nThe party next to us brought a bottle of grape Pucker vodka and tonic water as their BYOB. Hey, whatever works...
Legends of the North Shore on the top 25 restaurants in Pittsburgh list? I would have to disagree. I joined a three dining companions for dinner on a recent Friday night. When I walked in, I was shocked by how incredibly tiny it is inside. We were crammed at a table next to a large party. Our server was very matter of fact and to the point. What I would expect eating at a dinner, not a nice Italian restaurant. I decided to order the Penne Vodka with prosciutto and the wedding soup. The soup was nothing memorable. I enjoyed the crisp bread (foccacia) and oil better. When the entree's arrived, I was surprised that my Penne vodka was garnished with prosciutto. I assumed from the menu that there would be more proscuitto than a thin two inch slice on top of the dish. Overall, the sauce was very good. Not too creamy, not to tomatoey. However, I enjoyed my husband's gnocchi bolognese much more. The gnocchi was tender and the sauce was flavorful and meaty. All in all, I doubt I will be heading back to Legends. With so many great restaurants in Pittsburgh, Legends doesn't make my list.
Stopped by for lunch and was greeted by great-looking focaccia coming out of the oven. Based on that view, I decided to have the eggplant foccacia. It came with homemade Italian wedding soup, which was good with fresh veggies.  It also came with delicious bread and seasoned oil for dipping-- excellent!  The eggplant was good, but honestly, the sun dried tomato and olive tapenade did not enhance the sandwich. It would have rocked with a homemade marinara instead.  \nThe waitress was friendly in a casual way, and the atmosphere was warm and contemporary.  I will try something else next time, as it is worth a return visit!
Rated one of Pittsburgh's best in 2012 I was excited to enter Legends and prepare for  what was sure to be an amazing meal. Upon entering Legends, you get the immediate \"hole in the wall\" vibe (a vibe that I love) with diner style tables and chairs. \n\nWe started with the margarita bruschetta. This was delicious increasing my already high expectations. Our waitress came back- I ordered the Penne Vodka and was excited, but overwhelmingly disappointed. The sauce, although good, is simply ordinary. I've been to countless Italian restaurants in Pittsburgh and could name at least 20 better than Legends.  \n\nHad Legends not received substantial praise I may have not been so disappointed, but when you're touted as one of the best I expect nothing short. To their benefit the restaurant is BYOB, maybe this gets so much praise because everyone's drunk before their meal is served...\n\nFood C+, Service B-
OK-- I need to stick up for this store after reading these other reviews.  I live nearby and have shopped here multiple times a week for the past year or so.  I find this store to be consistently clean and the employees to be helpful, polite, and efficient.  Despite being much smaller than most Giant Eagle stores, this one offers a decent selection of international foods, organic products, and vegetarian/vegan items.  I regularly buy produce here and see no difference between the quality/freshness of what this store offers and what other Giant Eagle stores sell.  The main difference in the produce section is, truly, the lack of dim, directional lighting that new and newly renovated stores use to give their produce that false garden-fresh glow.  Harsh overhead lighting doesn't create much of a mood, but at least I can see clearly enough to choose the freshest items.\n\nAs for all the remarks about this store's clientele...wow.  It's amazing how people in the politically-correct 21st century manage to find new ways to express 19th-century bigotry.  All the comments about \"thugs\" and \"bums\" and \"EBT cards\"?  Why don't you just say what you mean?  Better yet, just stay in the homogenous suburbs where you can buy your mood-lit grapes among \"your kind.\"\n\nNo, this isn't the world's greatest grocery store.  Yes, I sometimes fantasize that it will close and a Trader Joe's will move in.  But it's not the terrifying, stinking hellhole full of rotten food and sneering employees that these other reviews portray it to be.  In dozens of trips here, I've never had anything but an ordinary, inoffensive shopping experience.  Do you really need more from a small, neighborhood grocery store?
It wasn't as horrid as the reviews would lead you to think. Just don't expect a gleaming suburban-style mega-mart and you will be fine.
Why all the hate for this Giant Eagle? Sure it's not in the ritzy part of town but they have everything all the other Giant Eagles have. I've never gone here and not found what I needed. Don't be scared of people just because they are different than you. This Giant Eagle gets the job done and is fine by me! BTW the charmingly ghetto picture is hilarious and we'll fitting! Bravo!
I have been to Atria locations around the city - but this was my first time at the Atria's location at PNC Park on the North Shore of Pittsburgh. My young professional group had an event there last night, so it was a good chance to check it out. Our event was held upstairs, and since we had a small group, they wouldn't guarantee the private room downstairs. It worked for the most part, but those of us that sat in the back had trouble hearing the speakers, and the lights were dim. The noise from the diners downstairs plus the house music carried through and at times it was very loud and hard to hear. I would say that it's a good place for a group dinner, but not for a speaking event. I can't comment on food/drink as I didn't have any. The atmosphere is nice BUT I wasn't too impressed with the layout of the whole place. Didn't see to have a good flow to it. Also, the bathrooms upstairs where our event was were out of order, so everyone had to go downstairs to use the restrooms.
I love coming to PNC Park in the Summer. If i get here early enough i stop by atria's and have a scotch, Johnny Walker, rocks, no water, what did that scotch ever do to you? When i was eating meat I'd get the lobster bisque or a huge plate of pot roast nachos. The meat that covered those nachos were perfectly cooked with a nice char outside, moist and succulent inside. Lots of cheese and other nacho fixens. Good Stuff!\n\nThe burgers here are just as glorious, nice crisp outside, moist and tender inside, good bun, great bacon if i ordered it. Atria's is a great restaurant in PNC Park, but when i go to PNC Park, I want ballpark food. So I head to Atria's when the Bucs are out of town.
Having lived near this Atria's location in the past, I can say that I've spent more than my fair share of time at the PNC Park Atria's. My wife and I stopped in this past week, and for me, I was reminded of why I enjoy Atria's...but this having been our first time at Atria's together, and witnessing my wife's experience, I realized why the place could garner such low reviews.\n\nFor someone like myself, who's actually had enough positive and negative food experiences at Atria's to know exactly what to order and what to steer clear of, I can make the experience a positive one, but that's a situation I'm afforded now thanks to my previous patience and convenience. My wife, opting to stray from my suggestions had an awful dinner. Her plate of bland fish and asparagus left her turned off completely. Luckily, we were using a gift card, so it wasn't as frustrating for her as it could've been. Regardless, walking away from an entire plate of food is disheartening.\n\nThat led me to realize this: If you're only at Atria's once, you're odds aren't that great of having a good experience. That's just the reality of the situation. There are a handful of really good things on the menu that I LOVE. The parmesan crusted chicken is really good, although it can sometimes be a little too oily. The pot roast is excellent, but it's way too heavy for most of the year...ESPECIALLY during baseball season when they're busier. Their chili is really on-point...especially paired with their bread, and the salmon salad is excellent. Although, I don't like the salmon, so I swap the salmon for chicken for a great salad option. The carrot cake is insanely good, but truth be told, it's not homemade. I could care less, though, as it's still some of the best carrot cake I've ever eaten. Period. Other notable items are the pot roast nachos, crab cakes, red skin smashed potatoes, and the reuben.\n\nThat's really where the positives end, though. I've learned to steer clear of the burgers because of the inconsistency with which they're prepared. I've received more undercooked burgers at Atria's than any other restaurant, and it's just not worth the gamble anymore. My filets have always been perfectly-prepared, but the one time I got a strip it was practically burned on one side and undercooked on the other. Failing to cook burgers and steaks correctly isn't that surprising, but deciding to serve them to customers despite their incorrect preparation IS surprising...and poor.\n\nI know that the last time I had salmon on my salad, the fish tasted \"off\" and I paid the price for it later. I've never given a single fish meal a chance there since (we're talking years now). Hence, my request for chicken on my salads now. Most of the meals that I've had are average, and I've practically tried the entirety of the menu over the years, so believe me when I say it.\n\nWhy do I continue to go? Well, because the few items that I do love, are crave-worthy, and having become a regular (less so, nowadays), the service that I received at the bar was always excellent. Daniel and Roy have always provided  great service to me, and good service goes the distance, as far I'm concerned, so it's been worth stopping in from time-to-time. Unfortunately, if I can't sit at the bar, I don't always stick around, as the service at the tables is really hit-or-miss. For every good server they have, they have two more that could care less about their jobs...especially during peak times.\n\nRegardless, this is my favorite Atria's location, because it's the least \"stuffy\" and pretentious location of them all, but there's still a lot of room to improve...and I hope it does.
Atria's is a pretty good restaurant if you're at or near PNC Park - as expected from anything located in a ballpark it's not the best restaurant ever but it's consistently decent.  On different visits I have tried the Margherita Flatbread and Cheese Dip which were both fine (although the fried pita chips were really salty) as well as the Diablo pasta which was okay and the Pork Filet Gorgonzola which was quite good.  In an ideal world I would walk over the bridge and eat at a more unique restaurant downtown but when I have to choose from something nearby Atria's is one of the better choices.  A number of my colleagues prefer this as their go-to restaurant and while I'm not quite as enamored as them I definitely consider this an A-OK restaurant and I'll be back.
I was neither particularly pleased nor dissatisfied with my lunch experience here... It was just \"meh.\" It's kinda pricey for what you get, but the service is prompt and friendly and the music is fun and modern.\n\nThey serve a mean crab bisque. It was deliciously creamy, quite generous with the crab meat and very filling without that nasty sick after-feeling. The coconut shrimp (with a nice crunchy, coconut-y breading) was also very tasty, and the portion was satisfyingly large for an app! The house salad was just a typical salad of iceberg and romaine lettuce drenched in shredded cheddar cheese and sprinkled with a few other veggies. Nothing special.  Just a random quirk I noticed:  for being a rather classy restaurant, I was surprised that they didn't add a slice of lemon to my glass of water (though I'm sure you could ask for it).  \n\nWould I recommend the place? Probably not but it was certainly not a bad experience! Just one that didn't stand out for the money you'll spend.
Average experience. The entrees that we chose (chicken marsala and chicken piccata) were fine but under seasoned. The cheese plate was the best part of the meal: four cheeses selected and served by Carole \"dear heart\" from Penn Mac. Exceptional choices, good crusty bread and she's lovely and a Pittsburgh institution. \n\nService was spotty. I was there representing my company. We produced the music that evening. I'm not sure if the server assumed that we wouldn't be ordering food or what, but after we ordered the cheese course and wine, he came back only to attempt to take away our menus not to take our order. I had to ask to order entrees. It was just odd. I've heard similar things from others that have been there on our music nights.
I decided to check out downtown Pittsburgh on my trip for a family visit recently. We took a walk around the area and this location caught our eye. It had outdoor seating and was right outside of PNC Park. We decided on the Pot Roast nachos as an appetizer. It was pretty good. Nice chunks of Pot Roast and various cheeses. I than decided on the Atria combo which had andouille sausage, Perogies, Chicken and Sauerkraut. I figured that this would be something different. The sausage was great and so were the perogies. I did not care for the chicken too much. It was dark meat with bread crumbs. I prefer white meat so that was probably the reason. I also tasted my friends steak  hoagie. I am from the area so I have had better. It was a little dry and not enough cheese and onions. The outdoors ambiance was great! Pittsburgh has a great downtown. Nothing like Detroit. It was alive, various things to do and was a beautiful city. Overall the restaurant was a good experience. The waiter was great and funny also. We also talked to some people sitting beside us. it made for a good time. However, I would opt for another place when I visit again.
Okay hold the phone, I wouldn't call Pickles an Emporium.\n\nI haven't actually eaten their sandwiches, what I typically order is the bacon cheddar fries, which are pretty damn tasty for a pizza shop.  Anyway on the bacon Cheddar fries there is tons of melted cheese and real bacon!!!  Oh yeah  a total guilty pleasure. \n\n\nAnyway, I was raised eating at Pickles. This was our go to pizza place at home but not due to quality, but more do their willingness to deliver to our house.  In the neighborhoods I live in \"the pizza man don't deliver around here anymore.\"  \n\n\nFor some tasty fries, I would highly recommend Pickles, for anything else I would suggest going else where.
Went there for lunch today. Needing some food other than hospital food. Short walk to it from Allegheny General. \n\nThought about ordering lunch special,  but she said if we wanted more than two slices get the pizza on sale. 10 slice pizza for $8.25 and one topping. \n\nGreat pizza. Crust was excellent, tiny bit of garlic and lightly sweet. Ham was tasty Canadian bacon. Nice size to for price.  Pop sold by can at .85cents.\n\nLady at counter said she made crust and bread from scratch,  we could tell.\n\nI would have given it a 4 star but bathroom cleanliness held them back. I didn't add the street people into my review. The street is being revitalized so a lot of businesses are open and some closed. If it was farther from the liquor store the street people would not have been so plentiful.
The ribs were great with mild sauce.  The chicken with hot sauce was ok.  Hot sauce was nice and hot,  but not the greatest flavor.  Mild sauce was delicious.  Slaw wasn't very good.  Mac salad was good.  Collard greens... Well,  not for me... \n\nDefinitely worth a visit.
My goodness, that's a big burrito you serve! \n\nWe stumbled across Firewaters Sunday afternoon when we were both very hungry. My big draw was the Coca-Cola awning because I was dying for a diet coke. We grabbed a table outside with a pretty good view of the baseball stadium and a fantastic view of all the scalpers. \n\nWe ordered a medium burger that came out well and a veggie burrito which was eeee-normous. The fries were quite good and the burrito was pretty tasty. it's not for traditionalists, as the toritlla was more like a wrap, but I really liked it. They were generous with the beans and cheese. \n\nIt's was cheap and fast, a pretty good deal.
The current era which is now on a 17 seasons under .500 streak is just horrid and deserves one star at best. The '71 through '79 and the early '90s eras get 5 stars for having such cool players as Roberto Clemente, Willie Stargell and Spanky!\n\nThrow in PNC Park (with ex-Bucco Manny Sanguillen's BBQ stand), the always cool black and mustard unis (bring back the '7s retro look) and the fact one day the Lumber Company wil return (when are the Bucs going to return to scouting Latin America again?).\n\nPlus the perogy races are classic!
A cautious 3.5 stars here but....\n\nS-W-E-E-E-E-E-E-E-E-E-E-E-E-E-P!\n\nThe Bucs swept the Royals in interleague play this past weekend!  And okay, I was there for the second game, not the third.  But I took my dad to the game for an early Father's Day gift.  We had a wonderful time as the Pirates defeated the Royals 5-3.  And I'm watching the Pirates with guarded optimism here.  They're off to the same great start they were last year. An article in the paper said that they were playing small ball, which must eman they're working on the little things, the fundamentals.  \n\nNow let's see if we can keep the momentum going for the rest of the season and finish with at least a winning record for a chiange.  Oh well, at least with the Chicago Cubs sucking so badly we won't be in the cellar.
I've been going to Miller's since I was just a little tyke.  Unfortunately, over the years, this joint has gone downhill.  \n\nI think I really began to notice it when they put a big tv in the dining area.  Now you can imagine that you're home in front of your own tv while you dine.  Holy Hell.  It's a mess.  \n\nThe food isn't nearly as good as it once was.  The pierogi special is good if it's on the menu - they are Pierogi Plus pierogies.  The bread is Bread Work's bread, so that's good.  My favorite thing on the menu used to be the devonshire, but only the brave try it these days.  In the grand scheme of life, this place is a fine local blue collar restaurant, but compared to the days of old the food is just blah.\n\nps. The ladies who wait here are always and have always been the nicest of folk.
I'm underwhelmed. Being a Mike & Tonys kind of girl, I was not really expecting a whole lot. But this meal left me feeling totally \"meh\". I've personally made better tzatziki sauce before. Their gyro meat has some flavor but it's way too salty for me. I give it a 3 purely for the fact that their staff is helpful and super nice. That always makes a difference to me. Still it is not going to be enough to make me want to go back. I'm sticking with my original choice!
Hummus is very good. Not a place you'd want to \"go out\" for dinner but great for a quick bite to eat. Would go there again.
It's a used media store chain. Not to much to say about it. I usually shy away from these places because they run the independent stores out of business. I still stand by that but I gotta say that no matter which one of these I walk into, the people working here always know they're stuff and are really cool which makes me want to buy something from them. This one is no exception, I asked the guy if I could see something on the top shelf and the guy practically ran to the back room to get a ladder, now that's service!  I still have to knock some stars off for the low trade in value they give and the fact that their prices on some stuff is pretty steep for used. Still, the employees rock!
I think I might open a store, right next door to you.
Standard Pittsburgh dive. They had Yuengling, Newcastle and Guinness on tap and basketball on the television so no complaints.
It's a bar that you can smoke in... what more do you want?  If you need to feel pretentious while you are out, you can go to Diesel which is a 3 star 'club'\n\nThe apple has dart boards and will order your favorite beer for you if you ask them.  A good crew works the bar, and my buddy lives right by there so I am there too much.\n\nPerhaps pricier than it should be, but again:  It's a bar.  If you are looking for the cheapest place to drink, stay home with your Keystone Ice...  I like my Guinness Draught, thank you!
The apple is decent if you live within walking distance but nothing to write home about.  Average draft selection.  Didn't get into bottles but found that the bartender that happened to be working was not overly friendly.  Went for a happy hour and it was dead.  Haven't been to the Apple in years but seems like a good place to meet friends and play darts all night.  Smoker friendly.  I couldn't tell the crowd that frequents it because it was so dead.
Pretty good place to grab a few drink. Extremely expensive for the area however. I also don't understand their happy hour, .50 cents off drafts? That's pretty lame if you ask me considering their happy hour is always dead.
For six years now I have been threatening to purchase a salt lamp for my bedside table. The early spring and late summer when I'm using allergy medication like a fish uses water, I thought a little natural relief while I sleep would help alleviate the morning sneezing fits. I got one here for an Amazon price of relatively cheap. I also bought some healing stones and crystals. She also carries some impressive jewelry and stones that can be set in necklaces and brackets. The place is huge, and just when you think you've seen everything, you can walk down a hew hallway and find more things. \n\nGreat little shop that reminds me of a shop in a Stephen King novel called Needful Things. Although that shop was owned by Satan and made his customers do unspeakable things to each other, this is far from that. But you do get the feeling here that we are not alone and there are other realms to our world. Books galore on the occult, spirit worlds, shadow people, how to rid your home of evil spirits and I just wish she wasn't closing the store when I was walking in. She was nice enough to stay open until I purchased my salt lamp. I'll return and get my fill of this place and look around for four or five hours.
I recently had my 21 birthday and booked Entertainment Unlimited to DJ at my party. I had talked to him we worked out types of music and a playlist that would best fit my party and it's theme. He got there on time and was set up before my party guests showed up. It was the best party I've ever had, he was interactive and got everyone dancing! Overall it was a great time and I would be happy to recommend them to anyone.
Kuhn's seems like they pride themselves on being a \"Family\" themed grocery store.\n\nI've been to Kuhn's quite a few times, since they are located so close to me, and have found their products to be much more expensive than other grocery stores, and I understand that they take pride in what they offer to their customers and buy their produce locally. But, to me, as a cheap ass, I don't care how they get their products, all I really care about is the price. And their prices are too expensive. \n\nThe store itself is very small and cramped, I get confused very easily as to where to find some products.\n\nI do like the friendly atmosphere inside Kuhn's though, all of the employees seem really nice and are eager to please and talk to you, and for that I'll give them three stars. But other than the friendliness, I'm going to Aldi, where stuff is MUCH cheaper..
A-OK barber shop.  Typical old school shop with 3 chairs.  My kids and I go here and they do good job including shaving the neck.  Depending on the clientele, it can be fun to listen and partake in the conversation.
Nice neighborhood coffee.  Small but always seems to have room.  Good selection of teas also..  Good scones and pastries.  CT dos have some specialty blends.
I can't believe this place has not been reviewed yet.  If you live in beechview you already know about this place, but if you don't you need to try this place out if you are passing through.\n\nAt first glance, you will barely notice the bar/restaurant from the exterior.  Inside it is your typical Pittsburgh bar with a some additional seating in the back.  So you would think, why take the time to review this place.  Well they have a old-fashion popcorn machine which they offer free while you are drinking at the bar and this popcorn was phenomenal.  But it only gets better, happy hour pints for 90 cents.  So, delicious popcorn + beer= Great afternoon after work.  Well at this point, I was like wow, this little place well served its purpose for a cheap happy hour on my way home from work. \n\nAnd then: The Reuben.  Now I am not the connoisseur of Reubens but, this one was absolutely flavorful.\n\nAll in All- check this place out if you are in the area and need to grab a cold one.
Sushi Three is located in a strip of shops on Beverly Road, alongside a coffee shop, florist, several banks, and two pizza places.  This and Little Tokyo are, to my knowledge, the only sushi restaurants in Mt. Lebanon.\n\nSushi Three has an extensive menu that seems to have expanded since the last time I visited, and has lots more than just sushi.  There is a long list of appetizers, tempuras and teriyaki dishes, and some Chinese offerings.  The main focus, the sushi, takes up a large portion of the menu, and there are many different rolls, ranging from the basic kappa rolls to the complex southside roll (shrimp, smoked eel, fish flakes, cucumber, spinach, mushrooms, egg and caviar).  As a vegetarian, I appreciate the vegetable sushi platter, which I have never seen anywhere else and only costs $12.  There is even a separate vegetarian menu.\n\nWhile I do appreciate the wide-ranging menu, I just can't like the atmosphere.  It's always very quiet and dark inside, and I always get the feeling of being in a cave.  I prefer to get take-out or delivery.\n\nOverall, I prefer Little Tokyo, but with Sushi Three's improved menu and large number of vegetarian options, my rating may change soon.
Sushi selection limited...  Miso soup tasted a little fishy.
Green Garden is not, by any means, the pinnacle of Chinese food. It is, however, a suitable meal for reasonable prices.\n\nThe staff is very friendly and casual. After so many years of eating there, they know my family and it is nice to remembered after having spent so much money there.\n\nOur regular dishes of fried dumplings, chicken and broccoli, etc. are all well done standards of Chinese takeout. It may not be spectacular but it gets the job done.\n\nWhen push comes to shove, Green Garden is an acceptable restaurant with great service. I will always be a regular (save something horrendous happens with one of our meals, but is hasn't happened yet).
Ordered General Tso's shrimp, Kung Pao chicken, soup and egg rolls. Price was slightly higher and portions maybe slightly smaller than similar stores, but food quality was certainly in line with food of this type.  \n  The only notable ding I would give is the spicing. Both of our dishes are supposed to have a bit of spice flavor, and they are noted on the menu as spicy dishes, but there was a notable absence of spice.  There weren't even chilis in the Kung Pao sauce.  It's like someone forgot to spice the dishses.
Cool pool hall.  The front is a small neighborhood bar type of place that has good beer prices and almost everything seemed to be on special the night we were there.  The pool hall in the back was much bigger than I expected it to be.  There were a lot of tables and plenty of room.  If you see the \u20ac20 note hanging up on the wall that was from a friend of mine that donated it during our trip to Pittsburgh.
Since moving to dormont, I've been here few times for darts and drinks. This place is divided into a bar (in the front) and a huge pool hall at the back along with a single dart board (manual) which is the only reason we come here every once in a while. Although you're not allowed to smoke in the pool hall - the hall reeks of cigarette smoke residue. So, do be prepared to take a shower and do the laundry as soon as you get home.\n\nBesides, that - I think it's a pretty cool hang out place if you're into pool. The people here are friendly, the service has been good so far and the prices for the drinks are super reasonable.
Tom's Diner is a bit retro, a bit hole-in-the-wall and a bit of a good deal!\n\nThe wait staff is super friendly and on top of the service, the decor is retro and the booths are true diner style. \n\nI ordered the breakfast burrito. It was pretty tasty and very filling. The salsa it came with wasn't anything phenomenal, but I'm ok with that.  The peppers and onions were well cooked, the sausage was tasty (it's sausage, not chorizo) and the breakfast potatoes on the side were just ok. They needed a little salt, which I understand and I think some ketchup would've done them well.  \n\nThis wasn't the best burrito I've ever had but it was good and super filling. I ate it around 9 and wasn't hungry until 4pm! Well done!\n\nBreakfast burrito breakdown\nThe food: It was good. It was great, it wasn't bad, it was good.\nThe value: That burrito was just under $6 and it was a monster!\nThe experience: it's nice and quiet in the mornings! I bet it gets really crowded though.\nWould I return?: Hmmm, I don't think I need to.\n3 stars?: It was good!
The food is ok and I like that they're 24 hours. One of the things that I don't like is that you sit yourself but you don't figure it out until a while. Waitress also take a while to take your order. Other than that is ok.
Came back for the holidays, and stopped by Beto's.  The pizza hasn't changed a bit, and it remains in my top three in the town.  \n\nHowever, can someone please teach the kids working there how to keep up an establishment?  Not once did I see someone clean tables or remove the number tags from the table.  We had to clean our own table.  The floor was littered with straw wrappers and napkins, especially under our table.  The bathroom was in shambles and my friend mentioned that the ladies room was out of tp.  \n\nTherefore--three stars, with the pizza saving the review from total damnation.
Being from Chicago, I'm a pizza snob.  Yeah, I know, it's like comparing apples to oranges, but still...this is my review for Beto's.  Anywhoo--this was a unique experience...the pizza comes out of the oven with just sauce, then mozzerella is piled on for a semi-melt addition.  Who would have thought of this!? \n\nThe pizza itself was good, and the sauce decent, but the whole semi-melt, I'll have to get used to.  :-)  I'd be back for a second shot at it!
Blah blah blah, cold toppings, piled high cheese, yinzer childhoods, etc. Beto's gets three stars because it is inconsistent - and they themselves admit it. I've had pizza from here that is outright bad, I've also had pizza here which nudged against my all time top pizzas list. Usually there will be a cycle for me where I will have a really good slice, and convince myself I have to go back there - sometimes in the same week. Then I'll have a bad slice and forget about it for months, maybe even years. Then I'll be in the area again and the cycle will continue. \n\nThe cold cheese doesn't bug me because you get so much (portion size here is far beyond ample. $1.25 for each slice - 4 is well beyond my maximum - gets you about a 1/3 of a bag of mozzarella, an extra $.50 will get you as much of whatever topping you feel like having). If you get take-out, it'll pretty much melt by the time you get home if you leave the box shut. \n\nOne thing to note - this is my favorite place to get black olives on a pizza, since they don't go into the oven.
I guess for what it is, a thick crust with a canned tomatoes and uncooked mid/low grade cheese, it was fine. It's just not my style of pizza. They do have some of the hottest wings I have every eaten, the very aptly named \"after burners\". The sauce is very tasty with an INTENSE slow burn.
I'm a fan of Betos. I like the fact that the cheese isn't always melted. The slices are square and the prices are reasonable. Ranch dressing or bleu cheese and you're good to go! The pizza itself is simple: crust, sauce, and cheese. I'm pretty certain that you have to go pick it up, or that's just been my traditional order of things. It's been a while since I've had their pizza, but it's definitely worth the trip.
The pizza is ok. The tomato chunks are delicious and the pepperoni too. But they don't bake it and the stuff all slides off the crust. Overloaded too much with cheese . Not horrible but certainly not the best.
With the advent of the Super Bowl just a few days away, the beer distributors are licking their chops at the business coming their way. Of course, this means the end of football season, so sales will drop off. \n\nBanksville Beer has a great business, and awesome location. They carry a good selection of all types of beer. Pittsburgh is suddenly having a love affair with IPA's, something I've been in love with for about 9 years now. Great selection here, including 60 and 90 minute, Victory, Ithaca Flower Power, etc. \n\nGood selections of your swill brews (PBR, less filling, tastes great) and your college frat boy brews, you know what I mean! They also carry snacks.
Banksville Beer is one of those places I very rarely have to shop at; I don't drink a ton of beer and given a choice between cider (which you can get here) and wine (not so much, obviously), wine will usually win. \n\nAs a result, one stop here can keep my cider/beer supply stocked for months. Now, while I've never left the shop empty handed and I LOVE browsing the fantastic and varied beer selection here, I have admittedly had trouble finding specific favorite beverages of mine, such as flavors of Magner or even varieties of Blue Moon. But I think this has more to do with my taste (remember, not the biggest beer person, more of a cider/wine person) than the shop itself - you can always at least find the basic ciders and beers here. And again, I've never left empty handed despite my snobby tastes: usually I leave with a whole case of Woodchuck, and most recently a whole case of Fall Woodchuck. Yum! Also, the men behind the desk are usually pretty good about asking if you need a hand taking things to your car. (Usually.)\n\nStill, the parking situation here keeps me from giving the place 4 stars. Getting into the lot here can be a little frightening as you hope the person behind you is paying attention and slowing down while you turn into the lot. The lot itself is pretty tiny so problems can arise if too many people stop in for beer at once. Finally, getting out is even more terrifying than pulling in, because no one slows down on Banksville, ever, to let you out. Be prepared to sit for a few minutes if traffic is heavy.\n\nHappy shopping, beer lovers!
Eh, been here a few times since moving to Dormont. It's just okay. I've been to many Eat n' Park restaurants around Pittsburgh and this one is nothing special.\n\nA royal pain to park at, and the food is just mediocre. People are nice though and have no complaints about the service. I would come here after hitting up the bars or for dessert one night, but that's about it. Banksville location is much better in my opinion.
This company was better when the father (William Wessner) owned and managed it. I bought both an AC system and high efficiency furnace from them. Since his two sons have taken over the business, it has gone downhill. Now when the service man comes to inspect and clean your system, it seems like he's always trying to find something wrong, even when everything is operating just fine. As a result, I've stopped getting checkups done.
I think this placed has been re-modeled or at least that is what my buddy thought. I had never been there before so I had nothing to compare it to. They had over 25 beers on tap which was very nice. The menu seemed good and the appetizers we had were tasty. There were not a lot of places to sit but we found a couple of seats at a table. They have at least 4 or 5 TV's to watch whatever local sports are on. I think my friend will be going back more now that it has been updated and I will only be back on my next trip to Pittsburgh. Parking is street, the service was good, and it seems like a nice local place to hang out for a few cocktails.
Draft selections are good...service is lousy...food is sub par. Not in a hurry to return.
Cain's Saloon has popped up on my radar repeatedly since it opened - many people have stood by it as a fantastic dinner spot and bar. And while I certainly didn't dislike my experience here overall I can't say I quite get what all the fuss is about.\n\nI came here for dinner and drinks with a friend and upon first entering we were pleased; the staff got us seats and our waitress very patiently helped us navigate their beer and cider options - which took a while, there were just so many! I truly do praise our waitress and the bar staff for taking my companion's final request, which was a little off-menu. No one complained and they whipped up my friend's drink while I went for a Pear Magner cider. \n\nThe particular night that we went was wing night, and while wings did sound wonderful we ultimately went for a plate of loaded fries in addition to our separate meals. It took a while to get them, but we figured it was getting busier since it was the evening and we let that slide. Here was where the meal began to lose some of its shine - while at first the fries were absolutely delicious, the more of them that I ate the less appetizing they tasted. I suspect that while the top layer was composed of perfectly cooked fries, the last layer of fries at the bottom of the plate was just drenched in extra grease and oil that kind of ruined the fries themselves for me. Plus, when ordering my sandwich I had asked for one of three sauce options listed on the menu - but once it arrived I realized after biting into it that my sandwich contained the wrong sauce. I didn't bother complaining at that point because of how busy it was - I didn't want to wait for a replacement meal; the sauce I got wasn't too bad or spicy for me, so the sandwich itself still tasted good, but it was still a bit frustrating. After actually finishing our meal, it took an INCREDIBLY long time for us to spot our waitress and flag her down for our check. We're not sure why she disappeared for so long; it was definitely odd to have our service go from above average to below average.\n\nAnd when we ducked into the bathroom on our way out? Good Lord, was that a tiny room! I almost hit someone with the door because you literally only have a foot or two between the door when it opens and the wall, so if anyone is standing on the other side they're often in the door's way by default. And it was almost impossible to sit in the stalls, they were so tiny. Definitely be careful when entering the bathrooms, folks.\n\nNeedless to say, my experience was pretty mixed - it definitely started out strong but it kind of went downhill throughout the night, although it never hit actual flat-out bad levels. I'd still come back to Cain's if someone wanted to, as their food was certainly enjoyable enough. It's absolutely a decent place with some decent options for food. It just wasn't incredibly impressive to me after all the hype I'd heard.
Our night at Cain started out as 4/5 stars.  This was my first visit and I was blown away by the extensive menu and attentive service.  I ordered the Shrimp and Strawberry salad - not something I would usually order at a bar.  But I was not disappointed! The shrimp were of a decent size and seasoned well. The salad was huge and at $12 was just right.  My guests ordered a variety of items including Buffalo Chicken dip (amazing); Spinach Artichoke Dip (great); and for their entrees - the Grilled Romaine salad topped with Filet; Surf and Turf ($14 - WHAT?); and a Steak and Egg something sandwich. Everyone seemed delighted with their respective meals and the drinks flowed all night long thanks to our wonderful server whose name I cannot recall.  \n\nUnfortunately, as the evening progressed the bouncer began his shift. Sigh.  I'm sorry, but he just wasn't nice. Not that bouncers need to be cuddly, but dang.  We were seated at the table closest to the door, a table which he clearly despises.  He rudely asked us (the two people seated in the outer seats) to move closer into the table when there was really nowhere for us to go; citing that patrons walking in couldn't do so with us sitting there. Lies.  There was plenty of room for anyone to walk anywhere.  He repeatedly got an attitude with one of our guests both vocally and with his body language; going so far as to seat his stool so close to our table that shoulders were touching. Get over yourself, dude.  I'll visit Cains again, but either won't go when there's a bouncer on duty (which is a ridiculous thing to have to do); or request a table away from the door and annoy the hostess. Either way, he's not a great ambassador for what I'm sure is a great place.
Stopped in for breakfast today.\n\nPros: \n-we were seated almost immediately, and it was crowded!  \n-the meals we got were great!\n\nCons:\n-service was super slow. We waited over 10 minutes for a server to take drink orders after we were seated. I had told my wife that we were going to leave if someone didn't come over in 3 minutes more. It wasn't just our server, it seemed like many tables were waiting a long time.
I had heard a lot of different things about Cain's before coming here for the first time around 2pm on a Sunday afternoon. What I heard was true after dining here- food is really good, service leaves a lot to be desired. Two of us were the first to arrive for a party of six. We waited a good 10 minutes at the \"please wait to be seated sign\". No one even acknowledged us standing there until two other members of our party finally arrived. They were semi busy but cleared out quickly since it was a 4:25 steelers game and several tables there looked like they were heading to the game. Anyways, a server came over about 5 minutes after we were sat. To get our drink order. She was pretty slow getting our drinks out to us. The other two members of our party arrived by then and when she came back she said the kitchen was running 30 minutes behind and we should order appetizers now if we wanted any. Ok so we ordered 6 old bay wings, 12 thai chili wings, and 2 orders of the cheese sticks. The cheese sticks were the best cheese sticks I have ever eaten! They are huge-3 to an order but these are so thick and gooey....and the marinara served with them is a sweeter marinara, it's very good. I didn't try the old bay wings but they were quickly devoured by the rest of the table. The Thai chili wings had a very nice sweeter flavor. And they were large wings too. Very tasty. She came to take our food order prior to our appetizers coming out. They did take awhile but she did warn us they were slow. Entrees came out quickly however. I had ordered the BBQ pulled pork sandwich. It had a horseradish BBQ sauce that sounded really interesting. The server came over halfway through the appetizers and said they ran out of the pulled pork. I was disappointed but I ordered a turkey Rachael with sweet potato waffle fries instead. The sandwich came on marble rye with coleslaw Swiss and thousand island. The fries weren't great and we're kind of soggy. The sandwich though was excellent. Real rotisserie turkey and lots of cold slaw which is how I like it. A steak and egg hoagie was ordered with chips-she said it was really good and it was huge portion wise. Another ordered the pastrami sandwich and another ordered the pastrami salmon blt. Both were said to be tasty. The quesadilla burger and the bacon and blue cheese burger were also ordered and were quickly eaten and said to be delicious . 4 of us took home half of our sandwiches - portions are huge! Our server didn't check on us and it was us who had to flag he down for drinks. This is a great place to watch a game, lots of beers on tap, good food. Service needs to improve but I wll still come back again because the actual meal was tasty and priced right
Ok.  This used to be our favorite spot in the area but the past two times we have been here were not the best.   Today's meal was cold burnt and  rubbery.  We had fish and chips.  Burnt mushy fish and cold over cooked chips.  Loaded potato soup was so thick you could use it for paste.  The app we had was the best part of the meal.   \n\nThe last time we wets here my fianc\u00e9 got food poisoning from a burger special.   \n\nI'm beginning to think we need to go elsewhere from now on.
Met some friends for breakfast.  We had 5 and there were no tables available on our arrival.  The hostess said we can have the table for 4 with someone seating in the window box, just don't lean on the window... We said okey-dokey!  Waitress was quick and had coffee right away. She was fast with refills and any waitress that went by with the pot would check to see if we needed refills.  Had an omelet that is very large with veggies.  It was cooked perfectly and the veggies must have been put on the pan first to make sure they were warn and tender.  Potatoes were OK, but nothing special. \n\nThe table was crowded for five, and just when the food was placed on our table, one friend who said he could not make it showed up...Now a table for six.. Not really, but the waitress did not blink and took that order quickly and that food arrived fast... Must have worked with the kitchen to get the order fast.  Thank you!  \n\nWas able to get a taste of the french toast and it was very good.  Someone in our group had the eggs benedict and said they were really good!\n\nWhen your done, cross the street and go to Potomac Bakery and take some sweets home, you'll be glad you did.
The Dor-Stop was crowded and we did have to wait for about 10 minutes.  Not to bad on a Sunday morning.  Waitress was quick to get coffee to us.  It did take a little longer than you would expect to get the meal...we all started to get really hungry.  \n\nOrdered the Eggs Benedict, which were pretty ordinary.  Comes with the ordinary home fries.
We've been here several times, and the food is always good. Nothing spectacular, or amazing, but always filling and tasty. Typical breakfast fare. I love anything benedict, but as a veggie, hate havint to pay for the ham, and order it w/o ham. So a waitress here taught me a little money saving trick, which I will always be grateful. Order texas toast, two eggs over easy and a side of hollandaise sauce. Then build your own eggs benedict. Saves a vegetarian about $2 on a main which is great!\n    I would give it four stars if it weren't for the insane busy-ness of this place. It would be really great if they could expand. They also could really use chairs and benches outside for people who are waiting. I'm sure it's better during the week, but as a 40 hour a week working couple, weekends are the only time we can make it there.
My husband and I were looking for a new place to try for brunch on Labor Day. Instead of going to our standby, the Original Pancake house, I suggested we try the Dor-Stop. We arrived at 12:30 and were soon joined by the 3rd person in our party. The hostess informed us that we were next on the list for a table and would be seated soon. I was surprised at how busy it was on a holiday. This small little diner was packed with people. Every table was full as well as every seat at the counter. About ten minutes later, a waitress came over and called two parties that arrived after us. My husband had to go talk to her and explain how we were waiting longer. She apologized for skipping us and was able to seat us right away. Once seated, I had a difficult time deciding what to order from the extensive menu. Wow! They have a huge selection. \n\nI finally decided on the special, Apple Harvest French toast with bacon. When I asked the waitress about the special, she had a difficult time describing it but I still wanted to give it a try. Once we ordered, it took well over 15 minutes for our food. I understand that they were very busy but that amount of time did seem a bit excessive for diner food. When my french toast arrived, it was not exactly what I was expecting per the description but, it was very tasty. The french toast had a nice crisp on it and the cream cheese sauce had a lot of flavor. However, for being APPLE harvest french toast, it was certainly lacking apples or apple flavoring. This french toast would have been perfect with slices of cooked apples on top instead of the small apple pieces that were mixed in with the cream cheese. The bacon also lacked a nice crispiness. \n\nI also had the opportunity to try my husband's banana chocolate chip pancakes. Although they looked delicious with the bananas and chocolate chips baked into the pancakes, they tasted rather salty. My husband agreed with my assessment. It seemed like the cook was a little heavy handed when adding salt to the batter. Overall, I wasn't overly impressed though, I would give the Dor Stop a second chance based on their huge selection to choose from.
Went there with a friend. Had egg Benedict and did not like it. The turkey meat smells funny. And the waitress kept rushing us. Not sure why it's so crowded. Will not visit again.
Yes... Dorstop was on the Food Network but I believe that the show has brought too much business to the local breakfast/lunch restaurant. Most of the time the servers are cranky and rushing so they forget items or customer needs and the food isn't as good as it used to be. Either they need to expand their staff and restaurant or many others will see what I have.
I've been here twice, for brunch, with some friends. \nMy first time was confusing for my friend and I, because there was a line and we didn't know we had to sign in. After we were seated, we ordered food. The waitress was slow and unfriendly. She seemed irritated that we were there. The food was amazing, as our orders were small and uncomplicated, we just wanted to try the food. The second time was pretty much the same. The food was great and filling, but the servers were unfriendly and slow. Disheartening and not really worth dealing with for some pancakes. Try it out for the legend, like I did, but beyond the food, it's not much.
Camp's has a cult following.   As soon as you walk in you can smell the melting mozzarella.  Love that smell.  W grew up on Camp's and is almost in the cult, so we go to Camp's from time to time.  It has been a real long time since our last visit so it was fun to stop back in.  \n\nThe crust is a medium thickness, not to thin and not to thick, and somewhat crunchy.  One friend calls it almost like a biscuit, I really don't get that, but it is a little chewy and just a little brown around the edge.  One thing that I notice is they do not overload the pizza with sauce and toppings like some places.  Enjoyed our pizza and will be back.  Have had the hoagie in the past and if I remember correctly, it is very good.
Hard to complain too much about a $7 buffet.   Food wasn't bad,  I've certainly had worse Indian in Pittsburgh.   Limited selection that they don't refill often enough.   Odd atmosphere,  they need some background music or something.  The soap opera on tv just didn't cut it.  They do give you fresh naan bread which is nice, old buffet naan always sucks.  Good if you're in the area and need a cheap lunch but not worth going out of your way for.
I think the quality and flavor of the food keeps me coming back even though the old woman is very unpleasant, I have never been there when there was more than three or four people in the whole restaurant. I don't know how long they could survive and that is unfortunate.  On one occasion I was waited on by a young man who was very friendly and pleasant , where did he go? This place has potential but the old lady must go.
It's kinda strange when you enter because you literally hit the hotel's registration counter, and then you wonder where the restaurant is because it looks like the hotel couldn't fit a restaurant.  It's to the left of the counter.  \n\nAnyhow, I have mixed feelings.  One, it's a huge buffet.  Two, it's cheap (8.99 for dinner, maybe 7.99? for lunch) and includes all you can drink soda, chai, etc.  Three, mango lassi is part of the buffet.  Four, the food on the buffet can be very strange.  \n\nSo, pricewise, when you include free drinks/mango lassi, it's damn worth it, as long as you can find two or three other items you like.  On the other hand, you may not like anything at all on the buffet.  \n\nTheir nan is average in texture but has garlic and herbs, so it's now foccacia nan and tastes delicious.  Papadum is done well.  Lamb kabobs are good, but I wish they had lamb curry.  Their selection of meat is small relative to the size of the buffet.\n\nOn the other hand, they have plenty of vegetarian items, but I prefer to avoid cream, butter and cheese that I didn't eat much of them.  I did try the spinach and they have the most wonderful version of spinach: it's cheesy spinach (but doesn't look like there's melted cheese in it).  Awesome.  \n\nBut then again, their chickpeas were in a sauce that tasted like a combination of spaghetti sauce and ketchup-- yuck!\n\nI suppose this place is geared to fat vegetarians who can have dairy.  Oh, and the atmosphere is pretty lonesome.  It was probably once the grand dining hall of the hotel and now kinda ghostly.  I think it's worth an initial visit and worth it for budget eaters.
This place is crazy! It's an Indian restaurant located within a Days Inn. I love it because it's so quirky. Go for the buffet. Don't bother with the menu. The buffet is just as unique as the location of the restaurant. They usually have several vegetarian options and some meat options also. \n\nWhat makes this buffet so different is the fact that it has malai kofta, pickled toppings, and self serve mango lassi. I have never seen any of the above mentioned items on a buffet.\n\nThe taste is not the best and sometimes the food comes off as warmed over, but it is good and so much fun to stop in and stuff your belly with as much or as little as you like, all while sitting in such an unusual location.
This is pretty close to where we live so we eat there quite a bit. Freshness of food really is hit or miss. I like all of the veggie options there. I think it's a great place to take someone who has never had Indian food. Buffet style lets someone new to this kind of food try a bit of everything. The mango lassi is always delicious! I like that it's NEVER busy, crowded or loud. Anytime we want to to relax for weekend lunch, we head there for the chilled out environment. They are currently undergoing a remodel, so I am looking forward to seeing what it looks like when they are finished.
Eh, it's pretty much a big convenience store to me, but they have the necessities. I prefer the Greentree Giant Eagle, but it is good to have a market within walking distance to us. There's not much more I can say about it.
The white pizza truly is delicious, as are all of their fatty appetizers.  They also offer pasta and other options so there is something to please everyone in any size group you bring to Bado's.
Bado's is a definite neighborhood joint.  Located on Beverly in Mt. Lebo, it's super-busy during meal times.  \n\nFood can be hit and miss.  Best to stick with the pizza, which is pretty good, and the soup and salads, which are quite good.  Place also has a solid beer selection, which is reasonably priced.  That said, we've found that it's a total mistake to order anything else off the menu -- except at breakfast, which again is pretty good.  (Their omlets are huge!)  For example, we once ordered a spinach-artichoke app.  Sounded delicious.  Um... it was creamed spinach (probably of frozen origin) with some canned artichokes in it.  Disappointing to say the least.\n\nAlso be aware that they close the kitchen ... when they feel like it.  I didn't know that until we were drinking a few beers there a while back and they made a kitchen last call.  My sister asked the bartender when the kitchen closes -- he said, when we feel like it.\n\nOne thing is for sure, though, if you go with what they do best (Pizza and beer), you won't be disapointed.  Plus, the servers are true Pittsburgh and generally very sweet.
Friday evening, my folks called me up and said they were out toward Mt. Lebo and asked if my wife and I wanted to meet for dinner. We said sure, and they chose Bado's.\nThe place is nice with a warm, inviting atmosphere. \nOur server was friendly, but clearly dealing with to my tables. He actually made me feel anxious when he'd stop by!\nMy family decided to split a traditional pizza with pepperoni and mushroom. My wife and I added a dozen Guinness/ Honey Mustard wings and split a Reuben.\n\nThe wings came out in record time and were pretty good. Although, I still don't think the Guinness aspect did anything for the flavor. They sure tasted like any other honey mustard wing I've ever had.\n\nThe Reuben was average, but very large. It came with potato chips and a pickle spear. For the $9 price tag, you'd think they could do fries over chips.\n\nThe pizza was good; not great. Based on reviews, I thought the pizza would be even better. Maybe I'm being a bit picky, but there are enough great pizza joints in the city that you can afford to be.\n\nAll in all, Bado's is a nice place to have a casual dinner. I wouldn't go out of my way to try it, but if you're local give it a go. If you want an inviting atmosphere where you can enjoy a beer, have some pizza and enjoy the company of friends or family, this won't disappoint.
This is a popular place so usually skip it due to a short wait list...just don't want to wait  for pizza and so many pizza shops in the area.  No wait on this Friday night.  Bado's has  all that you need..a good beer selection, neat atmosphere, and more than pizza..pub grub, lots of options here.  The wait staff was good and on the ball.  \n\nBut the pizza is what most people talk about so we ordered \"Bado's  Famous Pizza\"   (the traditional, Our most popular crust)\" and the hot wings.  It did not take long and the pizza and wings came out.  The wings were hotter than most places and pretty good.  The pizza crust was a little thicker and nice flavor and chewy, good though I tend to prefer thinner crust.  All in all, a nice place, good beer, good service and food.
Bado's is a nice place to go to get decent food. Pretty average as far as I've seen so far. The reason for 3 stars is that the bar is small and the beer is over priced. I understand it's micro and craft beers on tap but there are other places near by with the micro and crafts for less with better atmosphere. Big plus to the bartenders though, very nice and helpful.
Well returned to Supercuts this afternoon and they agreed that my hair was a little...well...oddly cut behind the ears. Gina (manager) offered to blend it in, but unfortunately I had no time as I was on my way to the airport. I may get it touched up later this week. She was apologetic and offered my next cut to be free. So I am pretty stoked about a free cut and I'm not sure if I should just wait for my hair to grow back or get it touched up.
Meh. I hate how this store is laid out, and everything is tackily displayed. I also hate how they gouge you for printer ink. Huge store, not much going on inside. Too bad it's so close.
This place came highly recommended when I moved to Pittsburgh two years ago. They have an amazing beer selection, good dogs and they must have expanded the place in the last year because they have a pull up garage wall that I never noticed before. Fries are good too. \n\nSomething about it is gimmicky to me but I'll let it go. Might as well stop here first before going to see a movie across the street...
It's getting three stars for the beer selection.  The hot dogs are nothing special, nor is one enough if you're hungry. I can buy a package of hot dogs at Giant Eagle and get the same effect times 10.\nLast time I was there someone said the pizzas looked good. Next time.
Love the BEER CAVE - would make any beer-neanderthal happy! Sorta like grabbing a cold one out of your friend's fridge, except D's has a giant selection.\n\nThe servers were pretty friendly, even when it was last call. I can't say the food was so great, but the beer options and good prices help to make up for it. This seems like an easy-going neighborhood bar, and I bet it's even nicer when the garage door window is open during the warmer months.
The hot dogs are somewhat disappointing and the beer is slightly overpriced, but you come here for the sheer selection of those beers. An enormous beer cave makes one feel like a kid in a beer store. Unfortunately, only their cheaper domestic/import selection is refrigerated, which really sucks cause you can't drink those beers you find int he beer cave right away. Still, if you're looking for selection, this is the place.
Even though they were out of the first beers we asked for (the Dogfish Punkin) this place hit the spot for a junk food craving. Vegetarians: the veggie dog is awesome, not rubbery or pale but nearly mistakable for an actual hot dog. I ordered one with kraut and mustard, and my boyfriend braved the three-cheese dog, which was hard to pick up but looked tasty. Their fries were good, and were generously portioned (definitely shareable) for a $1.50 small. Next time, we'll delve more into their beer selection.
Well, it has good hot dogs and a wide, wide variety of beer, stocking without pretense; Miller and Unibrau.  The hot dogs are good.  The beer is unfortunately not so cheap; six packs aren't much cheaper than just buying four or five beers.  Bad for groups more that four people; great for two or three.
I think their beer selection is much more impressive than their hot dog selection. although, mac and cheese on a hot dog is a pretty amazing option. but really, come for the beer cave and you won't be disappointed.
A day after the St. Patty's day libations the only thing I'm craving is some greasy junk food. Regent square hits the spot with some chili cheese fries straight from D's. Normally I enjoy fishing around the plentiful selection of booze. A hair of the dog was not gonna happen that hangover Sunday. I stuck to shoveling high calorie food into my gullet instead.\n\nThe last time I was here I selected from the hot dog menu, and they weren't that great. How can you mess up a frank you may be wondering?  I can only guess that it's the dogs themselves or the way they are prepared. They're kinda chewy. Dormont dogs rallies but the best Dog I've had was at Dirty Franks in Cbus OH. The chili cheese fries are good though. So today I made sure to get my fries fix in and try a burger. This weekend I had burgers on the brain! My BF and I got the Balboa, the BBQ Texas, and two dogs, mac n' cheese and Mason Dixon with with cheese.\n\nThe burgers had really delish toppings but the meat was so dry. It was overcooked and did not have one bit of juicyness dripping down my hand. Missing that major component they were truly lackluster. The macaroni dog wasn't that great either. Mac n' cheese should be creamy, salty, buttery. So sorry but this weenie came up flat too. I did like the Mason Dixon! The crunchy-ness of the coleslaw made a huge difference but the meat was still chewy and too salty. Could it be that I am too picky when it comes to my meat? If I am shopping for picnic eats I do go for Smith hot dogs WITH the casing or the large sized Hebrew Nationals. Now those are the mouthwatering crowd pleasers I'm talkin' about!
I'm a vegetarian and everything, but man, sometimes all you want is a hot dog.  And you can get this at D's.  Every hot dog or hamburger on their menu can be ordered vegetarian, which is both awesome and rare.  I ordered the Chihuahua (with avocado, cheddar cheese, salsa, and jalapenos) and my table split an order of fries.  SO GOOD.  Almost too good.\n\nAnd you have to take a stroll around the beer cave.  It's not quite as impressive as I was hoping, but definitely worth the splurge to make your own 6-pack.  Last time I was in, I was able to purchase a 6-pack of porters - Anchor, Road Dog, Saranac caramel, Duck-Rabbit, Old Leghumper, and something else I can't remember - for a friend.  I'll definitely go back.
My husband and I live walking distance to D's and we do love D's... but the place is always so crowded and noisy, that I can't give it more than 3 stars.  \n\nI can't add much in the way of reviews here as to the food here, I think everyone has pretty much hit the nail on the head. The dogs are good, and I am happy they have veggie dogs. Beer selection is amazing.\n\nIt's very family friendly, so if that's what you are looking for this is the place for you. Personally, I work with children all day  & love them to death, don't get me wrong... but I find parents here tend to let their children act out a lot, and I find it really distracting and not relaxing. Since I am with children all day, I like my meals to not involve yelling and running children. So to solve that problem, we just order take out and eat our dogs at home!
Generally, I like D's I. The restaurant itself has a cozy feel to it, and their large beer cave is one of the few places where I can get some of my favorite import beer.  Note, the Czechs make more than just Pilsner Urquell. Je to pravda! Most of the staff are very friendly, and the managers are always quick to help if you need assistance.  \n\nSome of you may get angry with me, but I simply cannot review D's I without comparatively rating it against its sister restaurant, D's II in Monroeville.  And no, I couldn't possibly care less that the latter is in an old Pizza Hut.  That's right, I prefer D's II to D's I. Hear me out.  \n\nFirst of all, D's I' drafts are all about a dollar more expensive than those in the suburbs.  Why the upcharge? \n\nAlso, after being spoiled by the very large menu selection at D's II, I'm always a little disappointed when dining at Regent Square.  No wraps, no steak salad, no variety of sandwiches.  I will say that the food they do serve is good.  I enjoy their pizza and their daily hummus offering.  \n\nD's I has a much smaller draft selection and lacks a full bar.  Fine.  It's a smaller location and it stays true to its original \"beer bar\" theme.  Sometimes, however, I like to mix it up.  And I can do that more easily at the Monroeville location.  Obviously, I's beer cave trumps II's beer... um... outcove? \n\nSo all of that warrants a four-star rating.  Why the three? Like its suburban counterpart, I'm docking a star for closing so early.  Even when there is a crowd, the staff closes at 11:00 (Su-W) or 12:00 (Th-Sat) on the DOT.  That's just not responding to demand!\n\nOverall, I don't dislike D's I.  Quite the contrary.  After all, three stars means \"A-OK.\"  But to me, D's Regent Square doesn't go beyond that.
The food is always sort of room temperature, but it's delicious! \nThere's a cave. Of beer. \nThere's always a longish wait to get a seat, but I can say, they do their best to accommodate. My first time here, we had a large group and failed to call ahead, yet they found somewhere to put us and took good care. \nThis area of town is adorable, and I'm looking forward to heading out in the spring time and enjoying some hot dogs in the warm air!
\"Meh\" is kind of how I felt about this place, which I realize is an opinion that seems to go against the grain. I had heard about D's time and time again. Everyone talked about it like it was the greatest place in existence. I had such high expectations! \n\nI suppose maybe I was expecting too much, which led to some disappointment. A few friends and I went here on a Friday night and it was (predictably) packed. We were fairly lucky to get a table almost right away. \n\nI obviously had to acknowledge that the beer selection is impressive. If you can't find it here, you probably can't find it anywhere in Pittsburgh. I had to check out the famous \"Beer Cave\" which seemed to have just about everything. I think I'll make it a point to pick up some brews here next time I'm looking for something unusual or new.\n\nI wish I had more to say, but I just wasn't feeling it. My friends love it so I'm sure I'll be back, and next time I'll make it a point to try the food. Judging by some of the other reviews, that might change my perception of the place.
Fun bar, but if you aren't a smoker be prepared for your eyes to burn and your clothes to stink like cigarettes when you leave!\n\nThe usual Miller, Coors, Bud beers are cheap. No food. Just drinks.
For what it is, this place does the job. Cheap, powerful drinks without any distractions such as...dinner. There is a list of available wines posted outside the front door, but why on earth would you come here for wine? It's a beers-and-booze place all the way. \n\nAt 8pm on a Friday night, the front room was perhaps a quarter full. The bartender was friendly and the service was snappy, but I can't picture this being a regular destination. The air is thick with cigarette smoke, and the decor grim and dingy, with more light coming from the TV than from the overheads. I guess what I'm saying is, it's exactly what I picture an OTB from the early 80s to have been like.\n\nVerdict: if you want a quick drink (and I mean \"drink,\" not \"cocktail\"), it's a bargain. Recommended for time travelers, day boozers, and folks who hate HVAC.
Yeah it's dirty and smoky, but so what? It's got cheap beer and is an ok spot for a quiet pint. The front bar feels a bit grotty but the back is big and it's fine to hang out in. Nothing special but not terrible either.
Dunning's Grill is another one of those solid neighborhood joints.  Nothing on the menu here'll surprise you, but you'll get good chow for your buck here.  We're taling standard bar fare here--burgers, wraps, fish sandwiches, and variations of fried and grilled chicken.  \n\nIt's a good place to meet up with your friends before or after a movie at the nearby Regent's Square as I did.  I had the BLT which was as good as any other BLT I've had at least a dozen other places.  They have vegetarian options here but if you're a true vegetarian or vegan be forewarned!  They're really meatless variations of their regular menu items.
Ok, to ALL the hipsters and east end snobs... everything can't be oh so trendy and veganese.  I say that with love, as I have my foothold in the trendy hipster scene as well.   Dunnings is GREAT.  Great Pittsburgh fare at reasonable prices, since when did $10 become too much for a burger?  I highly recommend anything fried or on a bun from Dunnings, you will not be disappointed.   When it comes to the dinner selections, I think it just depends on the cook in the kitchen.  The service is friendly, the decor is old school but well maintained.   I just get so frustrated with a lot of these comments because it seems like a lot of the yelpers excpect gold dust when they spend upwards of $5.
I live in the neighborhood and love to patron local establishments. However, Dunning's doesn't impress me. Kind of reminds me of an old timer, stuffy bar/restaurant. The food is ok. Typical and kind of boring. I think the prices are on the higher end for what they serve.
Passable, cheap Chinese food. I like the Kung Pao chicken, but they definitely put in too many carrots.
This Giant Eagle just went through a recent face lift renovation. I can't speak to the employees or the cleanliness of the store, though I will say it's ghetto level is about a 5 or 6 out of 10. \n\nWhat I really want to say about this Giant Eagle is that they added a Cafe! Yes, a cafe and if you live in pittsburgh you know what that means! 6 Packs of Beer at a reasonable price. Even though they have a limit to how much beer you can buy per visit it's still the best way to buy 6packs in Pittsburgh. It will cost you a extra buck or two but it's still better than most bottle shops I have ever been to.
Fairly typical chain grocery store. Although I have my reasons for liking them:\n\n1) Discounted Kennywood Tickets\n2) Good selection of Pittsburgh Specific food (i.e. Isaley's Chipped ham, etc.)\n3) Cheaper than a whole foods/wawa
I don't remember the last time I stepped into a fast food burger joint.  Every time I come here, whether it be midday, evening, or late night there is ALWAYS a wait in the drive thru.  \n\nGo at the right time and the person doing the drive thru intercom could be the best entertainment you get in a while.  \n\nOh, yeah, the food isn't all that bad either, props for the \"fresh cut fries.\"
My first visit to the chain in years. Not exactly fine dining but this was open until midnight on weekdays.\n\nI had roast beef sliders and a bowl of French onion soup. The sandwich buns were mushy otherwise everything was fairly good.\n\nService was very good. Meal clocked in around $15 with tip which I think is 3 or 4 too high. Much more extensive menu than Denny's along with a bar if you happen to need a late night fill up.
Consistent service @ the bar w Chuck pouring drafts and mixing up fruity delights. Decent food - don't expect great. Lots of under 500 calorie and Weight Watcher items. Several tv's to watch games. You'll find everyone from book-reading wives that didn't want to cook to laborers grabbing a cheap steak & a few cold ones to huge celebrations filling many tables. It's a great community asset for many.  The Ritz, it ain't.
With this location being at a busy intersection off an exit from the Parkway makes it almost a nightmare to use this place.  Hardly any parking if you don't need to actually get gas.\n\nThe inside of the store is on the small side as well.  Doesn't help that the store part is changing from the BP branded store to a 7-eleven.  I swear that they decided it was amazing to put in an ATM that was four times the size than what was there before.  Be careful not to trip over the loose floor tiles as well.\n\nNot very many choices for gas off the Edgewood/Swissvale exit, so maybe wait to go to another location.
It all depends on the chef who is performing for you . I have been here twice in last several months and felt everything was average . I have seen other chefs in different restaurants and they have put on a much better show .
Only complaint was when we arrived we were basically told we had to wait for another party to arrive prior to being seated.  Was told we could go to bar---after saying no we wanted to be seated they agreed.  We made reservations for 3 and had no idea who other party was so why could we not be seated---we were not asking to be served.  Over all experience was nice.  Waitress very nice and attentive and so was Chef.
Ok. It started out as a rough night . 40 minutes late honoring our reservation, lack of communication from management. Slow service once we did get seated. Our 8:30 reservation was not met with any food until at least 9:30. Really crazy. However, it was made alllll better by our chef, Tito. When we go back and we *will* go back -- we will ask for Tito.  Is he Japanese? No, but he is awesome.   To apologize the manager did comp our entire meal... We were a party of 10 -- and we took good care of our servers...it really wasn't their fault. Happy Xmas eve Tito you know how to do it right. Thanks.
Benihana has always been one of my favorite Hibachi places, but the last couple of times we went, service wasn't too good. Our cook appeared to be high and dropped things during his presentation. He had us worried while he controlled the fire of the stove top and flipped items in the air because he just did not seem to be experienced or professional. The food is always very good though and I have never been disappointed by it! The green tea ice cream is especially unique and delicious! I also love their lobster and would definitely order it again! I really hope that Benihana stays strict on who represents them on the floor and monitors their workers' quality of work more. Other than that, Benihana has the best Hibachi food there is!
This place has the weirdest entrance ever. Just be prepared. \n\nCame for my sons 5th birthday last night. He's a little foodie. The restaurant itself is nice and we were seated pretty quickly.  Our waitress showed up 2 seconds later to take drink orders and appetizer/sushi orders. I just asked for water and some time to actually look at the menu. several min later out waitress came back with drinks and asked to take orders. I ordered chicken and steak along with a cranberry mojito. Quickly after taking orders our waitress brought out our soup. I liked it but it lacked salt. Before I even finished the salad course came out. I was able to enjoy both before the chef came out to prepare our meal. What did bother me was all the dishes in our area. I can't stand a dirty table and I wish our waitress would have removed them sooner. Our chef Penny wasn't the best hibachi chef I've seen but she was great with my son and he really enjoyed watching her. She was honestly a lot of fun. The hibachi itself was pretty good. I liked the fried rice which is an up charge. The steak was good and so was the chicken. I honestly don't think it was anything special. Dessert was ice cream also nothing special. \n\nSo to sum it up our waitress seemed overwhelmed and managed to make me feel rushed even though I feel she could have visited our table a few more times then she did. That along with being overpriced is why only the 3 stars.
The only reason I wouldn't rate this place any higher than a 3 is that it can be a hit or miss. This time was great! \n\nFOOD: I ordered the chopper steak salad, which is grilled steak on top of a bed of greens with half an avocado, cherry tomatoes, corn, onions and a tortilla. The steak was tender and tasty with the ripe avocado. I had it with Ranch dressing. This combination was a light but filling dinner.
If you're a hardcore fan of authentic Mexican food, this is probably not the place for you.  The enchiladas remind me more of chilaquiles - definitely more layered than rolled.  The burritos are huge but it really drives me crazy how segmented they are.  One bite will be all rice, the next will be all meat.  The tofu tacos are okay, but the bean sprouts seem like a weird addition.\n\nI know, you're probably thinking \"What DOES this girl like about Mad Mex?\"  If you can let go of any previous Mexican food experiences (or if you've never had Mexican food before, as I hadn't when I first went to Mad Mex), some things are ok.  The tofu tacos minus the bean sprouts.  The California grilled salad.  The chickpea chili and black bean soup, the potato taquitos.  Nachos, chips & salsa, and guacamole are all decent.  Their sides are ridiculously huge and the desserts are all ok (except the sopapillas).  Basically, stick to the least authentic stuff and you should be fine.\n\nAdditionally, some of their entrees are available with your choice of either chicken, steak, shrimp, portobello mushrooms or tofu.  They have tons of vegetarian options.  They have good happy hour deals and good late night margarita deals.  They have raspberry, strawberry, mango, and kiwi margaritas year round, with one or two seasonal flavors per month, plus a full bar, a bunch of tequilas and a huge, varied beer list that tends to focus on local beers.\n\nSo basically: the less you know about Mexican food, the less disappointed you will be.  If you're a fan of authentic Mexican food, either stick to something more basic like a salad, or pick a different restaurant.
Do they still do the half-price late night menu here?  That used to be clutch.  Margaritas are solid and the food is good. They actually steam their burritos, so the tortilla is super-soft and warm.  Like the salsa here too.  \n\nAll the way down Atwood, this place caps off a string of good multicultural restaurants.  It's the most fun of them all.
Wonderful ambiance and great selection of brews and food. Absolutely love the the tofu tacos and pineapple habanero salsa.\n\nThe stars are for the food and ambiance only. We dined here twice on our trip to Pittsburgh. The first time, our server was very attentive and a total sweetheart. \n\nThe second time, we took my Dad and his girlfriend out to dinner. The table was WAY too small for 3 people having fajitas. The main problem was even though the waitress came over to check on us, she never seemed to look down at the mountain of dirty plates and refills needed.\nShe would ask if we needed anything? But  never gave us a chance to answer. We were always yelling after her, \"more coffee!\" \"more water!\"  We also felt like we were inconveniencing her. She never smiled or showed any enthusiasm. Seemed like a completely different experience from a few days prior.\n\nWe will definitely return to Mad Mex, but maybe hitting up the Shadyside location instead.
I took my niece here last week for lunch and we enjoyed our food.  The guac was really good.  They gave us a lot, and we both had enough for another dinner.  When I was eating my left overs, I came across a piece of wood in my burrito...probably a piece of toothpick, but it was a turnoff and I threw the rest of my food out.  I deducted a star for that.
I eat here a lot (like at least once a week, sometimes twice).  Margaritas are good, they have an EXCELLENT rotating draft beer selection.  Prices at happy hour are good for booze, and good for wings (though sometimes you get dinky wings at the happy hour price).  Overall food prices are high ($10 minimum for an entree, usually closer to $15).\n\nA lot of their food is good.  They do really try.  It just isn't mexican, at all, period.  It's gringo through and through.  But, like I said, if you want waffle fries and wings in a mexican-like place, go here!\n\nWait staff is very good at this location.  Parking sucks (bad).
The sundae bar is a big hit with my kids, particularly the blue \"whipped cream\" (I shudder to think what's actually in that). The food's pretty much the same stuff you can get at Friday's, Applebee's, etc. I like their salad with the almonds and blue cheese-- they sometimes really dowse it in dressing but it's good.
What's better than fresh, homemade free cookies?!\n\nWell, a gluten free cookie, but whatever, I can still enjoy myself in sharing free food with other people. \n\nMax & Erma's is like the place to get everything. If I'd ever been to an Eat N' Park I imagine it'd be like that except classier. Well, I don't know about classier, again I've never been to Eat N' Park. But back to Max & Erma's...\n\nThe location we went to always has a crowded parking lot. I don't know why it's so busy but there's hardly any parking there. Allot a few more minutes for parking. You'll need it.\n\nOnce you're in though it's super fun. Build your burger, eat greasy appetizers, and taste some delicious milkshakes. I've had the lunch special - soup or salad or half sandwich for pretty cheap. It's just enough food to not leave you in a food coma after lunch. The only thing I wish (and yes this took away a star) is that there were more sandwich options. So sometimes I get the soup & salad and I'm still hungry. That's a no bueno.\n\nThen there's dinner. Their burgers are kind of fantastic. I'm still not over the whole eating a rare cooked burger so everywhere in PA gets added bonus points for that. So overall it's a good burger, but it's certainly not the best burger I've ever eaten and there's nothing really creative about their burgers to make them stand apart from other place's burgers. \n\nThe atmosphere is something between a TGIFridays or Chili's but very Pittsburgh-centric. I found it somewhere between comforting and annoying. I don't really like chain restaurants but this one had some nice personal stuff to keep it from venturing into the Fridays realm.\n\nAlso, if you're a craft beer & burger sort a gal, you'll notice this place is not for you. There's more than Bud, but not a lot. \n\nP.S. Free cookie night is Wednesday.\n\nP.P.S. Get the white chocolate macadamia nut.
We went to this location, on Cochran Road, a couple nights ago around 10pm.  We ordered the wedge salad, an appetizer trio, and the wings (which I ordered extra crispy).  The salad came first and was pretty good but seemed to not have any toppings except for the salad dressing.  The appetizer trio came out next and was a bit of a disappointment.  The potato skins weren't that good- mushy and no seasoning (salt/spice).  Also, the bacon was soft and mushy.  The nachos were edible but nothing to write home about- again a little mushy once you got below the ones on the top and the guacamole was pretty bland.  The buffalo chicken planks were a little under-cooked for my taste but were otherwise good.  The buffalo wings came out last and I was happy with them- they were done (crispy) the way I like them.  The wings were what I was craving when I walked into the place- the void was filled.  \n\nThe service was a little slow.  We sat at the bar and there were only 2 other people at the bar and only 1 table with 4 people elsewhere in the place.  They seemed to be starting to close up at that time.  It took about 10 minutes to get our drinks because the bartender dropped a wine bottle- so we had to wait for him to clean it up and hear his amazing account of the accident before being served.    \n\nI would go back again the next time I crave wings (because decent wings are really hard to find in the South Hills).  Maybe during the day the service will be faster.  I will definitely order the wedge salad again and the wings but will be more careful when ordering the appetizer.
I have been to this place many many times over the years. But the last visit was at least a year prior. \n\nI was shocked by the outside condition of the restaurant. This place definitely looks like it's falling apart on the outside. \n\nI didn't stay there to eat, but from what little that I  saw, the inside looked fine. My toasted bagel with cream cheese was okay, but there wasn't a napkin in the bag. Seems like a silly oversight.
Food is what you would expect from a BB, staff is friendly enough but the prices are outrageous.  My boyfriend and I had to endure the drive thru because we were running late for our camping trip. My \"toasted\" bagel was white and soft... before the addition of cream cheese. \n\nPrices are crazy! \n\nDon't be so lazy... drive down the hill to the GE... buy a 6 pack of bagels, cheese and some bacon for under 10 bucks!  You'll have left over food and cash
Panera does a nice job on some items.  Stopped to have lunch with a friend who wanted to use the WiFi and get a bite to eat.  \n\nKind of a soup type day, rainy and cool...so had a bowl of low fat veggie...very nice and a greek salad that is pretty good.  The best part was the fresh baked bread.
Ya Gotta Regatta! It's Pittsburgh's mid summer July 4th celebration. Once it was the largest inland regatta in the nation with an average 1 Million people visiting for the four day event. Scaled back these days for reasons I won't get into, the annual summer spectacular features boat racing, anything that floats contests, a lighted boat parade, concerts, and the huge July  4Th fireworks display. Best of all, it's free!
After a long enduring 12 plus hour trip to Pittsburgh, my shuttle driver told me about the delivery service at Vincent's and suggested their food was worth checking out. Overwhelmed with work at that time of the night and unfamiliarity with the area prompted a quick call for their Ad's Rockin' Pasta ($17). I was initially told the delivery would arrive in 45 minutes to an hour, but the food came knocking on my hotel room sooner than expected. \n\nThe complimentary mini garlic buns were cooled by that time. It was over-buttered but yummy nonetheless. It was a delight to see the whopping serving of pasta after not having anything to eat all day. Thankfully it was kept warm by the plastic container and comforting with every bite. The generous servings of angel hair was filled to the brim with juicy chicken slices, very few shrimps, mushrooms, roasted and hot peppers drenched in a mild marinara sauce. The flood of sweet and semi-savory marinara was not the ideal and the peppers also did not make an impression. The quality of the pasta was overcooked and oversoaked, but the pieces of chunky chicken were tender and delicious. The side salad did not look very fresh and was not newsworthy.\n\nI didn't get a chance to visit the venue to get a better impression of the establishment, but as a delivery service I thought it was fast while portions were very generous. Value wise, kudos to them for having a $5 children's menu for those at the ages 2-10. For my dish however, I still consider it overpriced for what was supposed to be their fanciest pasta dish. 2.5 stars for the experience.
Not a bad place to grab a bite for lunch. Their service can be kind of slow so dont plan on having a quick in and out lunch.\n\nGreentree does not have many options for food, which is surprising since there is so many office complexes. \n\nOverall not bad.
The inside of Vincent's has the distinct smell of wall-to-wall carpets and fried food - not necessarily 'bad,' but certainly pungent.  I'm glad we came here on a nice afternoon when the deck was open.  \n\nWe split fried zucchini, which was delicious, sliced really thin with homemade marinara for dipping.  I got the buffalo chicken sandwich and my dining companion got the italian calzone.  Both were good - fresh ingredients and lots of them.  The portions were absolutely huge.  \n\nOverall, the service was fine - no major issues.  Good place for casual dining and good bar food.
Expensive, slow, but good food if you don't mind the wait or check.
Just moved to the area so I am looking for a go to spot. Vincents isn't going to be it. The food wasn't great it was just ok. I had the italian sausage. The prices are reasonable and I got my food in a timely manner but no personal customer service. I sat at the bar and literally no attempt to have any dialogue except get my order. No other options ill go back but that's it. Or I may try pizza and have it delivered.
We stumbled on this place on a Friday night. The place was moderately busy, but we were seated right away. The server was friendly, but service was pretty slow considering how many servers were working. We ordered the artichoke hearts to start - I recommend staying away from those! They were around $9 and had obviously just come from a can and had some Parmesan cheese sprinkled on top. The rest of the food, however, was delicious! We ordered the spinach pizza with white sauce and an Italian calzone. They were both HUGE and the pizza was one of the best I've had.
The Pennsylvania Turnpike caught me on a good day. That is, its typically unbearable narrow and worn-down roadways cluttered with \"wide loads\" in various forms were temporarily mitigated by periodic signage noting \"PA TURNPIKE: ALL TOLLS WAIVED.\"\n\nThe suspected reason for the free ride? The other major highways in Pennsylvania are shut down due to persistent piles of snow. STILL. Hey, I'm not complaining.
Not a bad place, but here is the good an the bad.\n\nThe bad: The light in our room didn't work. It's not very close to pittsburgh. Hotel requires updating. \n\nThe good: Hotel was a great price. The gym was huge for hotel standards with large locker rooms. Decent free continental breakfast in the morning and a free two drink happy hour in the evening. Friendly staff. Free shuttle to events in the city. \n\nOverall I would stay here again.
My husband and I stayed at the Best Western Parkway Center Inn for a U2 Concert at Heinz Field. We realized that the room was going to be extremely small based on the reviews, but I think I was taken aback as to how small it really was. The hotel was clean on both the inside and outside. Although our room was down a very narrow corridor and a joining room to another room, it was clean and updated with a nice flat screen TV. We had Bath n Body Works products, which I use at home. The best part of the hotel was the free shuttle to and from the concert. I hate having to drive in traffic and parking would have cost us a pretty penny. The staff are wonderful! Very friendly and accommodating.  Apparently there is free breakfast from 6am-9am, which we were told about, but didn't get to take advantage of since we overslept. There is also a pool which we missed because we weren't at the hotel long enough. We did get to take advantage of the free wii fi which was very nice. The purpose of our stay was a place to sleep and for this purpose, this hotel served us well. However, if you intend on staying an extended amount of the time at the hotel, I would suggest elsewhere. The quaint room made me feel very claustrophobic. As well, there aren't any places to eat near. I would stay there again for a reason of a place to crash after a concert or something similar. I wouldn't recommend staying with a family at this facility because of it's size, unless you can get a bigger room or a couple rooms at once.
Yeah, yeah, yeah, I know.  Why go to the Olive Garden when Pittsburgh has so many great local Italian places?  Hey, it's convenient and the food is decent.  For lunch, Olive Garden ain't bad in a pinch!   I had business to go to near the airport and I stopped here out of necessity.\n\nI had the basic spaghetti & meatballs in marinara sauce.  Not bad.  I wish they had cups of soup 'cos the Zuppa Toscana was mighty tempting.  \n\nOkay, so I admit I like the Olive Garden.  But my husband better not take me here on date night!
I normally don't like chain restaurants, but I do like eating at the Olive Garden in Greentree.  The food is pretty good here and the service is always excellent.  Although not my first choice, still quite okay.
I was perfectly a-ok with this place*.  My friend's mother had suggested we not stay here, as it was \"shady\".  I didn't give a crap.  I had a lovely view of some woods, I wish we had gotten back early enough to check out their lounge, and every guy going to see the Boss concert that night was staying here, so I got too see much more denim than I would on a normal day.\n\nDefinitely stay on the second floor though.  First floor looked way more nast.  \n\n*  Though ot had been a while since I'd left NYC, which when that happens, my judgement can be thrown askance.
I was fine with staying here for the short time I was in Pittsburgh. The only thing that really bothered me, besides the really loud people at night the first night (really thin walls), was that there was no fan in the bathroom. It got really steamy really quickly and the only way to let out the steam was by opening the door. You can tell the bathroom was updated, although the sink was a little high for this 5 ft girl. The front staff was really friendly checking in and checking out. The pool was clean, for the most part. Bed was firm and pillows were soft. I brought my own pillow just because I sleep better when I do, but the hotels were perfectly fine to lay on. I think the location was great, easy to find and close to the city where we wanted to be. All in all a fine place to spend a few nights while sightseeing around Pittsburgh.
We rented two rooms, one with a king bed and one with two doubles. The room with the King was fantastic, while the room with the doubles had a heater that wouldn't stop blowing cold air and was a stinkbug graveyard. \n\nWe asked and promptly received a different room. This one was cleaner but still had heater issues. \n\nThe front desk was very helpful providing  local restaurant recommendations and giving change for larger bills. The continental breakfast (free with room) was one of the most plentiful spreads I've had in a hotel. \n\nWe'd stay again, but we'll be sure to call ahead and make sure the front desk checks the rooms have been cleaned first.
What can I say about this place ? I have had several good experiences and several bad experiences here over the years .  All and all , you get what you see . The service is hit or miss depending on who is working . I do feel it is a bit expensive for the quality of food you get . The place is too small especially at the counter area .
Really good bagels.  Stopped for a bagel and tea.  Place was crowded but the line moved quickly.  Had a Good Grains bagel with some cream cheese shmear.  Delicious.  Love the green iced tea!.\n\nThis place is tiny but most get it and go...no not get go! lol\n\nHave had soup and bagel sandwich in the past and it was very enjoyable.
I am always in Heaven when I go to Ithaca New York, after all, they have Ithaca Bakery there. Listen when I tell you, go to their website and request, demand, beg, do anything you can to get them to open one here in Pittsburgh! Seriously, the whole wheat Long Island bagels are pretty damn fine. Boiled, then baked a little darker than most bagels, then doused with garlic and onion, poppy and sesame seeds. Incredibly delicious! They're California Granola bagels are whole grain and hearty. The Italian bagels are like a mini loaf of Italian bread, covered in oregano, basil, rosemary, and garlic, they put olive oil in the raw dough, bellisimo! \n\nOkay, 359 miles southwest we have Pittsburgh with no visible sign of a decent bagel place, well that's not entirely true, Einstein Brothers has a good bagel, not a great bagel. Where Ithaca Bakery has 9 different vegetarian sandwiches, good luck trying to find anything like that here. \n\nWhen I did enjoy meats, my choice here was the Nova Lox with a shmear, tomato, onion on a whole wheat bagel. Not exactly a low cal meal, later I found out it had a whopping 700 calories and over 20 grams of fat. Even with the lite cream cheese this had 600 calories and 12 grams of fat. Now I have a whole grain bagel with hummus. \n\nI will say their pretzel bagels are rather good, nice crust and crunch from salt, a chewy center and makes an awesome pizza bagel.\n\nTheir bagels are pretty expensive, a baker's dozen and a container of cream cheese is over 14 bucks. In a town with a pizza joint on every corner, and an Italian restaurant in every community, you'd think someone would open an authentic bagel place with unique flavors and varieties.
Adequate and could be best in the area, but definetely not in New York league. The space is the best thing about it- large, new and beautiful decor.  They have good products too like Bumble and Bumble but they also push the Kerastase on you, which I don't like. For the value, the prices are very high with mixed results.  Ask about how much experience people have because there are some people with little experience (less than one year). I think Nicolette is the best- has good experience and she did a great job.  Tried the owner Jim and hair came out brassy orange instead of blonde.  When came back to have it fixed, he handled it poorly with me. There is something to be desired for the customer service overall- have definetely had sub-par treatment at front desk and others.
I had an ok experience at MCN Studio.  I just moved to PIttsburgh from NYC and I relied on yelp to choose my hair salon.  I called MCN and asked to be seen by a senior stylist and the receptionist recommended Ashley.  I booked her for a cut and full highlight.  \nWhen I got there, I was pleased with the look of the salon.  It's trendy, clean, and has a good vibe.  I met Ashley and she was pleasant enough, although she seems a bit young to be a senior stylist.  But who am I to know what the credentials are to be considered \"senior\"?  She did a good job on the color and didn't do a terrible job on the cut, but I just wasn't wow'd.  She talked the entire time, which I don't typically mind and she's easy to talk to, but too much of the conversation was geared toward selling me product.  \nMy hair is straight and thin and I had previously gotten a stacked bob (which I hate and I'm trying to grow out).  She did her best to make it better, but it's still too stacked for my liking and is a bit uneven (found this out a week later when a different stylist was doing my hair for a wedding and fixed it).\nThe prices were a bit high for this area.  My haircut and highlight (she didn't do a full highlight, just partial which wasn't what I booked, but I didn't say anything so I'm somewhat to blame) came to $175.\nAlso, there was a lot of pressure to come back in 6 weeks.  I can't afford to get my hair cut and highlighted every 6 weeks and don't know anyone who goes that often.\n\nBottom line- my experience wasn't horrible and wasn't great. I will go back to give the salon a second chance, but will be trying out a different stylist.
Me and my wife went to the salon for the first time for our haircuts, Ashley and Margo did our haircuts, they were pretty good. We are satisfied with our haircuts. But their honor is a very rude person, my two year old touched a plant placed in the waiting area, he came and yelled at him and said its very expensive, we felt really bad after that his dog was roaming in the salon and getting into people's stuff, which is not a good idea. I am allergic to dogs and there are people who don't like dogs. All the staff was nice and courteous. Though we like the services but we are not going back again because the owner has no manners and was very rude.
I go with three stars because the co-owner, Lisa, did a lovely updo for me for a wedding. People commented on my hair and I was pleased with the results. However, I had less than stellar experience with getting my makeup done with airbrush. Not only did the woman give my sister-in-law attitude on her wedding day because she didn't like how her make up was looking, she also spilled the liquid formula all over my white button down shirt.  She was apologetic but considering her work on my face did little to nothing to cover up my blemishes, I would not recommend getting make up done by her.
Lots of LCD HD Screens make this a good place to check out a game. The atmosphere is a little bland, but this bar is part of the hotel it's connected to, so you can't expect it to be too crazy. All in all decent bar.
Went here with a couple friends during a conference across the river. Service was typical for a this style restaurant, nothing spectacular.  Half off appetizers for happy hour so I got the sampler (again, nothing spectacular). Decent meal. My friend was disappointed by the his chili and the other did not really enjoy his buffalo pirogies. I might go back if I want some cheap appetizers and a beer during happy hour.  Seating outside was ok at best.
Just above bar food but fine in a pinch.
Another lunch spot for the northshore.  This probably has the best food.  The french dip and the wraps are very good.  It's a tad pricey but not horrible.  They're really good for pickup.  As is a constant problem on the northshore, service is INCREDIBLY slow.  You won't get out of here in under an hour if you dine in.  The waitresses are just MIA with refills and bringing checks, and the food takes a while to come out too.  But if you have time to spend, it's probably the best lunch spot on the north shore.  If you're running low on time - call ahead and grab it to go.
Soho is very So-So.  \n\nRestaurants.com had a coupon for buy $25 for $10.  I snagged it but the conditions were annoying- spend $45 to get the $25 and no alcohol is included.  BOO!\n\nAnyways, I ordered the shrimp cocktail to start.  It was okay- 6 nice sized shrimp served in a martini glass with cocktail sauce and 2 lemon.  Not bad, the shrimp could have been a little colder.\n\nFor dinner Kev had the buffalo chicken wrap with onion rings and I had the cobb salad with a side of balsamic vin.  I like the cobb- avocado, chicken, pieces of bacon, toms, egg, lettuce.  It is good but nothing special.\n\nOur server was nice.....\n\nThe food here is just very blah.  The atmosphere is good to watch a game.  \n\nThat $25 coupon didn't get us very far.  We ended up paying $54 with tip and with the coupon!  I guess our bill didn't add up to what we needed it to be to get the full bang for our buck?  Still confused.......\n\nSo-so is nothing special.\n\nIt's not priced right to win me over.  Nor is the food good enough.
SoHo Pittsburgh. Not SoHo NYC.  Was staying in adjoining Marriott property. Food was pleasant as was the service. Waiter was honest about the mediocre food. Crab cakes have too much filler. coworker had pork chop (seemed smaller than advertised. Dumplings were good. Wings looked okay. One at of our group had the french dip sandwich and liked it.  Deserts were pretty good.  Come with the proper expectations and you will be satisfied.
Went here to watch the College National Champ game.  Was not as crowded as you would think but it was a Monday.  I didn't eat here.  Had a few drinks is all.  Cool place to hang out.  Would like to go here again
If 2-stars means \"meh, I've had better\", then I'd have to give it 2 stars. I'd say if \"fine\" in the slightly pained way the means \"how about we think of someplace else. \"\n\nNow, not that it's bad, because its not. A good beer selection, nice bar clean, nice staff.  Good place to watch the last round of the Masters. But if 3 stars means A-OK, I'd have to give 2.5.  The menu is uninspired, the food is ok but expensive, the decor is a little funny. \n\nBetter places on the north shore.
I came here awhile back for lunch after kayaking for a couple of hours.  I ordered the Pittsburgh salad, and it was decent and filling, which is what I was looking for after getting some exercise.  I agree with other reviewers that prices are a bit on the high side, however.  Since I was there on a day when there wasn't a game, there were few other options open either along Federal St. or in the Del Monte bldg.  They have outdoor seating, which is a good way to enjoy the weather on a nice day.  Overall, the food is pretty typical for places along Federal St., but a bit higher-priced.
Good food but takes too long before game to get order, be sure to come early, 35 mins to get food.
We stayed at the Spring Hill Suites next door to this place, so we decided to give it a try.  Love the design and interior of the place and they have lots of beers on tap.  Probably is a better bar than it is a restaurant.  The menu has a wide variety of good looking choices.  I simply got a Grilled Chicken sandwich with Swiss cheese and roasted red peppers and mashed potatoes.  It was ok.  The chicken didn't have much flavor to it and it was very thin breast that didn't fit all on the bun.  The mashed potatoes and gravy also didn't have much flavor to it.  My Dad had a burger and he said that was good.  It also took quite awhile to get our food after we ordered, despite it not being busy.  Our waitress wasn't overly friendly.  She was good, but all business, no pleasantries.  If I am staying at this hotel again (not likely), I'll probably eat here if I don't feel like venturing out.  However, I'd probably go somewhere else downtown otherwise.  I wouldn't mind going to the bar sometime though.  It really is a nice looking bar with plenty of seating.
Just walking around the area and ran into this place.  Nice big screen tv's and lots of people.....not over crowded,  no wait. Still took awhile for our food to come out. I had the buffalo chicken wrap and Mr. had the quesadilla and wings. He said the quesadilla was just ok. My wrap was spicy and pretty good. Place cleared out pretty early for a Saturday night.  Overall, service was slow, staff was friendly,  and food was okay.
In the Wesin Hotel, attached to the David Lawrence Convention Center - this is probably the highest priced, over saturated fried fish establishment that exists in downtown Pittsburgh.\n\nNow, they call themselves the \"Orginal\" fish market - but don't let that fool you. This place is an overpriced clone of legal seafood - with a good but overpriced service bar. Seriously.... $26 for two MGD beers and a double Bailey's on the rocks? Oy. Something tells me they want to loose business, rather than keep it. The wine selection is kinda dated, and I don't know the last time they cleaned the wine taps - but it looks to me like something I'd rather avoid- or have the bottle delivered to my table to avoid cross contamination.\n\nThe food, while basicially good (fried seafood) everything - is way overpriced to me. And there is no really good way to put this, but if you're looking for Fish and Chips - cross the street and go the the nearby Tonic restaurant. The portion size and the service are much better.\n\nStill, if you've got an expense account, and don't want to walk out of the convention hotel - yes, this will work for almost anyone. Including the guy who's had one too many and yelling at the bar with another patron.
I have been going to this place for years.  It has excellent sushi and a pretty good selection, however often they don't have all the options listed on the menu.  I'm a big fan of white tuna and they never have it.  It's a little pricey, but the quality of ingredient is excellent.  I've had two issues with this place over the 30 or so times I've been here, so that's pretty good.  Try some of the specials.  If you order razor clams if they are on special be careful, because last time I had it there was a ton of sand in the clams.  This is also one of the few spots were you can get a good meal after midnight.
the salads are quite exceptional, especially for philly\n\nthe muscles are buttery goodness\n\nthe sushi is just not good, i don't care what the woman who eats there everyday cuz she lives across the street says\n\nand i think they put mayo in some of their sushi, which - however authentic - is disgusting
Attached to the Westin Convention Center, this restaurant is a super convenient stop for convention goers.  They're open until 1am, which is especially helpful for those of us West Coast travelers that spend all day flying to get to Pittsburgh.\n\nI enjoyed a nice big bowl of their clam chowder - creamy, not tomato based.  Great flavors and large pieces of clam.  The cesaer dressing on their salad was delicious and their sushi list was impressive.\n\nService was a touch slow, but not too bad considering the number of occupied tables.  I'd say the food was good, but not outstanding.  Definitely a convenient and tasty option.\n\nAlso stopped in at the bar one night for a few drinks.  Drink prices weren't too bad, and they seemed to have a decent selection of choices.  The bar is not particularly big, so seating is a little limited.  But not a bad place to knock back a few after a long day of networking.
I got the slow roasted jerk chicken (yes I know at the fish market!) and it was very very good.  For dessert I split the 'doughnut' with ice cream which was very tasty.
located in the westin hotel downtown pittsburgh, i came here in the summer, early evening. party of 2. the valet was great and quick, i wasnt staying at the hotel, i pulled up and said i was eating at the OFM and he quickly took the keys and parked the car. the valet was quick when we were done also. overall i thought it the OFM was pretty good, its a nice busy atmosphere that you would expect for its location inside the hotel.  a pretty big bar kinda in the center of the restaurant, but is still set up nicely. although we sat at a booth, the sushi bar looked really nice with an awesome aquarium behind the itamae which i thought was cool. i got the swordish, which was just ok, she got the salmon, which was good, the spinach side that came with mine was very good. the salads were great, we each got two different ones and they were delicious salads, which honestly was the best part and highlight to the meal. i also ordered sushi, which was good and fresh. we had a very good waitress, very freindly, personable and catered to us perfectly. its expensive, probly a bit too much for the plate you get, im glad i ordered the sushi on the side, bc im not sure i would have been full otherwise. id like to go back and just order sushi. i wanna give it a 3.5.
Had dinner here and it was located in my hotel (Westin). Enjoyed a Lobster Bisque and a Green Curry Cod. The service was a little slow but friendly. My fish had several bones in it. The bread was sourdough with a shrimp butter. I think it was a bit pricey for a seafood restaurant. I didn't try the sushi that everyone was raving about. Where does a restaurant in Pittsburgh acquire fresh fish for sushi?
Sushi was great.  Everyone I was with enjoyed their meal.  I will probably not go back because the location is not great.
Had the Walu (Hawaiian butterfish), and was excellent.  Sushi was good, my friends said best ever, I thought more average.  Rock shrimp appetizer also average.  Wait staff was excellent.
Walking around downtown we stumbled into this place for a quick dinner.  It was fairly empty and quiet (nice), our waiter was friendly, and the food was ok.  We all got sushi, which was good.  We had a delicious shrimp and balsamic appetizer, that didn't taste like balsamic, but was great none the less.  The meal was not amazing, it was pricey as expected for a hotel lobby restaurant, and it met expectations.  I wouldn't run back to this place, but I wouldn't run away, either.
I haven't had a full meal here but I had one of the best drink's of my life... The Sapphire Collins and it was amazing. That is coming from a non Gin drinker, so tasty and made just right not too boozy! \n\nThen I had the most mouth watering crispy light Calamari to go with it, completely enjoyable. My friend was unimpressed with her Sushi, but to be fair she is unimpressed with everything in life. \n\nWhat I liked about this place was the location on Penn ave was close to many cultural district venues. I would give this place a shot if you're gunshy about previous reviews and prices just try an appetizer and drinks like I did as a before evening out spot its great!
Was able to go in without a wait. Part of the Westin Hotel, there is a nice decor to the OFM, but the clientele seem to be going elsewhere.\n\nOur server was very helpful and gave us some suggestions on what to order. We asked about what sushi rolls we could start off with as appetizers for the group, and he suggested two that worked very well. They were both tuna-based, one mild and one spicier. It definitely lives up to the claim that OFM has some good sushi.\n\nWe then ordered our mains, and I got the cioppino. Now, I'm used to cioppino coming out as a stew with chunks of fish in a broth, but OFM's chef has decided to serve an entire slab of mahi on a thin layer of the broth with the accompanying shellfish. The dish was cooked well, but the presentation (lack of actual stew) left me wanting for more.\n\nThe caesar salad was pretty good, with actual anchovies on top.\n\nThe Hawaiian waluu dish got a thumbs up.\n\nThe crab cakes were also said to be very tasty.\n\nOverall, the experience was nice and relaxed, and the service is friendly. However, the food itself (besides the sushi) needs to be reinvigorated somehow to get it back into competition with all the new kids on the block.
Surprised by the poor reviews here. Yes, the restaurant's interior is... strange ( cavernous, dark, and smells a bit musty ), but overall we actually enjoyed this place. The sushi was much better than expected and Olivia was a great server. If I ever come back to Pitt, I'd come here with no problem.
I was one of three women who ate here on a Thursday night while here for business.  We got seated right away, but after that the service was slow and I had to keep asking for drink refills.  The 3 rolls that were brought out came with a really good flavored butter.  We were never asked if we wanted more or how things were.  We just ordered 3 salads and 3 appetizers and all were good portions and very good tasting too, and worth the prices.\n\n  We didn't know ahead that if you spend $50 you could get your Westin parking validated, we had paid $10 to park just across the street but that didn't count.
Confusing! No one to greet me so I wasn't sure if I should go to the regular the bar or the sushi bar. I chose e sushi bar based on the number of available seat-all of them. I waited for eye contact with one of the sushi preparers. Obtained we contact after an extended period of time. He gave me a menu and instructions. But I Asked about process since I wanted a cocktail as well. Waiter will be there shortly. And he was! Cocktail order submitted, sushi items and cocktail arrived quickly, but I still needed more coaching on the method for closing out check. Prices-moderate, Staff -not the worst, but needs improvement. Sushi -decent. Bottom line-Communication for new guests needs improvement.
This is a happening joint for happy hour and beyond. I've walked by the huge windows while downtown before and been amazed at how many people were drinking it up inside. Friday night, I finally made it inside. \n\nI was disappointed that they used \"mojito mix\" for their seemingly very popular mojito - but at least they had freshly mashed mint. The martinis are generous, but you pay the price for them. Enjoy your measly $1 off at happy hour during the week, but I don't blame them. Why have a better happy hour when you're already making money hand over fist? \n\nThis is a fun place to hang out but expect to spend lots of money if you stick around. The atmosphere is probably the best for a downtown bar, but the crowd is surely on the older side. \n\nUnfortunately, they still allow smoking, but the place is big and airy enough that it's not so much an issue.\n\nOverall, I will definitely be heading back to Bossa Nova on another night - it has a very nice atmosphere. But I'll be sticking to one drink at a time.
Good drinks with some run of the mill tapas. Nothing was innovative which I don't mind since it wasn't to expensive. My food taste a little burnt which is what cost it the fourth star. Overall it's worth trying and you may like it better than I did.
This place is A-OK!  I was contemplating giving it 4 stars but the scene is getting a bit dated.  They need to spruce it up or something.  It's just sorta there now.  But don't get me wrong, every time I go here I enjoy myself - but I make sure I have a good group to go with.  You do see some regulars but that's just the type of place that it is.  I like that you get a mixed crowd, no one too young and most of the people that seem to frequent this joint are in there late 20's, 30's, and 40's.\n\nIt can get a bit pricey if you have a tab open and aren't thinking about what your drinking and how much the drinks are.  The drinks are made reasonably well, by that I mean they have enough alcohol in them so that you don't have to wonder why you just paid $10 for ice, water, and a splash of alcohol.  \n\nBack in the day Bossa Nova was a novel idea for this town, but now with all these upscale bars/lounges and restaurants opening they may have to reinvent themselves somehow.  \n\nAll in all a fun place to hang out.  One thing I noticed is that there is a gap between when it's jumping.  Right after work is good b/c you get the happy hour peeps, but then it seems to clear out after 7:30 PM and then it picks back up around 10:30 PM...maybe it was just the night that I went, but I have a feeling that this is the norm.
This is a trendy \"Brazilian Tapas\" restaurant nestled in the Cultural District. Perfect for grabbing a drink or light meal before or after a show.\n\nBoy and I popped into Bossa Nova before the ballet. We saw suits de-stressing from the week, some 30-something females looking to get tanked, and some were just like us, waiting to go to a show. \n\nI had an (uncharacteristically) girly cocktail. I was dressed to the nines for the ballet. I figured... why not? It was sugary sweet and through no fault of the very lovely bartender, I will stick to wine and beer from now on.  Boy chose one of their many scotch selections. \n\nFor tapas, I had the fig and goat cheese toastas. Boy chose the stuffed peppers. Strangely, my food arrived about fifteen minutes before the peppers. The restaurant was not crowded in the slghtest, so I found this puzzling. Having tried both, I thought the tapas were bland and overpriced for things I could have easily made at home. Boy disagreed. He really liked his peppered. \n\nThe quality of the food and drinks (and their corresponding high prices) probably merit a two-star review. But we were greated by a very pleasant hostess and served well by the nice bartender. Their service alone probably earns Bossa Nova the three stars I am giving.
I stopped in to Bossa Nova for a holiday party on a busy Friday night in December. Although the restaurant side looked empty, the bar was packed. It seemed like people who were not a part of the party were still coming in. A little odd seeing the party guests had a live band, appetizers and were giving out prizes.  \nWith the appetizer stations, we were able to try many different appetizers from quesadillas to calamari to sushi and back to meatballs. It seemed like Bossa Nova was trying to satisfy varying appetites by offering everything from Italian to Japanese. Overall, the food was average. I was not overy excited about any of it. I enjoyed the drinks much more, especially the Spansh wines. The service was great. We had 3 different bartenders ask us what we wanted while another was making our drinks. Everytime I finished my last bite and was about to have an empty plate, a waiter appeared out of nowhere to wisk away my dirty dish. \nHowever, this is not a casual, laid back, every day type of bar. I can't put my finger on exactly what it is, but the atmosphere definitely gave off the \"I'm better than all of you\" type of vibe. Maybe it was the fact that they charge for th coat check?
Went to an event here. The meatballs were frozen meatballs. It was ok. I probably wouldn't go back to eat.
So I was returning back to the office after doing a site visit and I heard the dreaded \"Pow!  Thump-thump-thump\"!  So I pulled over, got out of the car and sure enough, that right front tire was flatter than a Nebraska cornfield.  O-o-k-ay!   I was so glad that years ago my brother taught me how to change a tire.\n\nWell this Monro was the nearest place to get the tire repaired.  It turned out I'd picked up a nail!  I've heard good and bad about auto repair chains, but they did get the tire fixed quickly.  \n\nAnd girls, you shouldn't be afraid of learning how to change a tire.  Because I had the company car, it actually took me longer to do the memo and the expense report than it did to put the spare on
I had lunch here yesterday before the Pirates game with a few friends.  I have also been here a few times upstairs.  I really liked the fact that we had no problem getting a seat at the bar or a table.  I usually go to the bars on the North Shore prior to Pirates game, but this was a lot less crowded and good for the group I was with.  In fact, truth be told the place was only about 1/2 full (on Bucs opening day!?).  The food was okay.  I tried these nachos which were good and interesting because it had a decent quality sausage as the meat and not just ground beef.  I also really liked the sweet potato fries.  They were delicious and you usually can't get these at too many places.  I ordered the lobster roll.  It was a ton of lobster, however some of the lobster was a little overcooked and it was ice cold.  I can understand serving cool even though Id prefer warm, but ice cold really wasn't that good when they put warm butter on it.  I also tried the tortilla soup, which was really rich and had a good spicy flavor.  The only thing missing in the tortilla soup was the tortilla chips.  A minor oversight I imagine.  Overall, a pretty decent place when you are looking to just have a few beers with friends.  I've also tried the upstairs bar which is the more upscale section.  The bar is huge which is good plenty of room, and their is plenty of seating including leather couches.  The happy hour is okay, but it's pretty much a ghosttown after 8 PM.  Overall a decent place for quiet drinks without the crowds and a little better than average food.
Solid place to grab a martini and listen to some sub-par live music. Far from amazing but hey not everywhere is going to be right?
Olive and Twist is a convenient and rather nice bar to visit if you're staying in the downtown area.  The huge beer list and so so martinis do their job well in attracting the suits and theater crowds in mass numbers.  Finding a seat can be a chore if you come at the wrong hour because no one ever leaves!  The food menu is your typical bar menu and is very well priced.  My party only got the nachos which were good.  Our bartender, Rosie, was a sweetie and really made us feel welcomed in this steely town.
I went here couple of month ago for late night drink. \nI was a little drunk when I went in here, just a little bit, so I don't recall things quite precisely but I liked the atmosphere.\nDim lighting which I liked.\nFriendly staff.\nNothing special for drinks.
I had a really mixed experience here. Took the bf for dinner here before a show at Heinz Hall, which was really great for the convenience, they're so close to one another. We would definitely go back for lunch - GET THE TRUFFLE FRIES APPETIZER - and martinis someday, but never again for dinner. The entrees were expensive and nothing to rave about, and the service wasn't anything special. The dinners took forever to come out - I know it was a Saturday night, but we got there well over two hours early and were still worried about not getting to our show seats on time. It was a nice atmosphere, but one that we felt a little to young and poor for (we're still college students). I think I'd try somewhere else for a nice date night next time, but again, I will definitely go back to splurge some lunchtime on the cake batter martini, truffle fries, and other desserts and appetizers.
This is the perfect place to go before a show downtown. I love the atmosphere of the restaurant in particular the upstairs space. It has a lofty, cozy feel.  Great place for drinks or and event (can rent the upstairs space).  My last visit was for a working business meeting.  Glad we made reservations for it was busy on a Friday evening. I ordered the roast beef sandwich which was very tasty and flavorful.  I love that you have a variety of options for a side and they do not charge you extra. I picked my favorite, mashed potatoes.  A colleague ordered the pesto pasta dish which looked delicious.  We didn't order drinks but in past visits they have a really nice variety of beer and I tried the Banana Bread beer (available in bottles) which is so tasty!! My only complaint was that it took a while for the waitress to take our orders and bring out the checks but it was very crowded with large parties. We stayed at our table after dinner to finish up some work and they did not mind which was great!
We decided to stop by Olive or Twist on a recent Saturday night before a show. A friend was at a wedding upstairs and asked us to drop in to say hi. Apparently they host wedding receptions in the lounge area above the bar/restaurant.\n I was hoping to get a quick meal and a drink before the show. When we arrived the bar was packed and we were told that they had no availability to sit in the restaurant section. But, little can deter me. I scoped out the tables by the bar and noticed a couple getting ready to pay. After making casual chit chat, they agreed to save their table for us. They paid and left while we ordered a drink at the bar. As soon as they got up the waitress put a reserved sign on the table, I assumed it was for us and sat down. Nope. She was trying to reserve it for an 8pm reservation. I thought this was the bar area which is seat yourself? Oh well, I told her we had to be out by 8 for a show anyway so it would work out fine. A few minutes later she came back and told us no, that won't work and we will have to find a place at the bar. Seriously? We are already sitting in the seat yourself tables, it was fine 2 minutes ago, we have to leave by 8, what's the issue? Rather annoyed we looked for seats and ways to inch ourselves into the already overly crowded bar when the waitress returned and said she will reserve another table that was leaving. Now, we have wasted 10 minutes of our already limited time before the show so, I asked what was the fastest thing on the menu. We ordered soup, salad and the buffalo chicken spread. The soup arrived first. I had the homemade chicken noodle. Warm, comfort food that hit the spot. Next was the pear salad with candied walnuts, blue cheese and strawberry vinagerette.  Again, super tasty. I could snack on the candied walnuts all day. Then the buffalo chicken spread. Presentation was great-in a martini glass. The pita chips were delic! But where was the chicken? I searched through the entire martini glass, not one shred or chunk of chicken. Being a buffalo chicken dip lover, I was sorely disappointed. As for the drinks, stick with the martinis as the wine was also a big disappointment.
We went here for drinks and a bite before a concert at nearby Byham theater. We had wings and a piece of cookies and cream cake. Both were outstanding. We both had the Fat Gary's Ale, but in hindsight I would have preferred a Guinness. The ambiance was suitably cave-like as a good bar should be.
Friday night out with one of my best friends and we were looking for a cool place to check out downtown. I always wanted to give this place a shot so we came here. The first floor was a little crowded , we arrived slightly before 6:00, so we headed up to their second floor and took some seats at the bar. \n\nOur bartender was very friendly. There weren't any signs or notes anywhere about happy hour specials, so I asked our bartender. I cannot remember everything that she stated, but I zoned in when she mentioned $2 off Martinis. I chose the cucumber basil martini and my friend did the same. Too strong for me- even with the basil infused vodka and fresh cucumber, my friend on the other hand found it light and refreshing. \n\nWe weren't that hungry so we decided to split an appetizer and order salads. We split the chicken quesadilla appetizer and both ordered house salads. I modified my house salad to have feta rather than blue cheese and chose the strawberry vinaigrette as my dressing. \n\nThe quesadillas were good, as far as chicken quesadillas go. The guacamole it was served with was awesome, although they didn't supply us with enough salsa, sour cream or guacamole for all four quesadillas. Or maybe I am just too obsessed with condiments, haha. \n\nThe salad was yummy , I loved the vinaigrette! It was a decent portion as well. \n\nAlthough I enjoyed the experience, I do not think I will be returning. Two drinks, two salads and one appetizer cost is $50. The Martinis alone, even with their happy hour deal, were still $8 each. I don't mind spending $50 on a meal, but for how average everything was, that was entirely too much. \n\nMaybe I will return for a drink or two one day.
The bar staff is great, but the food quality has definitely taken a downward turn over the past year. I was recently at the bar and was overcome by a foul smell. For those of you that know what Urnex is, that's exactly what I thought (and hoped) it was. Alas, I was told by the bar staff that it was the scallops. Worse yet, they said they come from a can. I nearly puked. I love this place so much, but I am terribly saddened by the lack of the quality in the dishes coming out of the kitchen these days.
Go for the martinis, don't stick around for the food. \n\nI have been here several times for tiny tini Tuesdays - a weekly event that allows you to sample their colorful and delicious martini's in tiny glasses.  You order three at a time for a somewhat steep $12.  If you want variety though, this is not to be underestimated.  \n\nHowever, the food is always lacking.  I went on a lunch date here and decided to go for the grilled cheese and tomato basil soup as my stomach wasn't feeling up to anything more adventurous.  The grilled cheese was fine.  Nothing special.  The soup however had a thin drizzle of basil oil which when stirred in made the soup greasy and wholly unappetizing.  \n\nYour best bet is to head there after work for the martinis and then head around the corner to Six Penn for food.
After hearing about their cocktails, some colleagues and I came hear work for dinner and drinks. The drink menu is very extensive with lots of interesting options. S'mores, and cotton candy cocktails do not appeal to me but my friends who do enjoy them, loved their drinks. The waitresses were very accommodating and didn't hesitant when we asked them to split a check multiple ways. The crowd at Olive and Twist, is on the older side- it was entertaining being the only group of 20 something's there.
This place was adorable. Very nice inside. Solid wood bar long L-shaped with chairs. They also had tables & chairs set up in the back half of the place for table seating. My co-worker and I sat at the bar close to the door and had a few drinks. They served food but we weren't offered a menu  (hence the 3 stars). The bartender wasn't very friendly-later I realize that was just her personality. Still not so cute! They have really good martinis. We had a s'mores which was awesome and came with a chocolate covered marshmallow. We also got a prickly pear. Mmmmmmmm is all I have to say. If I'm ever in Pitts again I would go back cause I know the drinks are very good!\nP. S. They also had an upstairs not sure what was going on up there. Thinking maybe it was a restaurant cause kids were going up with adults.
This was our second visit to Olive or Twist.  We came over this past summer for food and cocktails, but this last visit was just for the booze to have a celebratory drink with Laura M on her Birthday after seeing a great Ballet at the Benedum.  \nI don't mind O&T layout.  It's a bit chopped up but very Pittsburghese reminiscent of most establishments.  There is the upstairs where you can sit by the roaring fire on the 72\" flat screen or lounge on many of the couches or loveseats they have available.  There is also the downstairs that seems to have similar offerings, however at least in our experiences was a lot busier than upstairs.  I pick less busy almost every time. This time around we found three bar seats available upstairs and settled down for a couple drinks.  \nI started with a Southern Tier XXX IPA, solid start to the evening.  I know they specialize in Martinis but I specialize in craft beer.  After that I decided to try a martini, I went with an Espresso Manhattan Martini.  This was defreakinlishious... I love coffee and I love manhattans so the two went together like peas and carrots.  Our service was mixed.  Some bartenders seemed more helpful and interested in waiting on us than others.  This was also my experience from last time.  This time we didn't order food though we were pretty hungry and went elsewhere to eat.  Our last meal here was not worth duplicating.  We both had an Olive or Twist Burger, and I chose sweet potato fries and requested a med rare cook.  We used the Yelp deal so it wasn't as expensive as it could have been, but the burger sells for $13.00.  I rarely complain about cost especially if it is good, however it really was not.  The meat was way overcooked and dry.  Surprisingly the fries were the best thing on the plate.  To spend that on a burger I do expect a better quality.  So lesson learned, we had some tasty drinks here last weekend, but ate at a neighboring facility afterwards.  I'm sure we will be back for drinks again.
Nice location, interesting cocktail menu, but nothing is done particularly well. I still go there, but I wish the cocktails were made using fresher ingredients.
Better than most transit systems in cities of this size. It gets you where you need to go, the bus fleet is reasonably new and clean, but there are some serious flaws.\n\nLack of a clear vision for the future (AKA a REAL rail system!?), and smart fare cards (which is supposedly coming). \n\nAlso, the unions need to stop strangling the cash out of the Port Authority. I mean seriously......bus drivers making 90k a year? Something is wrong with that.
It worked, it was on time, and the 28x got me where i was going for all of $2.60. Besides that it was freezing cold, loud, and the older bus seats were fairly uncomfortable, I can't really complain. \n\nWe did arrive 5 minutes early for a bus that never came. The next one arrived on schedule, but it was raining so we spent 20 minutes in the rain. \n\nThat said, we took the bus many more times reliably than that one time when it didn't show.\n\nOverall, a pretty good system.
I regularly take the bus to work and am grateful that Pittsburgh has a bus system.  Google Maps seems to have fairly up-to-date schedules to determine which buses to take to get from one location to another.  It's also free for me as a Pitt employee.  \n\nHowever, my main complaints are\n\n1. The buses are way too crowded during rush hour.  Not only are the buses almost always so full that the standing room is occupied, but bus drivers some times even have to drive by peeved people at bus stations because the bus is completely full.  \n2. Irregular intervals.  Buses have a tendency to bunch.  This some times results in having to wait at a bus station for a long time before seeing two buses together.  The lead bus is overcrowded and the second bus is usually pretty empty.  Note:  Bus bunching is a well-known phenomenon.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bus_bunching\n3. Waiting outside in the cold for the bus.  Because of irregular intervals, you some times have to wait outside in Pittsburgh weather for significant time.\n\nPittsburgh needs to install GPS on their buses!  This has been implemented in Washington DC and San Francisco already.\n1.  People could check online or on their smart phones when the next bus was about to arrive so they could wait in the comfort of their homes or offices, rather than cold Pittsburgh weather, and   \n2.  Bus drivers could adjust their driving speeds to avoid bunching.
I've only taken Port Authority transit in the summer.  That probably colors my opinion on it, because they've never made me wait out in the cold.  \n\nI think to me, the best thing about the Port Authority is that it exists.  We're in a city that's really starved for decent transit options, and crippled by awful infrastructure, but the PAT buses have done me pretty well.\n\nI would not want to take the bus to get somewhere where I had to be there on time.  That seems like it'd be a mistake.  You can't really get one of these without waiting for a while.  Still, once you're on, they're cheap, comfortable enough, and the drivers are really helpful.  If you have questions about where you get off for what, they can answer them.\n\nBut for weekend bumming-around, it sure is nice not to have to touch my car.  \n\nThank you, Port Authority, for saving me from driving.
I took the bus several times on a recent trip to Pittsburgh.\n\nThe 28X/\"airport flyer\" is a good option to get from PIT to the city--and at $3.75, probably $35(?) cheaper than a cab. The bus was also reliable in getting from my Oakland hotel to Downtown, and from Oakland to Regent Square--especially considering the dearth of cabs in the city. The regular fare of $2.50 is a bit steep for the shorter trips, and when to pay can be confusing (sometimes when you board, sometimes when you exit), but those are minor annoyances.\n\nTIP: Download the Tiramisu app for real-time bus tracking. Worked great while I was there, and I loved that you could enter the time you got on the bus, so the app would adjust arrival times for future stops accordingly--terrific idea.
Good hangover breakfast. HUGE portions. ANGRY service. Get the sausage.
Not a bad store for a few tough-to-find Middle Eastern items, and the price is right.  Because Labad's doesn't appear to be as popular a destination as other stores in the area, some shelves are scantily stocked, and some items look a bit battered and dusty.  Still, this is the place to go for canned fava beans and Turkish delight.\n\nLabad's also offers tasty, filling falafel wraps or gyros for super cheap.
Not a bad place to pick up supplies for Mixology class! In fact, quite coincidentally, several of us ran into each other doing just that.\n\nBasic bar supplies, glasses, bottles, just about whatever you need, but just the basic stuff...but what else would you expect? For the cool stuff, there are plenty of online places to get your fancy on.\n\nWhere they shine is in restaurant supplies! Check it out....fun place to forage!
i was here for work and ordred the #2  The cheesesteak was nice and square and stuff.  Hmm not sure if that's a good thing?  The combination of coleslaw and fries plus that really nice thick spongy bread was pretty good.  I would actually say this would be more like a 4 star sandwich but I have a deep seeded hatred for the Steelers so yeah whatever.  I'd like to see a sandwich superbowl, Seattle vs Pittsburgh yeah!!!
The description of a Primanti Bros sandwich is tastier than the sandwich itself.  One of two dozen different meats topped with french fries and coleslaw;  I tried hot sausage.  The problem is that all that potato and cabbage mutes the flavor of the meat.  Expecting an extremely tasty sandwich, I found myself adding salt and ketchup.  Regardless of the sandwich not living up to expectations, I would go back if I lived in the area because it is a really pleasant place with draft beer and some outdoor seating.
The fries and 'slaw piled into all of the sandwiches is a cool local niche, but I'd say the overall quality of the sandwiches are just average otherwise.
I came to Primanti Brothers after my roommate said Pittsburgh was known for it.  I read several reviews and went with the pastrami sandwich.  It was good.  Just the right amount of meat (I hate it when the meat overpowers the entire sandwich), yummy vinegary cole slaw that made the sandwich refreshing, tomato, swiss, and of course french fries in the sandwich.  It was a good, ginormous sandwich just not as AMAZING as I thought it would be... If I come back to Pittsburgh I'd probably come back to try a different sandwich.
I saw this place on Man vs Food and thought I would check it out. I ordered the pastrami with cheese. The sandwich was humongous!!!! It was filled with cheese, pastrami, coleslaw and french fires. It was very messy to eat but it was so good. I only drawback to this place was the service. My waitress was not very friendly and she got my order mixed up with the table next to me. She didn't even apologize for the mix up. Other than that it was a great experience and I recommend anyone who is going to the steel city to get some Primanti Bros.
The legendary Primanti Bros.  I believe I had been to Pittsburgh 10+ times before my first visit.  That being said I'm (a) glad I went (b) ok with it taking that long (c) really enjoyed the roast beef and cheese (d) easily would have paid more than the $7 ticket price (e) definitely need to hit the treadmill tomorrow and (f) thankful to not live next door.\n\nOverall, a good local experience.  No burning desire to hit em up the next time in Pittsburgh, but wouldn't hesitate to recommend.  Great tasting glutinous original sandwiches at decent prices, that's what they are.
When i told everyone I was going to Pittsburgh - Primanti Bros is one place everyone said I should try.\n\nPrimanti Bros.'s sandwich = meat + cole slaw + french fries\n\nI ordered the pastrami and it was really good! The pastrami was lean and warm. I'm not a big fan of cole slaw but their cole slaw was pretty good. It was more like pickled vegetable; the pieces were big instead of chopped up finely which i liked. The french fries were a bit of a challenge to keep inside though.\n\nI would recommend trying Primanti's if you're in the area!
So after hearing about all the raves and reviews about Primanti Bros, I had to try it for myself. I'm not going to lie, I was a bit disappointed. I think it is more of a novelty thing than anything. I would say yes, you should try it if you happen to come to Pittsburgh, but try not to expect a lot because that might have killed the sandwich for me.\n\nThe sandwich is packed with great meat, but the fries were pretty soggy and coleslaw that day was a bit too much pepper for my liking. I thought the fries might have been soggy because of the coleslaw so I ordered another order of fries (since I'm generally a fries fiend), but even those were soft and not up to par. I was pretty disappointed at that. However, the meat was pretty delicious. I got corned beef and it was delicious slices and it was cooked well.\n\nI would say overall verdict: try the place but try with an open mind.
Why waste time? Want a sandwich, fries and slaw? Put it all in one, this is what Primati Bro's  does. \n\nEvery sandwich here is huge, not really due to the protein, but due to the handful(s) of fried and slaw and the thick bread each one is built with. I opted for the Colossal fish and cheese sandwich (6.99).  The fish had a nice crisp batter, the fires were a bit soggy , the bread was nice and soft and the slaw was decent.  Alone I loved the fish, All together the starch of the bread and fried over power the fish. There was hot sauce at the table to help add flavor (frank's red hot style). \n\nSeating is odd, seat your self and you will get service when you are noticed. Drink come in to go cups and the menu is on paper for you to keep as notice to you doctor of your  1000+ calorie meal. \n\nMy coworker also got the cheese fires for extra cholesterol and to max his per diem. Cheese wiz smothered soggish fries. It was decent but it did not blow me away by any means.\n\nBottom line, if you are a tourist, give it a try, if you are a local come for the nostalgic name.
I guess you have to try this out if your not from Pittsburgh!\n\nI had the sweet sausage, Hubs had hot sausage, my oldest had ham and my youngest ordered chicken fingers.  The chilli was good, but the bread it came w/ was stale.  They put cole slaw and french fries on the sandwiches.  I thought that it just made the sandwiches bland and starchy.  But not bad...just blah.  The bread was nice and soft and they have several different kinds.  \nI am not a beer drinker, but they looked like pretty good prices.  The place was very crowded and you seat yourself.  We lucked up on an empty table, although it was by the door.  The place looks much bigger on the outside.
Never heard of this place. Only heard/went there because my dad wanted to.\n\nGreat atmosphere. Server was very good. Overall great service. Beer selection was OK. Low price for lots of food.\n\nHad the cheesesteak. It was ok. Nothing special. Like most \"fat sandwiches,\" when you add French Fries to a sandwich, they leave it with little flavor.
I love the concept but I think it is overrated.  I have been hearing so much hype about Primanti Brothers that I was so excited to finally get to stop in at one.  I have no problem with the size or amount of grease, I just don't get the greatness of the sandwiches.\n\nWe ordered the Kolbassi & Cheese and the Pitts-burger cheesesteak (#2 best seller).  I had half of each one along with cheese fries.  I thought both sandwiches were a little dry especially the cheesesteak.  The coleslaw seemed to be too dry for my taste or maybe it was the abundance of fries that dried everything out for me.  I am not a big fry fan in the first place.  I would like to see some other options for bread like a wheat or whole grain option.  I would also recommend putting extra cheese on the sandwich as I couldn't even taste cheese.  I like cheese and they need more to help balance the dryness.\n\nService was a little lame as I barely could understand our \"too cool\" server.  He seemed disinterested in us for the most part.  The pregnant waitress who helped us out once seemed more congenial and helpful.  I like the fact that it is small and fast.  I just don't get the vast appeal.  I need sauces, fresh ingredients, whole grains, and cheese.  I would recommend for everyone to try the place once but I bet there is better options in the Burg.
I thought it was solid.  I got the Pittsburgher with an Iron City.  I had to experience Primanti and I enjoyed it.  \nService was good on a Friday afternoon, Beer was cold on a hot day and my sandwich was satisfying.  What more could you really ask for from a sandwich joint?
This place isn't for a light lunch. Their famous sandwiches include a variety of grilled meats (the cheese steak its second-best seller) with french fries, cole slaw, and tomatoes all squeezed between two soft slices of freshly-cut Italian bread. Rather than cool, mayo-based slaw, an Italian oil-based slaw is used that adds a spicy zing to the sandwich. It's a great meal on the go for game day, or you can watch it on one of the TVs surrounding the bar. It's a greasy handful, but you don't go to Primanti's to be healthy. You go to be full.
Fries and cole slaw in the sandwich was interesting...pretty good. Don't come here if you don't like messy food. My sandwich kind of fell apart. Also, they don't give you plates or forks or knives (they bring you your food on a sheet of wax paper). I'm not sure if they take credit cards (we paid with cash), and have fun trying to find parking near it!
It was a decently filling sandwich, but nothing special about it. I had the cheese fries (it was pretty much molten cheese with bits of fries in it) and the cheese steak sandwich.  It was definitely great to try but I didn't enjoy the mess and the sandwich was a bit bland. Great location to people watch, but would I come here again? Probably not.
I hit the Primanti Brothers Market Square location to see if the sandwich lives up to the legend and it does. The shop offers a wide array of versions from beef to fish but the grilled steak has rich flavor that is nicely cut by the slightly vinegary Cole slaw. The addition of the fries and Cole slaw on top of the sandwich will make any of the offerings at Primanti a delicious and unique flavor of Pittsburgh.
I think I made the mistake of coming here sober. Primanti's is great if you've had a few. Oddly, this location closes at midnight so it's late night food without late night hours.\n\nThis location is much smaller than the others. There's no good way to get a group of 8+ people together here.\n\nIt's downtown near offices but doesn't seem to suit the after-work get together well. The food is still a decent value but that's about all it has going for it.
I was visiting Pittsburgh recently a was told by more than one person that I have to visit Primanti Bros.  We originally planned on the Cherry Way location but were in Market Square and we were starving. \n\nWe walked in and it was pretty busy.  We waited a few minutes for an empty table and found one.  We cleaned if off ourselves and that was okay with me.  I was pretty excited about this place because of the reviews and other personal recommendations.  \n\nI ordered a ham and cheese sandwich and my partner ordered one with more than one type of lunch meat.  The sandwiches were simply sandwiches with coleslaw and French fries on top.  There was nothing special about it and it's something easily made at home.  The price was good.  For a beer, coke, and two sandwiches we got of there for under $20.  \n\nThe condition of the women's restroom was horrible.  It ruined my appetite.  You'd think with such a reputation that that condition of the restroom would be a bit nicer.  The restaurant itself was in crappy shape as well.  I expect dive bars to look like this.  \n\nNext time I'm in Pittsburgh, I won't be coming back to a Primanti Bros.  There's surely better food out there and a better dining environment.
This place is basically \"the place\" you hear about when you say you are going to Pittsburgh. And I am glad I tried it. I can see it being bringing back memories of college days to any alumni.\n\n+friendly service. It was day 2 of our cashier/ waitress and I thought she was pretty amazing. \n+fries are delicious in general, and this place is no exception. \n+cheap. 6 bucks for a sandwich or burger. You're not in San Francisco anymore. \n+coke products and not pepsi. Win. \n\n-I just don't eat this type of food if I can help it. White bread, well done cheap meat. \n-Fried everything. \n\nSo, if you would like a burger with fries, on white bread and are not looking to see a green thing in sight, this is the perfect place and you won't be disappointed. If you are a college student, you should eat here at least 1X per month, if not more.
I heard good things..after all Primanti Brothers have developed a nice chain in the area.\n\nGreat service very helpful...I had the guys pick the sandwich for me.  I got There best selling burger....it was a hamburger with fries in it.   Not a fan of the idea.  Overall kinda boring(Sorry) but it is what it is.  The meat tasted like meat which was a nice change but the toppings were just down right sad.  Fries where a  step up from the norm and for a price of under 7 bucks it sure beats any fast food chain.
I have eaten better sandwiches but stopping for lunch at Primanti Bros was an overall great experience. I sat inside at the bar where I was afforded a bird's eye view of the grill. You should expect to eat a sandwich with a handful of french fries and a handful of cole slaw smashed on top of whatever meat/cheese combination you may have ordered. I would definitely recommend sitting at the bar to take in the full experience.
Can't go to Pittsburgh and not try one of their sandwiches! A bit overrated in my option though... Sandwiches are huge, but the fries they stuff the sandwiches with are very dry and soggy, and not crispy at all! This is definitely one of those restaurants you go to, just to say you have!
I was first excited that it's one of those places they review on the Food Network where they make specialty sandwiches, NYC style.\nIn reality, their food is not that great. Yes, the sandwiches are huge, come with fries inside, and a ton of meat, etc. But I've definitely had better.\nI was disappointed that the salads are premade; the ones you'd buy at a super market or gas station. I mean it is a casual place, but I was at least expecting a fresh salad.\nIn short, if you're on Market Square and are hungry for inexpensive (considering some of the other options there) and mediocare quick meal, you should give it a try.
I like sandwich and stuff as much as anyone else. this place was pretty good. The prices were good also. the staff was good. Everything worked out the way it should. There were no negative surprise. No poistive surprises either. It was a nice resturant.
Got a sandwich to go so I can't give a full review but when I ate it, the fries were soggy and SOO greasy.  I had the bag in my purse and the grease leaked through and eventually broke the bag.  Really want to eat in there next time since everyones sandwiches looked yummy.\n\nTheir vegetable soup was great!  The people who work there are the best.  Amazing service.
Visiting Pittsburgh from out of town, so naturally I asked my hosts to take me to Primanti's (and they were happy to oblige).  We went to the one at \"PPG.\" The place was busy but not crowded on a Friday night.  The menu was on the wall along with murals of Pittsburgh's finest sports starts.\n\nOur server was quick and efficient and we never were in need of refills or anything else.\n\nI got the Pitts-burgher cheese steak and we tried an order of the Smallman Street Fries.  The fries were truly loaded.  The chili had a nice kick to it and there was literally an ice cream scoop of sour cream on top.  However, the fries were actually seasoned that well and were under done in my opinion.  That didn't bode well for the fries on the sandwich, but I kept my hopes high.\n\nThe sandwich comes out and its a monster.  I love the italian bread, the beef patty and cheese, the slaw was good (shredded cabbage, not like southern cole slaw).  Everything was fresh but, again, the fries were the worst part.  Underdone, underseasoned.  Definitely my least favorite part.\n\nNonetheless, I would definitely return because I want to try some of the other menu items.  I've heard double-meat is the way to go.  I'm intrigued.
Primanti Bros is the dirty guilty pleasure that I give into once a year.\n\nMost times, when out of towners ask for a local spot to eat, I'm one of the few that actually pushes them AWAY from this defacto Burgh tradition.  Don't get me wrong, Primanti's isn't bad, but it isn't exactly great either.  Typically I end up smothering mine in hot sauce and salt/pepper to get some flavor onto otherwise bland sandwiches.\n\nWith that said, every once in awhile, I get this odd, insatiable craving for a cap and egg sandwich (w/ onion)... and when I do cave to that temptation, it's oddly satisfying.\n\nOn the experience front, Primanti's is definitely one of a kind.  I don't know of anywhere else you can get burly bartenders to slam down a mess of a sandwich in wax paper on your table (something the suburban restaurants fail to provide).  If you're going to go, I highly suggest going either to the original in the Strip, or, if you don't feel like waiting in line during the busy times, the Market Square location.
My brother mentioned that he'd heard about this place in Pittsburgh that puts coleslaw and fries on their sandwiches. Sounded good and I was in town so I thought I'd give it a shot! I went around 4 pm on a Saturday and it was pretty busy! Usually a good sign. There were only about 3 people in front of me in the takeout line, so it shouldn't have taken long for me to place an order, right? Wrong. It took maybe 15-20 minutes for those 3 orders to be taken because nobody would commit themselves to working the register. While waiting in line, I got to see all these mouthwatering sandwiches being made. Once I placed my order, it didn't take long to come out...\n\nSo I got a Pittsburgh cheese steak, their #2 most popular item (don't ask what their #1 is...the guy will roll his eyes and unenthusiastically say, \"beer.\") Long story short, what I ended up with was a bland, lukewarm beef party with bland soggy fries on top. The cold lettuce and tomato cooled the sandwich even more. I enjoyed the coleslaw on top, which is pretty much all I ended up eating from the sandwich. And a few limp fries. Disappointing.
Had to try this while in Pittsburgh. Ate the first half of my sandwich with the slaw & the fries but by the time I got to the second half I took the fries off because they were cold. I had the pastrami & asked for extra cheese. Didn't get the extra cheese. Feel like the sandwiches are missing something. Might be good with a thousand island dressing or \"secret sauce\". \n\nUnderwhelmed but still recommend trying it at least once for the experience.\n\nMarket square location was confusing because seat yourself but wasn't clear.
My Order: Pitts-Burger (ok) & Raspberry Lemon Tea (not bad; sweet) \n\nPros: \n- notably, PB was called \"the place\" to go to in Pittsburg\n- they put fries & coleslaw into their burgers (novelty idea) due to the history of Pittsburgh (and the working class men) \n- customize-able: you can put eggs, extra meat, etc. in your sandwich\n- I sat on the second floor and was able to overlook the first floor & the open-designed kitchen (which was pretty neat) \n\nCons:\n- to be honest, I didn't think it was anything special. Just fries & coleslaw added into the burger as opposed to being a side\n- no parking... \n\nNonetheless, it's something worth trying if you're new to Pittsburgh. But would I go back? Probably not.
The restaurant did their level best to make it up to me, so here's another star for giving a damn. Thanks!
Had the second best seller which was really good.   A nice carb coma from the italian bread and fries.  A great mix of salty from the meat and those aforementioned fries with the sweet from the slaw!  \n\nThe service was good so why only three stars?  Well, when your choice was seeing the stories on their televisions about our enemy murdering defenseless journalists or some show about naked people living off the land...kind of stifles the appetite and not appropriate for even the most casual of dining!   I would have expected better from the hipsters running the joint.
This was a fun sandwich as I was visiting Pittsburgh. It was neat to hear the origin that truck drivers just wanted their cole slaw & fries slapped in with the sandwich so they could eat it on the go. I appreciate the concept & it's worth a try but I don't need to come back. I liked fat heads more.
The beer selection is limited to what you might find in convince store (in states where this is possible. Sandwiches are Pittsburgh landmarks though and the food is good but nothing truly special. Great place to hang with friends, catch a game and chow down.
We decided to stop by Primanti brothers after hearing all the hype from everyone. We were already primed with the fact that their sandwiches are stuffed with fries so we decided to just share one sandwich. And holy moley was it colossal (well we DID get the colossal fish and cheese). We ended up taking most of the fries out because it got too heavy and filling. The coleslaw in the sandwich was pretty good-- not a huge amount of mayo which is what I like. However, even finishing half the sandwich was a huge battle for me. Toward the end, it wasn't pleasant at all because it was just way too filling.
The sandwiches are interesting and the fries in them are interesting.\n\nI don't like fries or potatoey fries, mostly just the crispy ones.\n\nThe sandwich was good and quick but because I'm not a huge fan of fries it wouldn't make sense for me to go back.\n\nIt also was super crowded.
Monte Cello's Downtown does not look like much from the outside.  It is wedged into a small triangular shaped building.  They are open for lunch and dinner.  Their pizza has been a staple of Downtown since 1980.\n\nTheir specialty pizzas include spinach and feta cheese pizza, a little too oily for my tastes (it's made with an oil and garlic sauce).  A much better choice is Buffalo Chicken Pizza, which is Buffalo sauce topped with cheese and spicy chicken.  The chicken has a nice fresh taste to it and while spicy, is never overdone.\n\nBut I love the hoagies the best here.  My favorite is the tuna hoagie, which is served with cheese, lettuce, tomato, & grilled onions.  I know, break out the Listerine strips after eating one of those.  If I like something a little zestier, I'll get the Capicola or the Genoa Salami hoagie.\n\nThey have a lunch buffet here too.  I've never tried it because I prefer my food made-to-order.
It's been awhile since I've reviewed Monte Cello's so I thought I'd hit it again yesterday.  Monte Cello's in a rather unassuming building.  It's a little cramped in there and definitely not the most inviting place in the world.  But yesterday was one of those picture perfect summer days--perfect for getting a good sandwich or slice and heading over to a plaza for some Al Fresco dining (unfortunately Al Fresco called in sick so I had to eat alone).\n\nSo let's see, which sandwich did I want?  Philly Chicken hoagie?  Capicola hoagie?  grilled Chicken?  Nah, the Genoa salami hoagie seemed just right.  \n\nThe food here is pretty good.  But you're always better off getting it to go.
My office often gets Pizza delivered from Monte Cello's. The crust is thin and the pizza is decent.  I have gone there a few times for lunch to grab a few slices of pizza (with others). I agree that the small fountain drinks with no refills is annoying.  If I am going to eat in, I prefer Villa Reale on Smithfield.  You can get slices during lunch if you sit at the counter.
Very close to work for me and the others in my office.  Was excited about getting a steak salad, which I found is a staple here in the Burgh.  The first one I got in July 2012 was good.  I don't know if the method of cooking or person cooking the steak had changed or the meat supplier is different, but after that, I've had two steak salads where the meat was just too tough!  Haven't been back since.  Probably won't go back to get a salad until the meat is cooked tender and not left to become shoe leather.  Not getting a salad again unless someone can convince me that the meat was just cooked and juicy!  \n\nPizza's are yummy and pizza lovers will like their small but adequate pizza buffet which has about 8 different types of pizza.  \n\nThe restaurant is always crowded  at lunch time.  There is a large turnover of pizza so it's always hot.
I went there on a Saturday afternoon by myself and wanted to sit out front.  The host made fun of me!  Said \"aw, that's too bad\" when I said it was just me.  No, it is perfectly fine in my book!\n\nI got the lobster roll, plenty of lobster on a garlic bread roll.  It was just ok.  \n\nThe most annoying part was the host kept coming out to talk to me.  I really just wanted to chill out by myself, not get hit on by the creepy host!
Messy floors but quick waiter
I went here on a Friday afternoon for lunch with some coworkers. We were a party of 12. Even though the restaurant was busy, they were able to get us a table. Apparently there is a second floor room that can be rented out for parties, but they don't take reservations. \n\nThe interior of the building is nicer than I thought, judging from the outside and other Yelp reviews. They have a lot of large televisions, which would make this an ideal spot for watching a game. \n\nOur server was very pleasant and friendly, but some of the staff has that native Pittsburgher gruffness, which some people might translate as rude. There do seem to be some staffing problems, though. A latecomer to our group asked another waitress clearing a nearby table if she was our waitress. The woman said \"no\" and walked away without offering to get our server. It was a little weird. Our waitress also had people at the other end of the table yell their lunch orders, even though it was very loud. She could have easily walked over, so that was odd, too. \n\nNot being in the mood for fish, I ordered the white pizza. It was very large, much bigger than I expected. I ended up taking the leftovers with me, and it fed me for two more meals. So, while the prices are a little more than you'd expect to pay at a similar restaurant, many of the portions are huge. Two people could easily split the fish sandwich.\n\n The pizza was pretty good, with a paper-thin crust and plenty of tomatoes and pungent garlic. I think the garlic was from a jar. The cheese was a tangy blend. \n\nAll of Roland's pizzas are oven-fired, and some of my pieces of crust were burned black. This may be a plus to some people, but I don't much care for it. \n\nIn all, it was a decent meal, and the rest of my party seemed to be happy with their food. I'd like to come back here and try some other menu items.
In the Strip District, there's not many options when you're hungry. Walking up and down, the Strip district is filled with booths of steelers and penguins gear. There was a breakfast place and Primanti brothers that was packed. So we were dying for some food and ran across Roland's. We got mussels and banana peppers stuffed with sausage for our appetizers. I also got a lobster roll. They gave us a lot of mussels slathered with garlic and butter. Surprisingly good. And the banana peppers were not bad too. I also enjoyed my lobster roll. Buttered toast and big chunks of lobster meat. I had no room left to finish off my fries. \n\nNow, I can't decide if the food was average or below average as we were pretty hungry. I'll give Roland's the benefit of the doubt. Don't expect anything spectacular, just food that fills your belly.
I was only here for drinks, on a Saturday night.  It was decent - the drinks were fairly mixed and priced.\n\nThe atmosphere was a bit lacking.  There isn't much personality here, and for a Saturday, I would have expected a bit more of a crowd.  Overall, not bad if you're in the area for a drink; but not a destination.
The Lobster Roll Caesar Salad was very good, and the service at the bar was great!
I am only judging this place as a bar, never had the food.  I'd rather give it 2.5 stars.\n\nI came here with a colleague after a long, long travel experience to get to Pittsburgh.  \n\nThey had a nice collection of beers including some local ones.  The only negative side is that the bartender had almost no knowlege of what the beers were like so we had to just try our luck.  The bartender had never tried any of the beers nor did he care about them.  I would have liked to have more info in order to make smarter choices about which beers to get.  At least one of them I would have avoided if I'd know more about it.\n\nPerhaps he was just not used to encountering a beer geek.\n\nI did pass by the place the next day around lunch and it was full of customers.  For what ever that means.
Aah, Roland's. I have only been here exactly 4 times, but have never tried the food. My boyfriend and I always just hit the bar for drinks and we've never stayed very long. A trip to Roland's was always because we were in the Strip for another reason and thought, \"Why not?\"\n\nThere is one bartender in particular there who has served us every time and is super awesome. Very friendly, chatty, cool guy. He knows how to pour a good beer and is up to date on what Roland's has or doesn't have and what he can substitute out for you. \n\nThe rooftop and outdoor seating seems really neat, but every time we've gone they've been packed, not surprisingly. Hanging out on their front patio would be a neat people watching spot.
